 Continuing a recent trend, Japan's exports of videocassette recorders rose in July while those of color television sets fell, the Electronics Industries Association of Japan said.  Exports of VCRs grew 4.8% in July to 1,929,000 units, maintaining a rise that began nine months before.  Shipments to the U.S. increased 9% to 809,000 sets.  The association said color TV exports went down for the fifth straight month, dropping 29% to 201,000 sets.  Areas other than the U.S. and Europe accounted for about 80% of the TV exports, according to officials.  When the Chicago Board of Trade in July forced an Italian firm, Ferruzzi Finanziaria S.p.A., to liquidate most of a huge position in July soybean futures, a lot of people became very excited.  Soybean growers screamed about the drop in prices.  Europeans charged discrimination.  The Soviets yelled that the U.S. was inflicting another grain embargo on them, neglecting to mention that they now buy most of their soybeans in South America, where they are cheaper.  Things have quieted down now.  Part of the problem, according to CBOT chairman Karsten Mahlmann, was that Ferruzzi's traders, operating from an office in New Orleans, didn't understand the rules of the exchange and the federal Commodity Futures Trading Commission.  The Italians, granted permission to exceed speculative trading limits, had acquired 53% of total open interest in the July contract, not to mention a preponderance of warehouse receipts representing claims on beans in storage.  The CBOT, backed by the CFTC, felt these actions had endangered its ability to fulfill its legal mandate to conduct an orderly market as the July contract neared expiration.  The Italians, Mr. Mahlmann says, now have put control of their CBOT trading in the hands of David H. Swanson, president and chief executive of Ferruzzi's big U.S. subsidiary, Central Soya Co. of Fort Wayne, Ind.  Mr. Swanson does understand the rules and has promised to abide by them.  Said Mr. Swanson in a recent interview at his Fort Wayne offices: "On the record, for the record and absolutely repeatedly, we want the Chicago Board of Trade to succeed.  We venerate the institution, we need the institution -- it's far and away the most efficient in the world."  Yet there are still some questions to be asked about the July affair -- and they may yet be asked by Congress or in the courts -- such as who was short while Ferruzzi was long.  The CBOT has little doubt that it can defend its own decisions but it does recognize that such incidents, should they recur, could be more damaging to the exchange than even its other big problem, the indictment of 46 traders at the CBOT and Chicago Merc on charges of illegal trading.  Mr. Swanson thinks the incident raised some serious questions about the CBOT, such as whether its board is sufficiently cognizant of the needs of the big international agricultural-products firms.  Even though he doesn't agree with the suspicions that arose from the forced sale of July contracts, he thinks they should be taken seriously.  "The perception was, here we go again.  The Americans suddenly see that there is a domestic or local problem and they stand up at the first opportunity and do something that certainly isn't in the interests of the international community.  Some of the receipts we owned in Chicago were against a 200,000-ton contract to the Soviet Union, so from their perspective that almost looked like an embargo and they said so in a letter of protest.  Japanese trading companies protested.  The European Community took advantage to say, 'the Americans come to the GATT and demand free trade and the end to farm subsidization and at the first opportunity, when Chicago gets into trouble, something like this happens.' I don't believe there was any international discrimination involved, but you can't do anything to change the impression."  All of which raises far broader issues having to do with global trade in agricultural commodities.  Farm price supports, export subsidies and import barriers to agricultural trade have been at the forefront of the Uruguay Round of multilateral trade talks, which began in 1986 and are due to conclude next year.  Ronald Reagan put this issue on the agenda of his economic summits, calling for a mutual agreement to end costly national policies relating to agriculture.  Mr. Swanson, for his part, has engaged in a private effort to influence national policies and the Uruguay round in positive ways.  It's called the International Policy Council on Agriculture and Trade (IPC), and includes such members as Lord Plumb of Coleshill, president of the European Parliament; American Farm Bureau President Dean Kleckner; Enshiro Matsuyama, managing director for foods operations of Japan's Mitsubishi Corp.; Claude Villain, inspector general of finance in France, and some 23 other prominent specialists in agricultural policy from around the world.  The group, formed in 1987 and scheduled to meet again this month, wants to function somewhat like the Group of 30, formed some years ago to bring influence to bear on national policies relating to international finance.  Agriculture has come to be heavily protected world-wide.  The cost in the U.S. is some $35 billion and in all industrial (OECD) countries it exceeds $220 billion.  "The amount of subsidization that moves through the agriculture sector of the United States is about 35% of total value, in the European Communities about 41% and in Japan it is 79%," Mr. Swanson noted in a recent speech to the New York Association of Business Economists.  Subsidies have simply gone out of control, he said.  He went on to say that liberalization of agricultural policies in the U.S. would save the federal budget some $37 billion, improve the trade balance by some $42 billion, expand investment by $36 billion and the total GNP by $10 billion.  In Europe the effect would be a rise in jobs, manufacturing output and exports and in Japan the standard of living could rise as much as 30%.  But he has no illusions about how easy this will be.  In his Fort Wayne office, he reflects on the reality that in almost all industrial countries, farm programs are controlled by legislatures, not the executive.  Vested interests lobby legislatures intensively, so it is impossible to get something ideologically pure or simple.  What the IPC plans to do this month is draw up a list of practical compromises, "things that would make the world a better place and drive us toward something that is less distortive and more efficient."  Major structural reform may be impossible, he believes.  For example, he notes that Congress has rushed to get the 1989 farm bill rewritten before the GATT talks reopen so that the talks won't influence its provisions.  "The EC is playing the same game."  When you look at that colossal problem and the politics that surround it, the problems of the Chicago Board of Trade seem minute by comparison.  And yet, as Mr. Swanson notes, even in markets badly distorted by politics, there remains a powerful need for what the CBOT provides, a mechanism for price discovery and hedging.  "We just think that if they are going to do a better job in the future, they ought to at least on an advisory basis get more participation from their constituents," says Mr. Swanson, referring to producers and processors.  "What we are trying to achieve is a recognition, and this is what the IPC is about, that agriculture is global, must be global if we are to feed the world and be efficient, so let's for heaven's sake try to come up with mechanisms that work, that are politically achievable and drive in the general direction of lower unit costs for the ultimate consumer."  That's a tall order but clearly one that needs filling.  Marathon Oil U.K. Ltd., a unit of USX Corp., said the Central Brae oil field in the North Sea came on stream Friday when initial production began from the first of three planned production wells.  Marathon said Central Brae is operated on behalf of the Brae Group and is Marathon's third North Sea development and its first sub-sea development there.  Production at Central Brae is expected to peak at 21,000 barrels a day by mid-1990 from the three production wells, Marathon said.  The company holds a 38% interest in Central Brae.  Nestled in a leafy park alongside sparkling Lake Geneva, the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade, or GATT, this month enters the home stretch of a four-year negotiating marathon.  Much is at stake for the 42-year-old institution, which seems to be in the throes of a mid-life crisis.  Having successfully pulled down the industrial world's tariffs to an average 5% from as high as 40% in the immediate postwar years, it's reaching for an expanded mission to halt a decline in status that's already evident.  A large proportion of world commerce now involves items like services, ideas and investments, all of which fall outside GATT's scope.  Moreover, a more assertive U.S., a more integrated European Community and a more powerful Japan are increasingly inclined to thrash out trade problems themselves, paying only lip service to the 96-country organization.  Arthur Dunkel, GATT's director general, is determined to steer the global organization beyond its current crossroads and into a new era.  "What we are engaged in is a far-reaching extension of the coverage of GATT," he says.  But the agenda is "very ambitious, very difficult," says a British diplomat, adding "it's not clear that the round will succeed."  As many observers see it, GATT will emerge from the current round of talks either significantly revitalized or clearly vestigial.  "It's a turning point," says John Jackson, law professor at the University of Michigan.  He proposes a "new charter" for GATT.  If the effort fails, the world can expect more brinkmanship between the most powerful trading blocs -- at worst, a sort of mutual economic destruction via protectionist trade actions.  Of the various economic bureaucracies spun out after World War II, GATT is the runt of the litter.  Both the International Monetary Fund and the World Bank boast bigger staffs and far greater financial and enforcement muscle.  For example, the Geneva-based organization even lacks a permanent representative in Washington, where much trade policy is determined.  Conceived as a provisional body, GATT only became a permanent organization because the more powerful International Trade Organization that economic leaders first proposed got scuttled by the U.S. Senate, which refused to ratify it.  Essentially, the middle-aged GATT is trying to reclaim some of the clout intended for the ill-starred ITO.  But much could derail that effort.  Last year, a trans-Atlantic fracas over agricultural subsidies ground progress to a halt.  In coming months, many officials foresee trouble over textiles and clothing.  Long exempted from normal GATT procedures, these items have been subject to the so-called "multifiber arrangement," which allows for hundreds of intricate trade deals restricting the developing world's sales of cheap apparel to the industrialized countries.  British knitwear groups recently used the multifiber arrangement, known as the MFA, to staunch a flood of women's underwear from China.  After nearly 60 million pairs cascaded into Britain in 1987 -- roughly two for every eligible purchaser -- the industry pushed through a quota chopping the inflow to 30 million pairs in 1988.  Politically powerful textile groups say they couldn't have acted as swiftly under the GATT's more cumbersome procedures.  These lobbies argue that if they can't keep the MFA, which is slated to expire in 1991, they would like GATT to replicate many of the arrangement's procedures.  Officials in Geneva are wary.  "We are dismantling a monster," says a senior trade official regarding the MFA.  If a standoff erupts, it could spoil other GATT goals.  The organization is pushing to create disciplines to govern "intellectual properties," such as trademarks and patents.  Among other things, industrialized GATT members want the developing countries to quit duplicating costly medicines and attaching counterfeit alligators to knitted shirts.  In exchange for a new crackdown on trademark and patent piracies, the poorer countries want something in return -- like much freer access to clothing markets in the industrialized world.  Given the complex linkages among the various trade issues, GATT officials are preparing themselves for battle.  "The way ahead is a very tough one," says Mr. Dunkel.  "I can tell you we will go through some very difficult times.  Negotiation is a polite word for confrontation.  We are in a world of confrontation."  Companies listed below reported quarterly profit substantially different from the average of analysts' estimates.  The companies are followed by at least three analysts, and had a minimum five-cent change in actual earnings per share.  Estimated and actual results involving losses are omitted.  The percent difference compares actual profit with the 30-day estimate where at least three analysts have issues forecasts in the past 30 days.  Otherwise, actual profit is compared with the 300-day estimate.  @ ESTIMATE  @ (# of analysts)  @ ACTUAL ---------------------- %  @COMPANY NAME EPS 30-DAY 300-DAY DIFF.  @ POSITIVE  @Shoney's Inc. $ .16 ... $ .15 (7) 6.67  @ NEGATIVE  @Meyer (Fred) Inc. $ .30 ... $ .45 (3) 33.33  @Syntex Corp. $ .46 ... $ .54 (14) 14.81  Source: Zacks Investment Research  (During its centennial year, The Wall Street Journal will report events of the past century that stand as milestones of American business history.)  RACHEL CARSON'S "SILENT SPRING," published in October 1962, alerted the U.S. to the hazards of toxic chemicals and other pollutants.  The environment became a lasting concern and a lasting issue.  The biologist's book, attacked by chemical makers, sold well -- 165,000 copies in hard cover and 1.8 million in soft.  It led to the creation of the Environmental Protection Agency late in 1970.  This brought into one agency 15 different federal units then dealing with air and water pollution, waste disposal and radiation.  On April 22 of that year a national "Earth Day" rally was held, led by Sen. Gaylord Nelson and others, when thousands shouted such slogans as "Stop the muck]" Novelist Kurt Vonnegut said Nixon "may be the first president to lose a planet."  Ms. Carson wrote: "The most alarming of all man's assaults upon the environment is the contamination of air, earth, rivers and sea with dangerous and even lethal chemicals."  Major duels followed between smokestack America and consumer groups and bureaucrats.  The final score isn't in -- many measures such as the Clear Air Act and the Clean Water Act have been enacted or amended over the years -- but about 30 pesticides, including DDT, have been banned.  The EPA has a current budget of $5.16 billion, up from $1.29 billion in fiscal 1971.  There's also a Superfund, supported by taxpayers and offenders, to clean up toxic waste sites.  (During its centennial year, The Wall Street Journal will report events of the past century that stand as milestones of American business history.)  WILL DURANT'S DARING AND DRIVE created General Motors.  The financial clout of the Du Ponts, both as a corporation and a family, helped provide the money to do it.  By the end of World War I, when Pierre Du Pont had replaced Durant as chairman, the Delaware company owned roughly a quarter of GM.  Its paints and fabrics, understandably, became components in GM cars.  Thirty years later, the antitrust troops of the Truman administration sniffed monopoly and filed suit to end the arrangement.  The Du Pont-GM marriage won the blessings of lower courts, but in May 1962 the U.S. Supreme Court voted 4 to 3 to dissolve it.  Within 10 years, the high court ruled, Du Pont must divest itself of 63 million GM shares.  The complication was that, under the tax law then in effect, those who were given GM shares under the court's order would have to pay tax on them as ordinary income.  Du Pont had acquired the stock at just over $2 a share; in 1962 it was selling at more than $55.  Du Pont President Crawford Greenewalt estimated that taxes to individual Du Pont shareholders would top $1 billion.  The lower court had offered to let Du Pont to keep the stock but transfer its voting rights.  The Supreme Court rejected that out of hand.  Justice William Brennan, writing for the majority, said the public "is entitled to the surer, cleaner remedy of divestiture."  In his dissent, Justice Felix Frankfurter agreed that making Du Pont give up the stock would "work great and unjustifiable loss on wholly innocent investors."  The majority, he added, was entering "Alice's Wonderland where proof is unnecessary and the governing rule is 'sentence first, verdict after.'"  Congress heeded Greenewalt's plea.  Du Pont had to get rid ot its stock -- and in three, not 10, years -- but the lawmakers decreed that the shareholders would pay taxes only at the then-lower capital gains rate.  Marvin Schildkraut, 46 years old, resigned as president and chief executive officer of this real estate investment trust, effective Sept. 30, to pursue other interests.  Robert E. Shapiro, chairman, will assume the post of president on an interim basis.  Lynn K. Vorbrich, 50-year-old former executive vice president of Iowa Power, a unit of this holding company, was named president and chief operating officer of the unit.  As president, he succeeds Mark W. Putney, who continues as chairman and chief executive officer.  The post of chief operating officer is new.  Mr. Vorbrich was also elected a director of the parent company, succeeding Dwight H. Swanson, who retired.  INTERVOICE Inc., Richardson, Texas, said it registered with the Securities and Exchange Commission to offer 1.3 million shares of common stock for sale.  The maker of telephone call automation equipment said the proceeds will be used for general corporate purposes and for the acquisition of new manufacturing and office facilities.  William K. Woodruff & Co. is the lead manager of the offering.  Each day there are assassinations, bomb blasts, corpses in the rivers, tension in the air, and on the famed beaches more corpses.  And on the tour buses, there are befuddled tourists from Japan.  In the casinos, the Hong Kong Chinese and Malaysians are testing their luck.  On the beaches, British tourists are nervously looking behind them.  The Italians merely shrug.  "Still they're here," marveled P.C.S. Fernando, chairman of the Ceylon Tourism Board.  "Even at the risk of their lives]"  Sri Lanka is unstable, violent and steadily deteriorating.  Yet somehow, the tourism business survives.  It's nothing like the industry's heyday of the early 1980s.  But just nine months ago, tourists were expelled from the country for their own safety.  Since then, Sri Lanka's plight has worsened, but the tourists are back.  "There are 1,500 foreign tourists in the country today," said Mr. Fernando.  "The whole thing is so extraordinary.  Instead of 'Treasure Island,' as we advertise Sri Lanka, we might start calling ourselves 'Terror Island.'"  Sri Lanka's diminished but enduring popularity is relevant to all countries that value the tourism business, but, on occasion, find it jeopardized by revolutions, coups or hotel fires.  Its lessons are several.  One is that tourists and tour operators have short memories, especially when the incidents they're forgetting don't involve tourists.  In six years of turmoil in Sri Lanka, only four tourists have been killed -- all in a bomb blast on an Air Lanka plane. (An American tourist was reported missing in March.  News reports said she may have been kidnapped.)  Marketing also counts.  Sri Lanka is now targeting the wanderlustful yuppies in Hong Kong, Thailand, Malaysia and Singapore.  But the bottom line is the bottom line.  A five-star hotel room in Sri Lanka is one of the world's best bargains at as little as $8 a night.  Tourists love the cut-rate luxury.  And tour operators can earn higher margins than in safer spots.  When the bargain is that good, even the worst publicity on ethnic massacres, curfews and government death squads seems unable to kill demand.  Tourism in the island country took off only in the 1970s.  For a decade, the industry grew impressively, peaking in 1982 when 407,000 foreigners came to visit and spent $10 million.  The following year, communal riots set large swatches of the country ablaze.  Tourists began avoiding the country.  The communal violence subsided and, as the tourists straggled back, the industry prayed the country would calm.  Instead, things got worse.  Ethnic discord continued, and in 1987, all-out war loomed between the country's two major ethnic groups.  Indian troops were flown in.  They now occupy a third of Sri Lanka.  Separately, a leftist anarchist group arose to try and topple the government through strikes and assassinations.  Government death squads are hitting back with large-scale arrests and killings.  They leave bodies on the roads and beaches and in the rivers as a warning to other leftists.  In November, when the leftist group nearly toppled the government, all tourists were asked to leave for their own safety -- a decision deemed alarmist by both hoteliers and impartial observers.  Monthly arrivals in December slumped to the lowest level since 1972, and arrivals for all of 1988 lingered at 183,000.  But after relatively peaceful presidential elections in December and parliamentary elections in February, the business began to pick up, despite a rise in bloody incidents and alarming news dispatches.  Leading the way were the Italians.  Then, in March, Mr. Fernando took over the tourism board and looked east.  He sent marketing teams to East Asia, hoping for long-term growth and an immediate spurt in arrival figures.  The tactic seems to be working.  The number of tourists from Japan is up 10%, and the number of visitors from other Asian countries, excluding India, is up 50.5%.  Arrivals for the first six months, at 78,030, were lower than a year earlier, a result of the ripple effect of the November expulsion.  Although the biggest dangers to most tourists are the sun or the local curries, it isn't exactly business as usual in Sri Lanka.  Murders frequently occur on the road to the country's southern beach resorts, and tour guides have become adept at shielding their charges from the sight of smoking or water-logged corpses.  The tourism board has a 24-hour hotline, so tour agents can learn which roads have turned hazardous.  And curfews are increasingly common.  For 24 or 48 hours at a time, tourists are confined to their hotels.  And although hotels and tour operators are surviving, Mr. Fernando said, "We want to get back to those 1982 arrival figures.  And there's no real hope of that until there's peace in this country."  Wholesale changes in the thrift regulatory structure and the creation of a new agency to fund the bailout of insolvent thrift institutions have created uncertainty about the timing of future debt offerings from Financing Corp.  FICO, as Financing Corp. is known, was the original agency created to help fund the closing of sick thrifts.  It was formed in 1987 to recapitalize the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corp. and given authority to issue nearly $11 billion of debt over three years.  In its first two years, FICO issued $7.5 billion of 30-year bonds, and it has authority to sell $3.33 billion more of 30-year debt in the next 12 months.  Some analysts say that while the timing of future FICO sales is unclear, they expect the agency to sell a full complement of debt during its final year.  "We expect they will exercise their authority and continue to issue debt until they reach their limit," says Greg Parseghian, managing director and a top bond analyst at First Boston Corp.  On Tuesday, FICO said it wouldn't offer debt this week, as was tentatively scheduled.  But unlike the Treasury, which issues debt on a regular schedule, FICO doesn't have to sell debt at tentatively scheduled times and its decision to pass up potential debt sales don't necessarily carry any sigificance.  The next regularly slated announcement date is Sept. 18.  "A brand new directorate was just appointed today, and no decisions have been made yet" about the agency's future financing schedule, a FICO official said Tuesday.  Terms expired for two of the agency's three directors on Monday.  The FICO official said he doesn't know whether FICO will sell debt before Resolution Funding Corp. is able to issue bonds, which is set for Oct. 1.  Resolution Funding was given authority under the thrift bailout bill to issue $30 billion during a two-year period.  Some market participants think Resolution Funding will start selling 30-year bonds as soon as it can.  NL Industries Inc. said it completed the previously announced sale of its NL Spencer Kellogg unit to Reichhold Chemicals Inc. of White Plains, N.Y., a unit of D.I.C. Corp. of Tokyo, for $86 million.  The specialty chemicals company said it expects to realize a pretax gain of about $23 million on the sale.  Graphic Technology Inc., a maker of vinyl bar-code shelf labels, said it agreed in principle to be acquired by a foreign corporation for $18.50 a share, or about $53.3 million, but declined to identify the purchaser.  In American Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Graphic Technology shares closed at $17.375, up $1.875.  The company has 2,882,000 shares outstanding.  The agreement is subject to various conditions, including approval by both companies' boards, a definitive agreement, and required regulatory approvals.  AS Norske Shell, a unit of Royal/Dutch Shell Group, awarded a 1.7 billion kroner ($238.9 million) contract to Norwegian Contractors AS for construction of a concrete platform base for its Draugen offshore oil field.  Shell said that this was the largest contract it has awarded in Norway and that Draugen will be the first field operating in the Haltenbanken region, about 62 miles off Norway's coast.  Norwegian Contractors will begin engineering in October, construction in June 1990 and installation of the 940 1/2-foot-tall base at the field in May 1993.  Draugen, in offshore block 6407/9, is expected to cost a total of 10.8 billion kroner to develop.  Storage cells in the base will hold a week's oil production, averaging 90,000 barrels a day.  Draugen has recoverable reserves of 428 million barrels, in addition to natural gas.  Shell, with a 21% interest, operates Draugen for its partners, the Norwegian state oil company Statoil AS, with a 65% stake, and BP Petroleum Development of Norway AS, 14%.  When Anthony Dell'Aquila began investing in the New Jersey waterfront more than 10 years ago, the region seemed brimming with potential.  By 1987 Mr. Dell'Aquila, a lingerie manufacturer with limited real estate experience, had amassed about 90 acres of Hudson River property on the so-called Gold Coast in Hoboken, N.J., just across from midtown Manhattan.  But the investment turned out to be anything but golden.  Mr. Dell'Aquila's property is now the subject of one of the largest foreclosure proceedings ever in Hudson County.  Mr. Dell'Aquila owes $19.3 million, including interest and penalties, says Mabon Nugent Money Markets Instruments & Co. Another lender, Citizens First National Bank of New Jersey, brought a foreclosure action seeking about $12 million.  A new buyer has contracted to purchase the site, but local real estate experts see any project there as a high-stakes gamble because of a slowdown in the region's real estate market and general economic conditions.  Strict environmental regulations and no-growth initiatives also complicate the development process.  In New Jersey today, says Ben Ferrara, director of the New Jersey Division of Economic Development, "Anyone who doesn't have deep pockets, and has made a commitment to buy land for some future development, may be holding the property for longer than he anticipated and could run into problems."  Or, as developer Richard LeFrak put it, "Vacant land is a cow that eats and gives no milk."  Mr. Dell'Aquila's strategy was to build office space and apartments on the site, but he was unable to get several proposed projects started.  Dissolved partnership agreements with other developers also resulted in a stack of lawsuits.  Mr. Dell'Aquila faced additional problems from the state, which intervened when he knocked down buildings, allegedly without proper approvals.  Mr. Dell'Aquila and a former partner are battling over who was responsible.  Observers say Mr. Dell'Aquila's problems are an example of those confronting investors with little development expertise who are blinded by the glitter of real estate in a booming market and are unprepared for the down cycle.  The region's problems are compounded by speculation, says Gene Heller, president of Hartz Mountain Industries, a Secaucus, N.J., developer active on the waterfront.  "The success of a few developers in New Jersey makes the land next to those successes very desirable, but if the owner doesn't have ability to develop the property it doesn't serve the area economically."  Environmental requirements in New Jersey have also daunted some smaller players, according to Mr. LeFrak, president of the Lefrak Organization, developer of the Newport City office, retail and residential complex in Jersey City.  "The permitting process and environmental requirements are arduous and expensive and could take years," he says.  "You can't just buy land and jump in."  People who have little experience and capital get stuck, he says.  They also must cope with strong no-growth sentiments in Hoboken.  David C. Walentas, a New York real estate developer, says he has a contract to buy Mr. Dell'Aquila's property and people familiar with the negotiations say the price is about $50 million.  It couldn't be determined how much Mr. Dell'Aquila has spent on the property, including the purchase price and carrying costs.  Mr. Dell'Aquila couldn't be reached for comment and his attorneys declined to discuss the costs.  But one of his attorneys, Paul DeFilippo, said, "We do not anticipate this property will be sold in a foreclosure sale in 1989."  He also said Mr. Dell'Aquila would retain a stake in the property if it was sold and developed.  People in the industry say Mr. Walentas, developer of the Fulton Landing waterfront project in Brooklyn and luxury apartments in Manhattan, is trying to raise money for the acquisition.  Meanwhile, the Hudson County's Sheriff's office has postponed until late September an auction for about half of the land.  The sale had been scheduled for earlier this week.  If Mr. Walentas does purchase the land, he says he plans a residential development in keeping with the realities of high office vacancy rates along the riverfront.  "Most of the Jersey waterfront is unsuitable for upscale residential building," says Mr. Walentas, president of Two Trees Development Co. in New York.  "But Hoboken is a great little town, right on the water and it has really been gentrified."  Others are less sanguine.  Mr. Heller says Hartz Mountain seriously considered the Hoboken site.  A residential project would be "a fine addition to the Gold Coast," he says, "It should only happen."  However, Mr. Heller adds, "It's a difficult proposition today.  There is competition, deflation of property values and foreclosures, other properties are in workouts (financial restructurings).  When times are good it's easy to get into real estate, but today it's not so easy."  He is ridiculed, attacked, maligned.  Yet he survives.  Such is the political life of Helmut Kohl.  But the question now is can he prevail in next year's national elections.  The answer is maybe.  But in the aftermath of his latest political dispute, one thing is clear: it would be a mistake to write off the West Germany chancellor.  Mr. Kohl once again proved this week that while he may lack panache, he understands power politics and, above all, has a keen instinct for enduring.  For months the chancellor's detractors have been predicting his imminent demise.  And much of the rumor-mongering emanated from his own party headquarters.  So last week, Mr. Kohl, tanned and back from a three-week holiday by an Austrian lake, sacked the chief source of those rumors, party manager Heiner Geissler.  It was an unceremonious end and Mr. Geissler probably deserved better.  But Mr. Kohl reckoned rightly that the furor would ultimately die down and that he might help himself in the process.  Last Monday, party leaders convened for a nine-hour meeting amid suggestions that a rival candidate might challenge the chancellor's position as chairman of the Christian Democratic Union.  Mr. Kohl received a lot of criticism in that meeting.  But, in the end, no rival candidate emerged.  "The chancellor in effect said, 'Put up or shut up,'" says Wolfgang Gibowski, an independent pollster at the Election Research Group in Mannheim.  The flap over Mr. Geissler's dismissal, Mr. Gibowski adds, has "strengthened the chancellor.  He demonstrated that he is in control."  Of course, Mr. Kohl isn't out of danger yet.  He faces a crucial test at the Christian Democratic Union convention that opens in Bremen Sept. 10.  Although it now seems virtually certain that Mr. Kohl will run unopposed for re-election as party chairman, delegates could seek to embarrass him by rejecting his hand-picked successor to Mr. Geissler, foreign affairs specialist Volker Ruehe.  They also could reject the chancellor himself.  If they don't, however, Mr. Kohl will emerge from the party convention in significantly better shape for next year's campaign.  One reason is the ejection of Mr. Geissler.  Mr. Kohl's aides say that the chief reason he got the boot was because the chancellor didn't trust him anymore.  But questions about Mr. Geissler's loyalty ignore another good reason for his removal: Mr. Geissler was the party's chief strategist, and his strategies weren't working.  Mr. Geissler's chief pursuit was trying to scoop up voters with his ideological viewpoint, namely those on the moderate left.  But that isn't where the next election is expected to be won or lost.  The right wing is the problem, and Mr. Geissler seemed both unwilling and unable to counter the stunning rise of the far-right Republicans, who have recently scored heavily at the polls.  By removing Mr. Geissler and replacing him with Mr. Ruehe, the chancellor took a calculated risk: he was willing to alienate the moderate left of the party in the hope that the conservative right may be placated.  That strategy may have promise.  Mr. Ruehe is said to have excellent relations with Theo Waigel, chairman of the Christian Democratic Union's Bavarian sister party, who disliked Mr. Geissler.  The conservatives also seem quite satisfied with the policy changes that have come about since Mr. Kohl's electoral troubles first surfaced last spring {indeed, there have been unsubstantiated suggestions that Mr. Waigel conditioned his acceptance of the finance ministry portfolio last April on Mr. Geissler's dismissal}.  Whether better relations between Mr. Kohl and mainstream conservatives will ultimately translate into more votes for the Christian Democratic Union is the critical question.  For Mr. Kohl's party to be returned to power in December 1990, the party must defeat the Republicans and keep them out of parliament.  Aides to Mr. Kohl say he wants to conduct the main part of the election campaign from the chancellor's office rather than from party headquarters.  Either way, the confrontation with the far-right is certain to fully test Mr. Kohl's instincts for survival.  In this insurer's law department, William J Bosies Jr., vice president, government relations, was named vice president and general counsel, and Michael H. Sims, senior counsel, was named to newly-created position of vice president and deputy general counsel.  For years, most foreign companies seized on any breakthrough in the Chinese market as reason for a public relations campaign.  But as business regains a semblance of normality in the wake of the Tiananmen massacre, traders and joint-venture managers alike are shunning the spotlight.  Although many businessmen insist their presence here helps to keep China's more liberal, Western-oriented policies intact, they are deeply concerned about becoming enmeshed in damaging political controversy.  In China, they fear being used by the government for propaganda purposes or angering the authorities with criticism.  Back home, where they were once praised for their ties to China, they worry about being attacked as opportunists for doing business with a discredited dictatorship.  U.S. businesses are painfully aware that the U.S. Congress, currently in its summer recess, is still considering a range of proposed sanctions against China.  "To multinationals, one of the more vexing consequences of Tiananmen has been the return of China business to the political realm from the purely commercial," says Scott D. Seligman, a vice president of Burson-Marsteller China Ltd.  "More than a decade of hard work to normalize business relations seems to have been undone overnight."  Foreigners' business here has slowly regained momentum in the weeks since the Chinese government cracked down on the pro-democracy movement and many business executives, diplomats, tourists and other foreigners fled the country.  Most company representative offices in Beijing and Shanghai are staffed again.  Import and export contracts are being signed at a quickening pace.  And joint ventures are operating as smoothly as possible given government economic policies that are squeezing all enterprises hard.  The difference is that people don't want to discuss what they're doing.  Many are under orders to refer all queries to head offices in the U.S., Europe or Japan.  The traders especially are keeping their heads down because some began doing deals again within days of Tiananmen.  Foreign lawyers, consultants and company representatives say it is almost standard procedure now to insist in contract negotiations that Chinese television crews be barred from signing ceremonies.  Many businessmen justify their low profile by citing Matsushita Electric Industrial Co.'s experience in the weeks after Tiananmen.  When the Beijing crackdown occurred, the Japanese consumer-products giant was putting the finishing touches on a color-television picture tube plant on the outskirts of town.  Matsushita chose to keep a handful of Japanese technicians on site while most foreigners were evacuated, and the Chinese media made some embarrassing propaganda of that decision.  As a result, the company faced heavy criticism in Japan.  A company spokesman in Osaka said the factory's opening ceremony has been indefinitely postponed.  Russel W. Duvall, general manager of DRV Communications Co., which produces paging devices, was another of the handful of joint-venture managers who chose not to leave Beijing.  His company, affiliated with Reach Electronics Inc. of Lexington, Neb., is in an area of the city that was relatively unaffected by the violence, and he decided to stick it out.  Officials at a Chinese ministry later asked to meet him at their offices to thank him.  His response: "No TV. No reporters."  Joint ventures are in a particularly awkward position because they have committed years of effort and often large sums of money to China -- and sometimes have received considerable positive publicity back home.  June's events completely altered the political landscape.  Says one Shanghai-based executive, "Our parent company's taken some heat at home from the media" for having a Chinese factory.  Many foreign companies were complaining openly about the situation earlier this year.  But often the same people won't even meet with reporters now for fear of angering the authorities.  Some believe that despite Chinese assurances that the open door won't close, once-firm policies may hang in the balance.  For all the corporate reticence, there are still those who don't show fear.  Late last month, for example, Dallas real estate developer Trammell Crow and his son, Trammell Crow Jr., visited Shanghai and signed a letter of intent to conduct a feasibility study for the construction of a trade exhibition center.  From there they traveled to Beijing to meet with Jiang Zemin, who had recently been promoted from Shanghai to Communist Party general-secretary.  The Chinese print and broadcast media made considerable hay of the event, widely quoting Mr. Jiang's statement that "it's a fine Chinese tradition not to forget old friends."  The senior Mr. Crow expressed no concern about the propaganda benefits for China, saying the meeting was simply a "casual, personal visit" with an official his family has known in the past.  Europe's major steelmakers, profitable again after years of painful restructuring and huge layoffs, have little hope of regaining full access to the U.S. market soon.  Today in Washington, the European Community will begin the latest round of talks on the extension of an agreement restricting EC steel exports to the U.S.  The EC is likely to win few concessions.  "Little will come of these negotiations," says a spokesman for Arbed S.A., the Luxembourg-based steel company.  Adds Peter Dupont, steel industry analyst with UBS Phillips & Drew in London: "I see the extension of the U.S. quotas somewhat as a fait accompli."  The issue of steel imports remains politically charged in the U.S. Despite opposition to quotas from steel consumers and fears of being branded a protectionist, President Bush during his election campaign last year promised to extend the quotas -- officially called voluntary restraint agreements.  European and U.S. steelmakers have benefited from strong economic growth and firmer steel prices during the past two years, helping speed the industry's recovery.  But the industry is a cyclical one, and it remains vulnerable to an economic slowdown.  Some analysts see a softening of the steel market next year.  Already, the U.S. industry has been posting weaker profits in recent quarters.  Fears of an economic slowdown further fuel U.S. steelmakers' resistance to low-cost competition from abroad.  U.S. officials concede that some EC governments, under pressure from the EC Commission, have stopped subsidizing their steel industries.  But U.S. steelmakers say past subsidies still give some European producers an unfair advantage.  "It takes several years for the advantages {of subsidies} to flow through the system," contends Kempton E. Jenkins, corporate vice president for international and governmental affairs at U.S. steelmaker Armco Inc.  British Steel PLC, for example, "still benefits from having several billion dollars of debt assumed by the British government" before the company was privatized last year, Mr. Jenkins says.  "The taxpayers of England took over their debt.  We'd like to be able to do the same thing."  British Steel declines to comment.  One possible target for U.S. trade complaints is Finsider S.p.A., the Italian state-owned steel company currently being restructured with the help of 5.1 trillion lire ($3.6 billion) in government subsidies.  "The legal work has already been done" for the filing of trade actions against Finsider, says Mr. Jenkins.  The Bush administration has signaled that it would increase the import quota for EC steelmakers slightly from its current 5% of the total U.S. market.  At the same time, however, it intends to extend the five-year-old voluntary restraint agreement, due to expire Sept. 30, for another 2 1/2 years.  Agreements are being renegotiated with other steel exporting countries, including Japan, South Korea and Brazil.  Talks between the U.S. and Japan were held this week and are scheduled to resume later this month.  Analysts and industry sources say an extension of the U.S. quotas would have the greatest effect on smaller specialized producers.  "European steelmakers are producing essentially for European use, but the Europeans are losing some markets, in particular for specialty steel products" because of the U.S. quotas, says Paul Vercruysse, industry analyst with Banque Bruxelles Lambert in Brussels.  The community's share of the U.S. steel market has tumbled from 8% before the quotas were imposed in 1984, according to the EC. Last year, the 12-nation trading bloc exported about 5.4 million metric tons of steel products to the U.S., for a total value of #1.65 billion ($2.6 billion), according to the U.K. Iron and Steel Statistics Bureau.  U.S. shipments to the EC totaled only about 232,000 tons valued at #132 million.  Neither side expects a trade war over the steel problem.  But the issue is a potential source of friction.  U.S. steelmakers fear that if a global recession develops, European producers will try to sell excess production in the U.S. market at low prices.  "The problem has not been solved.  The capacity overhang is still there," says Mr. Jenkins.  Another problem besetting U.S. steelmakers is high labor costs, as steelworkers have recently won steep wage increases.  Labor costs in the U.S. steel industry are running at about $25 to $30 an hour, compared with $20 an hour in northern Europe and $14 an hour in Britain, according to Mr. Dupont.  But for all their newfound competitiveness, European steel producers have little choice as the Sept. 30 deadline nears for the renewal of the "voluntary" quotas.  "If there is no agreement, U.S. producers will just sue the hell out of them with unfair trading actions," says Mr. Dupont.  Golden Nugget Finance Corp., a subsidiary of Golden Nugget Inc., called for redemption on Sept. 25 of all $3 million outstanding of its 8 3/8% notes due July 1, 1993, at a price of $1,019.54 per $1,000 principal amount of notes.  The redemption price represents 100% of the principal amount plus accrued interest to the redemption date of $19.54.  Trustee for the notes is National Westminster Bank N.J., Jersey City, N.J., Golden Nugget said.  The Philippine merchandise-trade gap reached $1.17 billion in the first half, widening $626 million, or 115%, from $545 million a year earlier.  This year's first-half trade deficit has surpassed the $1.09 billion gap for all of 1988.  A membership on the New York Cotton Exchange sold yesterday for $65,000, up from $63,000 at the last sale on Aug. 14, and up from $48,000 at a sale Aug. 12, 1988.  Currently, the bid price for seats is $64,000 and the offering price $75,000, an exchange spokeswoman said.  The physiques of flight attendants won't be on the pre-flight checklist anymore at Pan American World Airways.  "We had to do pirouettes in front of supervisors, frequently males, so they could inspect our chins, legs and ankles," says Margaret Brennan, president of the Independent Union of Flight Attendants.  "It was a nightmare."  But New York-based Pan Am Corp. agreed yesterday to end its periodic appearance inspections of flight attendants to settle a discrimination lawsuit pending in the federal appeals court in San Francisco.  A federal district court judge ruled in 1987 that Pan Am was discriminating against flight attendants by being too strict on how much it allows them to weigh.  The settlement loosens the belt on the weight policy, ends the appearance checks and obligates Pan Am to pay as much as $2.8 million to flight attendants who have been fired or suspended because of their weight.  The payment includes $400,000 in legal fees for the 5,100 member union.  No more will Pan Am flight attendants have to suffer the checklist's dreaded category of "disproportionate weight or flabbiness."  The list also included: Thighs/Hips; Chin; Figure/Physique; and Legs/Ankles.  Although male flight attendants were inspected too, "for them, ankles and legs didn't matter," insists Ms. Brennan.  She said women were required to wear skirts for the inspections.  But Pan Am's male attendants can also ease up on their stationary bikes as a result of the settlement.  For example, a male six feet tall who's categorized as having a small frame may now tip the scales at 180 pounds, compared with 162 under the old rules.  A six-foot-tall female Pan Am attendant in the small/medium frame category may now weigh 172 pounds, compared with 156 previously.  The weights are measured with the attendants in uniform, without jackets or shoes.  The Pan Am agreement may help settle another battle of bulge being fought by American Airlines with its 16,000 member flight attendants union in Fort Worth, Texas, federal court.  The flight attendants at the AMR Corp. unit want their airline's weight standards liberalized.  For example, a five-foot, five-inch tall American female attendant can weigh no more than 120 pounds, a union spokeswoman said.  At Pan Am, under the new agreement, the same size woman could weigh 151 pounds.  But an American spokeswoman sniffed that her company's standards "are part of our general appearance policy."  Flight attendants argue that pilots, who don't have weight restrictions at American or at most airlines, are on public view before and after flights.  "They just want the flight attendants slim and trim to fit a stereotype," says Kathy King, an attorney representing both the American and Pan Am flight attendants.  The Pan Am attendants union's Ms. Brennan says that letting attendants be bigger is "a teeny-weeny step away from sexual stereotypes, and that's good."  Sir James Goldsmith said his attempt to acquire B.A.T Industries PLC would fail unless Britain's Takeover Panel extended the timetable for the #13.4 billion ($21.1 billion) hostile bid.  In an interview, Sir James asserted that the extension was needed because of delaying tactics by several U.S. state insurance regulators.  "I am outraged that the regulatory process can be manipulated so," he said.  As reported, Sir James's bidding vehicle, Hoylake Investments Ltd., last week in a confidential filing asked the Takeover Panel for an extension of the timetable.  But his statements yesterday mark the first time that he went on record as saying that Hoylake couldn't win without the extension.  Sir James's remarks hammered down the price of B.A.T shares, which had risen by about one-third since the Hoylake bid was unveiled in mid-July.  In late trading yesterday on London's stock exchange, B.A.T shares were off 14 pence (22 cents) from Wednesday's close of 837 pence ($13.16).  The panel's staff is expected to rule on the request next week.  However, the decision can be appealed to the full panel.  Under United Kingdom takeover rules, Hoylake's bid for the conglomerate would lapse Oct. 7 -- 60 days after the bid was filed -- if Hoylake hasn't satisfied all conditions of the bid, including regulatory clearance in the U.S.  Asked to comment on Sir James's prediction of possible failure, a B.A.T spokesman replied: "He's being a realist."  For Hoylake, the major hang-up has been insurance commissioners in nine states, who must approve any change of ownership in B.A.T's Farmers Group Inc., the 15th largest insurer in the U.S.  Some commissioners have expressed concern that policyholders could be jeopardized by the highly leveraged nature of Hoylake's all-paper bid for B.A.T.  Sir James said the leverage issue is "a red herring" because Hoylake has agreed with Axa Midi Assurances for the major French insurer to buy Farmers for $4.5 billion, half in cash, if Hoylake wins control of B.A.T.  He said the arrangement makes it unnecessary for Hoylake to change its bid to include cash, just to please the insurance commissioners.  "It would make strictly no difference if we offered diamonds, cash, gold or anything you like," Sir James said.  However, the introduction of Axa Midi apparently will further lengthen the regulatory process because the French insurer has yet to file its prospective change-of-ownership applications in the nine states.  It is expected to do so soon.  Also complicating Hoylake's problems in the U.S. are nine lawsuits it filed in federal courts seeking, on constitutional grounds, to take the regulatory decisions out of the commissioners' hands.  The suits, all of which are pending, could take months to wend their ways through the appeals process.  Sir James said Hoylake would drop the suits if the insurance regulators gave a clear idea of when they would come to a decision.  "We are keen to get rid of the federal cases," he said.  Asked whether the suits, which named the insurance commissioners as defendants, were a tactical mistake, in that they attempted to undercut the very people Hoylake was trying to win over, Sir James replied: "We wish to be as conciliatory as possible, but we have to use all the weapons and laws which your Constitution allows."  Sir James conceded that he was surprised at the regulatory skepticism and political opposition in the U.S. to the Hoylake bid.  "I never dreamed it would be like that," he said.  Brazil's cost of living rose 29.3% in August, the highest rate in four years, the government said.  August's inflation, the highest monthly increase of the year, rose slightly from July's rate of 28.8%, according to the Brazilian Geography and Statistics Institute.  The accumulated rate since January reached 359%.  Inflation for the last 12 months totaled 1,084%, the institute said.  Healthcare costs pushed up the cost of living more than any other item, jumping 39.1% for the month.  Home articles climbed 37.8% and transportation and communication rose 34.8%, the institute said.  The Ontario government said it will allow the provincially owned electric utility to sell tritium, but restrictions on those sales won't alleviate the U.S. shortage of the radioactive isotope, which is used in nuclear warheads.  After a six-month study, the provincial government decided to permit Ontario Hydro to sell tritium for use by makers of tritium lights and by medical researchers for government-sponsored nuclear fusion research.  But the tritium can't be sold for use in nuclear weapons projects or to research facilities such as Los Alamos, N.M., where weapons research is also under way, according to existing federal guidelines and the new provincial policy.  Thomas Drolet, group manager of international business operations for Ontario Hydro, said that although Los Alamos and three other U.S. research institutes have expressed interest in buying Ontario Hydro tritium, "they don't seem likely to ever qualify" under the guidelines.  To date, the only North American source of tritium has been the U.S. Energy Department's Savannah River plant in South Carolina.  Production there was halted last year when the plant closed for safety reasons.  The U.S. nuclear weapons program and commercial users must rely on the department's diminishing stockpile of tritium.  Tritium, a radioactive form of hydrogen produced as an unwanted byproduct in Canadian-designed nuclear reactors, is used for emergency lighting, such as hotel exit signs, that need to operate without electricity.  It is also used in research into hypertension and heart disease.  Mr. Drolet said four fusion projects have expressed "a strong interest" in purchasing tritium from Ontario.  A medical research unit of Du Pont Co., Boston-based New England Nuclear, has also contacted Ontario Hydro, he said, and the utility expects to supply some of the eight companies manufacturing tritium lighting.  Within a decade, Ontario Hydro said, it could earn 100 million Canadian dollars (US$85.1 million) from tritium sales annually.  Initial claims for regular state unemployment benefits fell to a seasonally adjusted 316,000 in the week ended Aug. 19 from 323,000 the previous week.  The number of people receiving regular state benefits in the week ended Aug. 12 fell to a seasonally adjusted 2,179,000, or 2.1% of those covered by unemployment insurance, from a revised 2,204,000 the previous week, when the insured unemployment rate was 2.2%.  Counting all state and federal benefit programs, the number of people receiving unemployment benefits fell to 2,072,900 in the week ended Aug. 12 from a revised 2,130,900 a week earlier.  These figures aren't adjusted for seasonal changes.  Grand Metropolitan PLC's Pillsbury Co. unit said it agreed definitively to sell its Venezuelan flour-milling and pasta subsidiary to closely held Cargill Inc.  Pillsbury, a food concern acquired by Grand Met earlier this year, also said that separate agreements with local investors have been reached covering the sale of Pillsbury's consumer products subsidiary in Guatemala and its minority flour-milling holding in El Salvador.  Terms weren't disclosed, nor were revenues of the operations to be sold.  Audio/Video Affiliates Inc. said it completed the previously announced sale of its 76 retail buildings to an affiliate of Shidler Group for $59 million.  The seller of home entertainment and consumer electronic products said it leased back the sold properties from Shidler/West Finance Partners I, a limited partnership formed to acquire the property.  Proceeds from the sale will be used to pay existing mortgage and debt, among others, the company said.  Reporters don't keep their newsrooms spiffy clean, but one group has devised a plan to keep the journalists' quarters tidy, maybe even empty, at its coming conference.  To cut down on press release litter, the American Society of Travel Agents is charging non-news types (read: public relations people) between $750 and $3,000 for the right to distribute press releases around the press room.  "I don't think the right to disseminate news should be based on your ability to pay," complains Morris Silver, who has his own New York public relations firm that will represent various companies, countries and municipalities at the Miami show this year.  "They are going to jeopardize the efficiency of the media and membership in an industry that I think is the largest in the U.S.," adds Aaron D. Cushman, president of his own Chicago-based PR firm.  "I would certainly recommend (a client) not using this.  I think it's contrary to the free press concept."  About 800 exhibitors will already cough up as much as $1,200 for a booth and the 6,000 attendees will pay up to $450 to attend the seven-day October conference, which attracts marketers from travel-related businesses and resort destinations.  At past gatherings, organizers say, piles of bulky press kits were dumped in the laps of reporters, hindering their efforts to cover the meeting.  "That was a key issue.  We didn't want the place flooded with press releases," says Hal Herman, chairman of the press committee for the convention.  "PR people shouldn't be in the press room, anyway."  A "press room sponsorship," as the charge is called, affords an attendee "permission for," among other things, "press kits or press releases to be distributed in the press room," an ASTA letter to public relations companies explains.  But ASTA says sponsors won't actually be able to enter the press room, just leave kits outside on a table.  A spokesman for ASTA said officials are "reviewing" the sponsorship plan after recent inquiries the group has received.  At no extra cost in past years, "there was always a place to leave press releases," says Mr. Silver.  "This is a way to earn some extra bucks and make the PR people pay for it."  He acknowledges that any costs will be passed on to clients.  In addition to the press release privileges, sponsors are invited to ASTA's first-ever press party, afforded "recognition at the press party," a listing in the party program and permitted to run videotapes in the press room lounge.  "The press is everywhere," adds Mr. Herman.  "Any PR firm at the ASTA convention shouldn't have any problem accessing the press.  It in no way impedes free access."  The sponsorships, which are limited in number, are just "icing on the cake" of possibility for press coverage, he says.  ASTA's Mr. Herman, who also publishes a magazine for travel agents called Recommend, adds: "I have to compete with Rupert Murdoch and a few other people.  I would love to have the dollars that Dun & Bradstreet and Capital Cities/ABC have.  That's the free enterprise system."  Stuart Newman, who owns a public relations firm bearing his name in Miami and doesn't think the press room fees impede access to the press, hasn't forgotten what reporters get paid to do.  With or without a press room, he says, "generally the more conscientious travel reporters make the rounds at the exhibits" looking for news.  Gantos Inc. reported sales of $16.4 million for the four-week period ended Saturday, a 45% increase from sales of $11.3 million in the year-earlier period.  Comparable-store sales rose 19%.  The women's apparel retailer said August sales included the company's semiannual boutique-clearance sale.  Traditionally, Gantos holds this sale in July.  Sales of $120.3 million for the 30 weeks ended Saturday rose 46% from $82.3 million a year ago.  Comparable-store sales for the year-to-date period rose 15%.  Setting ground rules for the personal behavior of heterosexual politicians in an age when almost nothing escapes examination is difficult enough.  For homosexual politicians, more and more of whom are openly declaring their sexual preference, it's a bewildering challenge.  "We are constantly battling a hostile environment that doesn't support our life style," says Tammy Baldwin, a member of the Dane County, Wis., Board of Supervisors.  "All of society, even our own parents, is constantly trying to destabilize our relationships."  Miss Baldwin is one of 46 members of the National Conference of Openly Lesbian and Gay Elected and Appointed Officials, a growing organization that hopes to shorten its name when it holds its fifth annual meeting in November in Madison, the major city in Dane County.  The organization's best-known member is U.S. Rep. Barney Frank, the Massachusetts Democrat.  Following reports in the Washington Times, he admitted last week he paid for sex with a prostitute and then hired the man as his personal aide.  He faces a House ethics investigation.  "Poor Barney," says Mayor Richard Heyman of Key West, Fla., who declared his homosexuality when he first ran for office a decade ago.  "What he did was very unfortunate."  Mr. Frank concedes he exercised "mistaken judgment" and says he regrets it.  He seeks the House investigation "to ensure that the public record is clear."  Mr. Frank's troubles are simply the latest in a long line of ethical peccadilloes -- financial and sexual, heterosexual and homosexual -- that have left politicians and their advisers searching for guidelines.  "We try to tell our candidates that there's almost nothing that can't be made public," says Mike McCurry, spokesman for the Democratic National Committee.  "Most candidates understand -- now, at last -- that these are new and uncharted waters, and they can get pretty frigid.  Everything now is so intensely personal.  Voters condemn the press for printing all this information at the same time they read every word of it voraciously."  Drawing the line is tricky business, but when it comes to heterosexual politicians, at least there are a few basics.  When Bob Kerrey was governor of Nebraska (he's a U.S. senator now), he entertained actress Debra Winger in the governor's mansion, and the voters appeared to be charmed.  Of course, he was single.  When Sen. Gary Hart, a married man, entertained part-time model Donna Rice in his Capitol Hill home and made the front pages in the process, voters rebelled and his presidential campaign collapsed.  Somehow, voters seem to be able to sort these situations out.  Mr. McCurry believes they have a kind of sixth sense in determining which situations reveal serious character flaws and which situations don't.  Mr. Hart crossed the line.  But setting basic guidelines for homosexual politicians is somewhat more complex.  "Gary Hart was an adulterer," says Miss Baldwin.  "He broke the rules.  But how do you relate those rules to gays and lesbians?  We don't have gay marriages."  "Our problem is we don't have equal rights," says Robert Bray, spokesman for the Human Rights Campaign Fund, the political action committee for homosexual politicians.  "We are expected to conform to a strict code of behavior set by heterosexuals, and we receive acute screening because our sexual orientation continues to be controversial."  Even so, some general observations -- if not rules -- are beginning to emerge.  The first step, say those who have taken it, is candor.  "From the start, I said, 'I'm gay,' and it quickly became a non-issue," says Mayor Heyman of Key West.  "It didn't haunt me any more."  "Life inside the closet is terrible," says Mr. Bray.  "You carry a huge secret and you make yourself vulnerable to intimidation and blackmail."  Rep. Frank, these officials point out, paid the prostitute for sex before he openly declared his homosexuality in 1987.  More recently, Mr. Frank has lived with Herbert Moses, an economist, who, the congressman told the Boston Globe, "has provided emotional and intellectual support that make a big difference -- the absence of which contributed to the extent to which I was stupid personally earlier."  "The great burden has been lifted," says Mr. Bray.  "And now Barney has been in a loving relationship, and it has made a big difference.  It will sustain him."  It is, of course, far easier to step out of the closet in communities with strong homosexual-support systems, such as Dane County, or Key West, or San Francisco.  Most of the members of the national organization for these officials come from such communities.  R. Richard Wagner, chairman of the Dane County Board of Supervisors, says the second step is simply setting an example.  "By dealing with county problems in a professional manner, we begin to change voters' stereotypes about gays and lesbians," he says.  And, says Mr. Wagner, it works.  "I'm optimistic.  It's getting better for gays and lesbians.  If you'd told me 10 years ago I'd be chair of the Board of Supervisors today, I wouldn't have believed you."  There is, perhaps, one final step -- discretion.  "We know there are predators out there, just looking to shoot us down," says Mayor Heyman.  "So you must always be very conscious of it.  You must be as careful and as discreet as you can possibly be.  That being said, you can be judged the same way as any other elected official -- no more, no less."  Along with discretion, these officials talk about stability.  "We want to lead a fuller, more dignified life," says Mr. Bray.  "We want to develop stable relationships."  At the annual meeting in Madison in November, homosexual officials will attend a workshop aimed at finding ways to improve partner relationships.  "We are all trying to find answers," says Miss Baldwin.  "Sometimes, though, it seems as if we're working in a laboratory that doesn't have any of the right equipment."  How Chris Whittle Faltered on the Issue of TV Ads in Schools," I found your comments "{He} is also building a $50 million faux-Ivy-League-campus-style corporate headquarters in a depressed section of Knoxville" to be misleading and untrue.  This section of town could hardly be described as "depressed."  The complex is surrounded by new buildings -- the city-county government building, two new bank and office buildings, several buildings that are listed in the National Register of Historic Places (including the newly renovated courthouse, built in the 1800s), and several churches that are noted for their architectural design.  A new federal office building is located approximately two blocks away from Chris Whittle's corporate offices, and many older office buildings have been renovated in the area.  We are proud of the progress being made in the downtown area of our growing and progressive city.  Dwight Kessel  Knox County executive  Knoxville, Tenn.  ---  Like other publications that have reported on the phenomenal success of Whittle Communications, your article claims that the success of our "puffy" publications rests on their "form, not content," and you strongly imply that we kowtow to advertisers.  Nothing could be further from the truth.  I'm editor of three Whittle publications.  At no time in the seven years I've been here have I worked on any publication that published advertorial information or articles that promoted advertisers' products or services.  Yes, Whittle publications do a great job fulfilling a marketing purpose.  But they also do a great job meeting readers' needs.  George Spencer  Group Editor  Whittle Communications  Knoxville, Tenn.  Acme Steel Co. and the United Steelworkers said they reached a tentative accord on a new three-year labor contract, effective Sept. 1.  The union said the agreement, which covers 1,700 employees at the Chicago and Riverdale, Ill., plants, calls for an across-the-board wage increase of $1.50 an hour over the term of the contract and provides an average of 22 cents an hour in wage restorations and increased benefits, among other provisions.  The agreement, which expires Sept. 1, 1992, is subject to ratification by the rank and file.  Farm prices in August slipped 1.4% from July as soybean prices plunged 90 cents a bushel in the steepest month-to-month dive in five years, the Agriculture Department reported.  Commodity analysts blamed the soybean collapse partly on the Chicago Board of Trade's July 11 order requiring Ferruzzi Finanziaria S.p.A. to liquidate its dominant position in the July soybean futures contract.  The Italian grain merchant's sell-off of more than 20 million bushels not only caused soybean futures prices to plunge but also drove down cash prices received by farmers, the analysts said.  The department's monthly report is likely to deepen farmer distrust of the futures market and intensify pressure on the Board of Trade and the Commodity Futures Trading Commission to further explain their actions last month to avert an apparent soybean squeeze.  Average soybean prices fell to $5.93 a bushel in August from $6.83 in July, according to the report.  "I hadn't realized the magnitude of it," said David Asbridge, an economist for the American Soybean Association.  Mr. Asbridge, for one, believes the price plunge was caused as much by timely rains in soybean-growing areas of the Midwest as by the CBOT order.  "Certain dry areas are just getting enough rain each week to avoid losing the crop," he said.  At the same time, the movement of Brazilian soybeans into the world market is also depressing U.S. soybean prices, according to Mr. Asbridge and other analysts.  Despite the slippage in farm prices last month, Agriculture Secretary Clayton Yeutter predicted a strong year for farmers, even with reduced yields in areas of drought and flood damage.  Agricultural exports are expected to reach $40 billion in 1989, the third highest on record, he said.  "Overall, it will be a good year for agriculture, with net farm income slightly below 1988 but overall still good," Mr. Yeutter said yesterday in a televised news conference.  In its report, the department said that feed grain prices also fell last month, though not as sharply as soybeans.  Corn prices averaged $2.29 a bushel, down 18 cents from July; oats averaged $1.38 a bushel, down 15 cents; and sorghum grain prices averaged $3.89 a hundred pounds, down 10 cents.  Bucking the trend was barley, which rose 15 cents last month to $2.30 a bushel.  Commercial vegetable prices, led by lettuce, fell 15% last month, while fruit prices rose 8.8%, mainly because of higher prices for apples, grapefruit and peaches, according to the report.  Hay prices averaged $82.80 a ton, down $2.60 from July.  Beef cattle prices averaged $69.60 per hundred pounds, up $1.60 from July, while calf prices averaged $94.50, down 20 cents, the department said.  On the hog market, barrow and gilt prices held steady at $47.40 per hundred pounds, unchanged from July.  Sow prices rose $1.50 last month to $35.10 per hundred pounds.  as your July 26 page-one story -- "Idyllic Switzerland Discovers Its Idyll Is Turning Prosaic" -- attempted to do, is impossible, since this ideal never existed.  Envy has always been the shadow of success.  A nation that, compared with others, has been as successful as Switzerland, is not surprised to draw criticism from other countries that cannot match its performance in terms of pollution control, inflation, unemployment rate, political stability, per-capita income and other measures.  Like everything else in this world, Switzerland, too, has its drawbacks.  With no access to the sea, with a small inland market (about six million people) and without any natural resources, Switzerland has always been dependent on export and international business.  Open markets and free trade world-wide -- but never isolation or separatism -- have always been the chief goals.  And the renowned secret bank accounts have always had their limits when a crime, as defined by Swiss Law, is involved.  The cornerstone of Switzerland's position vis-a-vis the European Common Market is the country's heavily armed neutrality.  This is the defense reflex of a small country with a stubborn will to preserve seven centuries of freedom and independence, whose system of government is based on direct democracy where the people, not a centralized government structure, have the ultimate say on all important matters.  It is only logical, therefore, that the Swiss policy seeks a pragmatic approach to the Common Market that not only poses problems, but creates great opportunities.  It goes without saying that the Swiss have noticed that time does not stand still and this country cannot be a haven for protection-seeking fortunes.  Not because Switzerland has lost any of its political or economic stability, but rather because of positive developments in other countries that have successfully managed to systematically reduce their own weaknesses.  However, there is no reason whatsoever for Switzerland to seek a new isolationist identity in relation to its neighbors.  Actually the contrary is true.  The fact that foreigners still comprise nearly one-sixth of the total population indicates that the traditional advantages of Switzerland -- peace and political stability, multicultural sensitivity, quality consciousness, timely performance, multilingual communication facilities, a well-educated workforce and political and business leaders with strong ethical codes and performance standards -- have not lost their allure.  Egon P.S. Zehnder  Chairman  Egon Zhender International  Management Consultants  Zurich  ---  I was rather amazed to see that you cite as an authority Jean Ziegler, who belongs to the extreme left wing of the Socialist Party (and who, by the way, hasn't been a legislator for quite some time).  Mr. Ziegler is well known for spitting on everything that Switzerland stands for.  Let me also add that if Switzerland is a "sick country," a number of other countries in the Western Hemisphere are probably up for intensive care.  Mr. Ziegler's knowledge of economics also is illustrated by the fact that in his view, consumers who buy meat and fruit across the border will force Switzerland to join the EC.  This cross-border shopping has been practiced for decades, especially in the Basel region -- where buyers can choose between Germany and France -- without any drain on the Swiss economy.  The drug problem cited in your article is certainly a problem that needs to be taken seriously, but it is still a far cry from the problem facing the U.S.  To state that drug-related crime is "surging" is simply way not true.  A trip to Needle Park, the only place where drug users are tolerated, is certainly instructive, but it does not represent a "surge" in crime.  As to the alleged Swiss separatism: In economic matters separatism has never existed.  Switzerland has no natural resources but it does have a highly skilled labor force, therefore it has always relied on exports of highly developed products.  Not only is the EC Switzerland's biggest partner for both export and import, Switzerland also has a free-trade agreement with the EC.  Walter H. Boss  New York  A federal grand jury in Washington is looking into possible corruption in the leadership of the nation's largest seafarers union.  The union, known officially as District No. 1, Marine Engineers Beneficial Association/National Maritime Union, has received at least five subpoenas seeking various union records since early summer, said individuals familiar with the inquiry.  The Washington-based union was formed in a March 1988 merger of the National Maritime Union, representing unlicensed seamen and such other workers as cooks and oilers, with the marine engineers union.  The new union has about 30,000 members.  A spokesman for the union declined to comment about the government's criminal investigation.  The U.S. attorney's office in Washington also wouldn't comment.  The subpoenas seek the pre-merger financial records of the NMU and a variety of documents related to the International Maritime Union, said the individuals familiar with the investigation.  Based in the Cayman Islands, the IMU is affiliated with the MEBA/NMU and was set up by former NMU officers apparently to organize seamen on U.S.-owned ships registered in foreign countries.  The grand jury also has subpoenaed the travel records of certain union officers.  The individuals familiar with the investigation would not name any officers but they did say that the only ones involved were those who once had a leadership role in the pre-merger NMU.  Part of what the grand jury is trying to determine, said one of the individuals, is whether certain officers "took advantage of the union coffers" by taking severance pay or vacation pay that they did not deserve.  "For example, if you travel and get reimbursed for a trip you shouldn't have charged to the union," said the individual.  The individuals also said that the probe is in "the very early stage" and that no target letters have been sent by the U.S. attorney's office warning of an imminent indictment.  Meanwhile, a spokesman for the Department of Labor confirmed that it has ordered the union to conduct an election of officers.  Earlier this year, in response to a complaint filed by a union member, the agency investigated the union and determined that it had violated labor laws by not holding elections in 1988.  Under the law, the union must elect officers every five years.  The last election was in 1983, said the spokesman.  Dissident union member Albert Jackson said that he filed the complaint.  He said he believes the U.S. attorney's office began its criminal investigation partly in response to his lengthy complaint against the union's leadership.  Mr. Jackson, who is running for the office of NMU chairman, has alleged that certain union officials took big severance payments at the time of the merger.  "They took the payments, some in the hundreds of thousands of dollars, though they did not sever themselves from the union.  I'm saying that when they merged the unions, they took what was in the till and cut it up among them," said Mr. Jackson, a union member since 1967.  Specifically, he has alleged that the current union president, Shannon Wall, received $272,795 in severance pay and that Louis Parise, union secretary, received $112,549.  Neither Mr. Wall nor Mr. Parise could be reached for comment.  On their behalf, the union spokesman said, "Embittered individuals often make wild charges, but proving them is another matter."  SunGard Data Systems Inc. is "comfortable" with analysts' predictions of 1989 earnings of about $14 million, or about $1.25 a share, on revenue of about $157 million, James L. Mann, chairman and chief executive officer, said.  For 1988, the financial software and disaster-recovery services concern, based here, reported net income of $11 million, or $1.04 a share, on revenue of $122 million.  Mr. Mann said much of the anticipated growth could be attributed to increased demand for computer backup services that account for half of the company's operations.  Penn Mutual Life Insurance Co., for example, has been using Sungard's computers for the past two months to keep operations going after an office fire in Philadelphia crippled its own system.  Mr. Mann said costs related to SunGard's proposed acquisition of Dyatron Corp. would damp earnings only slightly.  Moreover, he expects 1989 revenue of the Birmingham, Ala., financial software firm, projected to be $50 million, to offset the diluting effects of the exchange-of-stock merger.  Under terms of the $55 million stock swap, announced last week, SunGard would issue about 3.1 million new shares to Dyatron holders.  As of June 30, SunGard had about 14.1 million shares outstanding.  The Dyatron acquisition bid is part of SunGard's strategy to "get bigger faster," Mr. Mann said.  Since going public in March 1986, SunGard has acquired nine concerns, most of them small, privately held concerns.  Dyatron would be the tenth and largest acquisition.  "In today's world, we think there's a virtue in size," Mr. Mann said.  Large corporations generally prefer to buy products from other large corporations, he explained.  With the Dyatron purchase, SunGard would expand its computerized investment-management services, which currently cater to small and medium-sized banks and financial services concerns.  Dyatron's major customers include some money-center banks and large investment firms.  To build its disaster-recovery business, SunGard expects to continue to expand capacity at its computer centers in Philadelphia, Chicago and San Diego.  Overall, it projects 25% annual growth in demand for emergency computer services, Mr. Mann said.  He dismissed speculation that International Business Machines Corp.'s recent entry into the disaster-recovery field will hurt the company's earnings or market share, at least over the next couple of years.  According to Mr. Mann, Armonk, N.Y.-based IBM has made only three or four sales since the March debut of its services -- hardly a dent in SunGard's base of more than 800 customers.  Furthermore, competition between SunGard and the other major player in the field, Comdisco Inc., Rosemont, Ill., is already so vigorous, Mann said, that "it's difficult to fathom competition getting more intense."  Your Aug. 17 page-one article "Right-Wing Zealots Still Wield Power Over Bush Appointees" was wrong on its premise, wrong on the facts, and so full of left-wing opinion it ought to have been labeled a guest editorial.  The fact is, the ABA Committee divulged to liberal activist groups the names of those under consideration for appointment to the federal bench; the groups then mounted public campaigns against certain of the candidates before the White House could even nominate them.  The former chairman himself now admits that the practice of divulging names provided on a confidential basis by the Justice Department was a "mistake."  The article says the candidate "never got a formal chance to answer charges."  This is misleading, since no nomination was ever made.  However, he was given an opportunity to make his case in a lengthy and candid meeting with Republican senators held at the request of the Justice Department.  Both proponents and opponents of his candidacy were present.  Further, there is a broader fallacy at issue.  The modest influence exercised by conservatives in the two sub-cabinet positions cited is nothing compared with the raw power exercised by the left in blocking qualified persons who were actually nominated by the president.  The unprincipled political campaigns waged against Robert Bork, John Tower, Bernard Siegan, William Lucas, David Treen, Vaughn Walker and others are examples.  Sen. Gordon J. Humphrey (R., N.H.)  Washington  ---  Your Aug. 23 Politics & Policy story about the new speaker of the House, Thomas Foley, is an interesting contrast with the right-wing-zealots story.  Are you introducing a newspeak?  Everyone knows nothing good can be said about people in the Beltway.  If there are no innuendoes and no invidious comparisons, the story cannot be accurate.  No gossip reported as fact; no demeaning asides and all sweetness and light.  Is the Washington bureau making good on a debt for some old leak or is the writer a secret plant, a mole who will soon surface at a journalism school and disclose his true "idee fixe"?  Russell L. Nelson Santa Rosa, Calif.  ---  "Right-Wing Zealots" indeed] Without taking sides on the two gentlemen discussed, since when have you joined the rest of the liberals in such editorialization?  How long since you reported on "Left-Wing Zealots"?  This campaign against these two men was but a faint shadow of the anti-Bork campaign.  But even you, who demonstrated your justifiable outrage against Mr. Bork's crucifixion, never used such a label against his tormentors.  J.C. Willke  Cincinnati  Deforestation is costing Indonesia at least $1 billion a year, the World Bank says in a report urging the government to improve management of the country's tropical forests.  The bank warns that rapid deforestation poses several threats to the Indonesian economy and environment.  It could cut the supply of wood available for export, cause serious land degradation and threaten a precious ecological diversity that makes Indonesia home to thousands of species of plants, the report says.  Large-scale forest clearing as carried out in Indonesia, the report says, produces smoke and carbon dioxide that contribute to global warming.  Most studies place Indonesia second only to Brazil in producing atmospheric pollution from this source, it adds.  Timber companies with concessions in Indonesia often use harmful logging practices and are only concerned with short-term gains, the bank says.  The concession-holders are inadequately regulated and have been paying far less to state coffers than they should, the report says.  The bank's assessments, which supports some steps Indonesian authorities have taken to protect the environment, are contained in a confidential report completed in June.  The report weighs how the country's forest, land and water resources can be used and sustained to aid in development.  Internationally, the preservation of tropical forests has increasingly been getting attention, and the bank says that forest conservation is particularly important in Indonesia.  The country has large forests -- accounting for about 60% of all forested area in Southeast Asia -- that the bank describes as having "enormous commercial and ecological value."  In his Independence Day speech last month, President Suharto called on developed countries to work with Indonesia to help it plant 20 million hectares (49 million acres) of new forests.  He said Indonesia's planting budget was limited and that rich countries had an obligation to help since they had benefited from importing the country's timber.  The World Bank report doesn't discuss this proposal for foreign planting help, though it discusses external assistance in forestry work that it says could be a model with environmental improvements.  The bank report says that in the early 1970s, the United Nations Food and Agriculture Organization estimated the rate of deforestation in Indonesia at 300,000 hectares a year.  In 1981, the FAO raised this estimate to 600,000 hectares and "recently" it suggested the rate could be one million hectares annually.  The World Bank says the data are weak, but that this estimate is possible.  The bank estimates that 15% to 20% of forest depletion is caused by poor logging practices, another 25% is from development projects, and the remainder results from land being converted to agricultural use.  The bank makes a calculation of the loss to Indonesia from deforestation, much of it coming from land that must be left fallow for a long time after being used for shifting cultivation.  The overall cost of deforestation and timber depletion is "conservatively estimated at about $1 billion a year," the report says.  It was a surprising sign to find outside my downtown office.  Coarsely scribbled in red paint on a whitewashed wall were the words, "Libertad a LaRouche" (Freedom to LaRouche).  I wondered if anyone passing by understood what that meant, so I asked a few passers-by -- the LaRouche name drew only blank stares.  Perhaps I, too, would have been in the dark had it not been for a 1987 speaking trip to Lima, Peru.  I was invited by a research institute for a series of talks on Mexico's political-economic system.  The purpose was to draw parallels between my country's government structure and President Alan Garcia's grand design of a similar one for Peru.  Particularly of interest was a comparison of Mexico's 1982 bank nationalization and President Garcia's bungled attempt to nationalize Peru's banks, a fiasco that was still unfolding at the time of the conference.  In the midst of my lecture at Lima's Pacific University, a young man with a heavy northern Mexican accent stood up and began to make some remarks that soon turned into abuse.  First he questioned my patriotism.  Then he claimed, without offering proof, that the two most prominent men opposed to President Garcia's bank takeover were involved in drug trafficking.  These two men were novelist and presidential candidate Mario Vargas Llosa and Hernando de Soto, author of one of the most influential books ever written on Latin America's social, political and economic system, "The Other Path."  My hosts at the university, upset at the long-winded harangue, asked me whether I wanted the security forces to expel the extemporaneous speaker and a group of his supporters who surrounded him in a defiant attitude.  But I feared a likely violent outcome.  Instead, I waited for my cue.  When he began ranting that Mexico's state takeover of the banks had been well deserved because these institutions were involved in the laundering of drug money, I joked that cars are often used for the transportation of drugs, but that no one claims this is a reason to expropriate the automobile industry.  I was then able to request questions from other sections of the auditorium, but I could still hear my vitriolic countryman cry out, "You're a demagogue."  After the lecture, though, he approached me and gave me an issue of the Executive Intelligence Review, one of Lyndon H. LaRouche Jr.'s primary publications.  Soon I found that LaRouche's activities in Latin America were widespread:  -- His Labor Party in Mexico has been often used to attack the opposition, and a book published by it argued that the right-of-center National Action Party (PAN) is a KGB agency;  -- In a critical 1986 election in Chihuahua, Mexico, LaRouche's Mexican goons passed out slanderous pamphlets about the PAN gubernatorial candidate.  One such pamphlet suggested: "A vote for the PAN is a vote for Nazism";  -- Jose I. Blandon, a longtime adviser of Manuel Noriega, claimed in 1988 that the Panamanian strongman had close links with LaRouche;  -- Early in 1989, when the corrupt leaders of Mexico's Oil Workers' Union were jailed, LaRouche's weekly newspaper, The New Federalist, claimed the "attack on the strongest and most militant union in Mexico was carried out on orders from the Anglo-American Liberal Establishment, controlled by the Satan-worshippers of Scottish Rite Freemasonry";  -- And, as I could see for myself in Lima, LaRouche's agents have been busy in Peru supporting President Garcia's policies and harassing the opposition.  It may be easy to dismiss LaRouche and his people -- perhaps with a joke as I did in Lima -- as mere innocuous lunatics.  After all, anyone who claims, as he does in his autobiography, to be "the most controversial among the influential international figures of this decade," or the only "original thinker" among "the leading candidates for the U.S. presidency since 1945," or "the leading economist in the world today," is difficult to take seriously.  His plans to establish a human colony on Mars, or his claims that Henry Kissinger is the leading member of a conspiracy to control the world, do little to enhance his position as a serious thinker or politician.  But LaRouche often seems to find the right connection with powerful people at the right time.  The Noriega link announced by Mr. Blandon is a case in point.  His August 1982 interview with Jose Lopez Portillo, then Mexico's president -- a meeting in which he is supposed to have presented a plan for the government's takeover of the nation's banking system ("Operation Juarez") just before Mr. Lopez Portillo actually carried it out -- is another example.  Now that LaRouche is in jail, some prominent Latin politicians have risen up to his defense, claiming that he is the victim of persecution.  More than 100 Latin American congressmen signed a statement, published in The Washington Post on April 28, 1989, demanding his release.  Not surprisingly, the signatories included a number of members of Mr. Garcia's party, the Popular Revolutionary Alliance of the Americas (APRA), and of the Authentic Party of the Mexican Revolution (PARM), a group often linked to former Mexican President Luis Echeverria and that supported leftist candidate Cuauhtemoc Cardenas in the 1988 Mexican presidential election.  Moreover, the influential leftist Mexican newsweekly Proceso ran, in its May 29, 1989, issue, a heated defense of LaRouche.  Perhaps no one takes LaRouche's ideas seriously.  But his kind of lunacy may not be as innocent as it seems.  For political bigwigs enamored of conspiracy theories, and pressed with the need to find goons willing to do dirty jobs for them, his organization is too useful to turn down.  Where else could one find someone willing to spread a rumor on the mental illness of a presidential candidate, to claim that the critics of a certain president are drug traffickers, to argue that a conservative party is funded by the KGB, or to disrupt an academic lecture because it runs counter to a government's interests.  Maybe Hitler's fanatics aren't around anymore.  But don't doubt that LaRouche's teams will undertake the same task if given half a chance.  ---  Mr. Sarmiento, Spanish-language editor of Encyclopaedia Britannica Publishers Inc., is also a newspaper columnist and radio commentator based in Mexico.  Biting Truth  Some trusting assumptions  Are foolish and witless,  Like the careless consumption  Of olives marked "pitless."  If you must persist,  The results can be ruthless;  Cease and desist  Or you may be toothless.  -- Pat D'Amico.  ---  Street Smarts  The man whose sign reads  "World's Lowest Prices"  Found he was getting beat  By the shop next-door whose sign read  "Lowest Prices on This Street."  -- George O. Ludcke.  The Bush administration is planning a new campaign to keep humanitarian aid flowing to Nicaragua's Contra rebels until the country holds elections next February.  Administration aides say they are beginning to plan speeches and policy statements to increase pressure on Democrats in Congress to continue the aid, which could be cut off at the end of November under a White House-congressional agreement reached last March.  In addition, officials are considering declassifying and releasing Central Intelligence Agency documents buttressing the administration's contention that Nicaragua's Sandinista government has been receiving an increasing supply of military equipment from Cuba and Soviet bloc nations.  The first round in the new campaign was a little-noticed speech given by Vice President Dan Quayle on Aug. 21 to the Veterans of Foreign Wars.  That speech, which was worked on by high-level White House and State Department aides, argued that until Contra rebels can enjoy "safe and democratic conditions" in Nicaragua, "it will remain a moral obligation of the United States to continue its humanitarian assistance."  White House aides were disappointed, though, that the speech didn't attract more attention and that it wasn't followed up by similar statements from other top officials.  The administration intends to begin following up after Labor Day, officials say.  Under their March accord, President Bush and congressional leaders agreed to keep aid flowing to the Contras at a rate of about $4.5 million a month until the February elections, provided the administration supported regional peace plans.  But in a side letter to Congress, the administration pledged that it wouldn't send any aid after Nov. 30 unless the chairmen of four congressional committees overseeing appropriations and foreign relations submitted letters approving further assistance.  All the chairmen are Democrats, and Democratic lawmakers saw the plan as a way to ensure administration support for peace efforts.  Congress's interest in continuing aid past November was thrown into doubt in early August, when leaders of five Central American nations signed a peace plan calling for voluntary demobilization of the Contras, who operate from base camps in Honduras.  House Speaker Thomas Foley (D., Wash.) has said in recent days that humanitarian aid should continue until the elections despite the new peace plan.  But other Democrats haven't decided whether the U.S. should continue aid that will help keep Contra fighters in the field.  The administration appears to have acquired an important ally, Costa Rican President Oscar Arias, in its campaign to continue aid.  Sen. Richard Lugar (R., Ind.) has just returned from a Latin American trip and said this week that President Arias told him that American humanitarian aid for the Contras should continue through the Nicaraguan elections "and perhaps after that."  Mr. Arias has been the driving force behind the Central American peace process.  His opinion has been particularly influential with congressional Democrats.  U.S. and Central American officials estimate there are 60,000 to 70,000 Contra fighters and their family members in rebel camps along the Nicaraguan-Honduran border.  Though the recent Central American peace plan calls for procedures to allow these rebels to safely return to Nicaragua and to participate openly in the political process, Mr. Quayle argued in his speech that "safe and democratic conditions do not exist in Nicaragua today."  Besides Mr. Quayle, national security adviser Brent Scowcroft, deputy national security adviser Robert Gates and deputy secretary of state Lawrence Eagleburger worked on the vice president's speech.  Officials said that, in addition to re-emphasizing the themes from that address, the administration plans to try to focus attention on steps the administration thinks Nicaragua's Sandinista leaders are taking to rig the elections to ensure that they win.  The Securities and Exchange Commission filed insider-trading charges against Gerald A. Horwitz, former vice president of the applied systems division of Ultrasystems Defense & Space Inc., a unit of Ultrasystems Inc.  The lawsuit is the second insider-trading action growing out of the 1987 acquisition of Ultrasystems by Hadson Corp., Oklahoma City.  In a proposed settlement filed in federal court here, Mr. Horwitz agreed to pay a $1,386 penalty and to return $1,696 in profits from the stock purchase, the SEC said.  Under terms of the settlement, Mr. Horwitz neither admitted nor denied the allegations of the complaint.  According to the SEC, Mr. Horwitz attended a staff meeting at which Ultrasystems executives were told of merger negotiations with Hadson, then purchased 1,000 shares of Ultrasystems stock.  A relative also bought 200 shares, allegedly at Mr. Horwitz's recommendation.  Mr. Horwitz couldn't be reached for comment.  The Bank of Canada tightened its monetary grip in an effort to quell persistent inflationary pressures in the Canadian economy.  The central bank's influential bank rate was raised slightly yesterday to 12.41% from 12.40%, matching its highest level since early June.  The bank rate is set weekly at a quarter percentage point above the average yield on three-month treasury bills at the government's Thursday auction.  The Bank of Canada uses its bank rate, the rate at which it lends money to banks, to signal the direction of its monetary policy.  Currently, short-term Canadian interest rates are about four percentage points higher than comparable U.S. rates, because of inflation concerns.  Statistics Canada reported yesterday that the annual rate of inflation, as measured by a price index for domestically consumed goods, accelerated to 5.6% in the second quarter from 3.9% in the first period.  The inflation rate worsened despite a slowing of economic growth in the April-June period.  The government agency said the gross domestic product rose 0.2% in the second quarter from the first quarter.  It was the lowest rate of growth for any quarterly period in more than two years.  In the first quarter, gross domestic product, which is the total value of goods and services produced by a country, rose 0.8%.  Britain's Cadbury Schweppes PLC agreed to buy Procter & Gamble Co.'s struggling Crush International soft-drink business for $220 million, strengthening its U.S. market share but paying a steep price.  The purchase would increase Cadbury's share of the overall U.S. soft-drink market to 4.7% from 3.6%, and rank it No. 1 in carbonated orange drinks and No. 2 in root beer.  It would also end Procter & Gamble's nine-year stint in the soft-drink business, in which it was crushed by industry leaders Coca-Cola Co. and PepsiCo Inc.  But London analysts called the sales price high for the business, whose brands include Crush orangeade and Hires root beer.  "They've paid quite a lot of money for the business," said London-based analyst Michael Bourke of Prudential-Bache Securities Inc.  "If it works, it will give a good payback, but there's risk attached to it," he said.  A Cadbury spokesman called the price "quite reasonable" and expressed confidence his company can revive Crush's U.S. operations and gain from its stronger divisions in France, Belgium, Latin America, Africa and the Middle East.  Separately, Cadbury posted a 16% rise in pretax profit in the 24 weeks ended June 17, to #94.9 million ($149.7 million) from #81.7 million ($128.8 million) a year earlier.  The results were in line with analysts' expectations for Britain's biggest candy and soft-drink company, which has been a subject of near-constant takeover speculation for two years.  On London's Stock Exchange yesterday, Cadbury shares slipped on profit-taking, easing one pence (1.6 cents) a share to 413 pence ($6.51).  P&G shares closed at $128.50, up 25 cents, in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  The Crush International sale would close a disappointing chapter for P&G.  The Cincinnati-based consumer products concern bought the soft-drink business in 1980 for $60 million.  Besides Hires and Crush, its international brands include Sun-drop citrus drinks, Old Colony and Gini fruit drinks, and Pure Spring mixers.  Though sales have tripled since 1980, to $71 million in the year ended June 30, growth in the important U.S. market has lagged behind that of competitors, and the business's market share has slipped.  U.S. distribution was a major problem.  Some bottlers, on which soft-drink makers often depend for distribution, switched from Crush to Coca-Cola and PepsiCo after those industry powerhouses introduced their Minute Maid and Slice orange soft drinks.  Morever, P&G attempted an industry heresy -- distributing much of its softdrink output from its own, general consumer products warehouses, instead of following industry custom and letting bottlers handle distribution on their own.  In the resulting market battle, the bottlers' grip on the soft-drink shelves of U.S. grocery stores proved even stronger than that of the mighty P&G.  P&G announced last May that it would exit the business.  "It became clear to us that it was going to be very difficult to compete effectively against two entrenched competitors (Coca-Cola and PepsiCo) who control the bottling system," P&G's chairman and chief executive officer, John G. Smale, said in a recent interview.  The resulting auction, which drew many interested buyers, helped push the sales price far above analysts' expectations of roughly $100 million.  Cadbury officials believe they can revive the U.S. Crush business by returning distribution to bottlers.  Moreover, according to Cadbury Chief Executive Officer Dominic Cadbury, the company hopes the new brands will give it added clout with bottlers.  Combined with Cadbury's existing Sunkist, Canada Dry and Schweppes brands, the P&G brands mean "we'll have much more to offer our bottlers," he said at the news conference.  The purchase would also complicate Cadbury's efforts, as the world's third-biggest soft drink company, to co-exist with Coca-Cola and PepsiCo.  Around the world, Cadbury simultaneously competes with and cooperates with the far-bigger giants, selling its own brands while also bottling Coca-Cola and PepsiCo products.  Gaining the "Crush" orangeade brand would intensify its rivalry, lifting Cadbury's share of the specialized U.S. orange-drink market to 23% -- above PepsiCo's 20% and CocaCola's 14.5%, according to analyst Tim Potter of London-based Smith New Court Securities PLC.  In the overall U.S. soft-drink market, however, Cadbury's market share still lags far behind Coca-Cola's 40.5% and PepsiCo's 30.7%, according to Beverage Digest, a trade publication.  Cadbury's earnings in its fiscal first half were affected by northern Europe's hot spring and summer.  Soft-drink sales soared while confectionery sales melted.  Overall, Cadbury's world-wide sales rose 11% to #1.18 billion from #1.06 billion a year earlier.  Because of heavy one-time taxes in Britain, net income fell 26% to #61.9 million from #83.3 million a year ago.  At yesterday's news conference, Cadbury Chairman Sir Graham Day said the pretax earnings rise and the Crush acquisition show "it's business as usual" at Cadbury, despite months of takeover speculation.  He expressed "every confidence in the outlook for the year."  Long-rumored suitors for Cadbury include Zurich-based Jacob S. Suchard AG, and Chestnut Hill, Mass.-based General Cinema Corp., which already holds a 16.9% Cadbury stake.  Separately, Cadbury announced an accord to purchase the Garden Cocktail and Tomato Clam Cocktail brands of Winona, Ontaria-based E.D. Smith & Sons Ltd. Terms weren't disclosed.  In 1988, the businesses posted sales of 21.4 million Canadian dollars (US$18.2 million).  Merchants Capital Corp. said it agreed to sell 94.9% of its wholly owned subsidiary, MerchantsBank of Boston, and its entire 80% stake in Waltham, Mass.-based Farragut Mortgage Co. for $25 million to a group of investors, including members of the bank's management.  The banking, money management and securities firm also said it plans to reinstate its regular dividend to its stockholders after the close of the transaction, which it hopes will be done by year end.  Merchants Capital last paid a dividend of 10 cents a share on May 31, and announced in July that it was suspending payouts.  A previous agreement to sell the stakes to a management group failed, because the group failed to obtain the necessary regulatory approvals.  Joseph A. Anoli, executive vice president and chief financial officer of Merchants Capital and a member of the management group, said he expects the latest agreement to proceed through the regulatory process more quickly, because a group of investors is making the purchase.  The previous agreement included the formation of a holding company to complete the transaction.  The purchase price will include $12 million in cash and $13 million in debt or preferred securities.  The investor group will have the option to purchase the remaining 5.1% of the bank for $500,000 within 24 months of the closing of the transaction.  Merchants Capital will retain control of Fort Hill Investors Management Corp. and its subsidiaries, including McKinley Allsopp Inc.  The transaction is subject to shareholder and regulatory approvals, financing and a definitive agreeement.  In national over-the-counter trading yesterday, Merchants Capital Class A shares closed at $1.75, unchanged.  A Labor Department-appointed commission will urge increased government and private spending as part of an effort to develop a skilled work force that can handle demanding jobs of the future.  The commission, made up of 20 leading business people, educators, union leaders and others, is scheduled to present its report, Investing in People, with 44 recommendations, to Labor Secretary Elizabeth Dole in Chicago this morning.  The recommendations include "a sustained increase" in federal spending on human-resource programs, including federal job training; a corporate income-tax credit for education and training costs; increased subsidies for child-care expenses of low-income families; new incentives to inspire teachers and school administrators, and stepped-up business efforts to help students meet educational standards required for success in work.  While the report repeats many themes that have been sounded by others, the emphasis by an administration-backed group is likely to help spotlight the seriousness of the task facing the nation.  The recommendations for increased government outlays, however, will undoubtedly meet strong resistance from budget-minded government leaders.  "If we intend to maintain our standard of living and remain a strong player in the global marketplace, our country and our people must make fundamental changes in the way we educate, train and retrain our workers, and in the ways we match up people and jobs," Richard Schubert, the commission chairman, said in remarks prepared for delivery today.  Mr. Schubert is a former president of Bethlehem Steel Corp. and of the American Red Cross.  He said the commission had hoped to identify two or three major initiatives that would produce "immediate, broad-gauge improvements in work-force quality."  But members realized there aren't easy solutions, and have instead focused on a need for action on a wide front, requiring the cooperation of business, labor and government at all levels.  Mr. Schubert said the commission members "know full well how short the administration is on dollars."  But he said that, even so, "I believe we are going to have to make very substantial increases in the investments we make in our people and in our work force."  To improve student motivation and achievement, the report urges President Bush to develop specific national education goals and timetables.  It recommends strengthening ties between schools and jobs, by making high-school transcripts and national-achievement test scores available to employers to evaluate job applicants, and finding ways to help youths see that hard work and effort in school will pay off in employment opportunities and advancement.  The commission also advocates restoration of a personal tax exemption for employer-provided education and training benefits, and for the government to assure lifetime access to basic skills education for adults, with a goal of eliminating illiteracy by the year 2000.  The commission also calls for federal support of community-based groups that help low-income people find and pay for child-care services, and the creation of performance standards for the public employment service.  The group, known as the Commission on Workforce Quality and Labor Market Efficiency, was named in July 1988 by then-Labor Secretary Ann McLaughlin.  Its charge was to develop solutions to problems highlighted by a 1987 Labor Department study, Workforce 2000.  This study warned that while increased demand for highly skilled workers, combined with an aging work force, has created a worker shortage that would probably grow for many years, many untrained workers find it increasingly difficult to get a job.  The Canadian government approved the construction of two dams on the Souris River that will provide flood protection for a large area of North Dakota.  The project had been delayed for six months by the objections of environmentalists who claimed it would have detrimental effects on water fowl and fisheries.  The project is estimated to cost $120 million Canadian dollars (US$101.9 million).  The U.S. government said it will contribute US$45 million.  The construction of the dams "will alleviate a destructive cycle of drought and flood," Lucien Bouchard, Canadian Environment Minister said.  The Rafferty and Alameda dams will regulate the flow of water on the flood-prone Souris River, which flows from southeastern Saskatchewan across the Canada-U.S. border into North Dakota and loops north into Manitoba.  It will save the U.S. more than US$7 million a year in flood damage.  But lowering the river's water level will have some "detrimental" impact on two wildlife refuges and some fisheries in North Dakota, said a Canadian Environment Department official.  The reduction in the river's water level could reduce waterfowl breeding 65% to 95% in low-flow years, said Weston Wilson, an engineer with the Environmental Protection Agency.  He said revenue from a sport fishery could be lost six years out of 10.  The fishery now generates revenue of about $4 million a year.  There are always "some trade-offs" said John Bailen, Souris River project manager for the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers.  He said the U.S. government will spend $9 million to reduce the impact.  In Canada, the project will create two reservoirs to store water for irrigation and provide cooling for an electric power generation plant.  Construction of the partially completed dams was halted in April by a Canadian court that ordered further environmental review of the project.  General Motors Corp.'s Cadillac division has effectively cut the price of its slow-selling Allante luxury car by offering a new 1990-model convertible version for $50,900.  Previously, Cadillac offered Allante only as a soft-top/hard-top: a convertible with a removable aluminum roof.  The price for this model will remain at $56,533 for the 1990 model year.  Buyers of both versions must pay a gas-guzzler tax that adds $650 to each model, giving the convertible a base price of $51,550 and the soft-top/hardtop a base price of $57,183.  Ironically, this makes Cadillac's two-seat luxury sports car GM's second and most expensive passenger vehicle.  The priciest is Chevrolet's ZR-1 Corvette, which starts at $58,995 and doesn't carry a gas-guzzler tax penalty.  Cadillac said it is introducing the convertible-only Allante "in direct response to customer demand."  The division said a survey indicated more than 62% of Allante owners "drove with the hard-top less than half the time."  Allante has sold well below expectations ever since it was introduced in 1987.  Now it faces increasing competition from Toyota Motor Corp.'s Lexus division and Nissan Motor Corp.'s Infiniti division.  For the model year that begins in October, Cadillac said it has added new equipment to Allante, including a compact disc player, driver's side air bag, and a system that improves front-wheel traction.  The moves are an effort to improve the car's "perceived value," John O. Grettenberger, division general manager, said.  House of Fabrics Inc. posted a net loss of $119,000 for its fiscal second quarter, ended July 31, compared with year-earlier net income of $454,000, or seven cents a share.  Despite the loss, sales of the retail fabric store operator rose 13% for the quarter to $81.3 million from $72 million.  Gary L. Larkins, president and chief executive officer of House of Fabrics, said that in the second quarter, the company "maintained an active program of promotions including discounts and more use of advertising, and these increased expenditures reduced our profits.  Unfortunately, sales and store traffic did not respond as positively as desired to our promotional efforts."  He added, however, that the company is "cautiously optimistic" about the outlook for the second half, as "by far the greatest percentage of our business is done in the second half."  For the six months, net income fell 50% to $1.2 million, or 18 cents a share, from $2.5 million, or 37 cents a share, while sales rose 9.4% to $160.8 million from $147 million.  Scientists at the University of California here said that they and researchers from the University of Milan in Italy identified a mutant gene linked to a common type of benign brain tumor that causes excessive production of growth hormones and occasionally gigantism.  The scientists said the finding, while not likely to lead to immediate new treatments, would prove helpful in determining the stage of the affliction, known as human pituitary tumor, and in gauging treatment levels.  They said the finding was particularly significant because the gene leads to the production of a protein whose role in the growth of tumor cells is well understood.  The results were published in the latest issue of the British journal Nature.  Procter & Gamble Co., stepping up its presence in its largest overseas market, said it will open a research and development center in Osaka Bay, Japan.  The move demonstrates how much progress P&G, based here, has made in Japan, and its intentions to expand further.  In fiscal 1989, P&G sales in that country grew 40% to $1.1 billion.  "An R&D center will reinforce P&G's commitment in the Far East," said Jay Freedman, analyst with Kidder, Peabody & Co. Sales of the consumer product giant's diapers, detergents and other products in Asia have been growing at about 30% annually for the last several years.  The decision to build the complex recognizes "how important this market is for us," a P&G spokesman said.  Indeed, sales growth in Japan has helped P&G's overall international market grow 22.3% to $8.56 billion from $7 billion a year ago.  Overseas sales now represent 40% of the company's sales, and will reach 50% within five years, the company estimates.  That success comes after a series of early missteps.  P&G first entered Japan in 1972, hoping to snare a share of the lucrative diaper and detergent business.  But a decade later, the company piled up $200 million in losses, mostly due to marketing blunders caused by a lack of understanding of cultural differences.  For example, an ad for Camay soap that depicted a Japanese woman bathing when her husband walks into the bathroom was considered rude, and flopped.  And U.S. versions of Pampers marketed in Japan were rejected by consumers as too bulky.  Now, P&G hires native Japanese to work in marketing and other areas and develops products specifically for the region.  That strategy will be reinforced by the new research center.  Scheduled to open by December 1992, the center will cost between $140 million and $200 million.  It will provide basic research as well as product and packaging development support for both Japan and the Asia Pacific region, the company said.  is caught in a trap between the U.S. and Japan.  European markets for automobiles will probably always remain open to U.S. products -- if only to avoid trade war.  Meanwhile, however, Japan's access to the European market is severely limited.  The question is, what is an American car?  Will Europe allow Japanese manufacturers to export from American production bases?  And how much will those exports affect the increasing production of U.S. manufacturers in Europe?  Many experts predict that the total share of the European market held by Japanese nameplates -- cars made by Japanese companies anywhere in the world -- could easily go from 10% in 1988 to 25% or so in 1995, even if there is no increase in the number of vehicles exported from Japan itself.  Japanese car manufacturers now produce 500,000 vehicles a year in their European plants.  By the mid-1990s, that capacity will likely increase to between 1.2 and 1.8 million units a year.  In those European countries -- like Denmark, Greece and the Netherlands -- where Japanese imports have not been formally restrained, the market share of Japanese nameplates averages a little over 30%.  In West Germany and the U.K. (where penetration averages 13%) and, to a far greater extent, in France (3%) and Italy and Spain (less than 1%), a quick jump in imports to their "natural" level would cause immense pain.  If these gains came entirely at the expense of national producers, Fiat could lose more than 10% of its world-wide volume, Peugeot between 5% and 8%, Renault between 5% and 9%, and so on.  Even if the gains came at the expense of other importers, European manufacturers would still lose heavily, though the firms hardest hit would change.  Automobiles are the only manufacturing industry where the European market is the largest in the world: automobiles account -- directly or indirectly -- for more than 8% of total European manufacturing output and close to 11% of total manufacturing-related investment.  Back when the export battle focused on the U.S. market and overall demand trended steadily upward, European car makers were very profitable.  Now they must face 1992-driven dislocations such as strong downward pressure on prices.  There are still big variations in the prices charged for the same car model in different European countries.  In 1987, a BMW 318i in Luxembourg would have cost about $16,000.  In Greece, the price tag would have been $52,000.  In the same year, a composite price index for 22 car models that set Luxembourg at 100 would have put Denmark at 207, Spain at 139, France at 124, the U.K. at 129, and West Germany at 105.  In the past, tax and customs barriers, as well as established business practices, made such variations tenable.  But developments such as VAT harmonization and the appearance of new sales channels -- including mega-dealers like the Quick Group in England with multiple branches and product lines -- will make large-scale price differentials much harder to sustain.  For the most part, European dealers are still bound to a single manufacturer and will remain so, by an EC committee decision, until 1995.  From then on, however, dealer independence is likely to increase and, along with it, greater model availability and price equality across national markets.  Further, as internal barriers come down, the current distribution system will no longer be necessary.  This is significant because up to 30% of a new car's price in Europe represents distribution costs.  The continued growth of mega-dealers is one likely response, but not the only one.  Car manufacturers will experiment more and more with their own leasing firms.  Automobile supermarkets carrying models from several producers will spread along with mail-order systems which automatically link showrooms with warehouses and factories.  U.S. automakers can thus forget their fears about Fortress Europe and continue moving ahead in the biggest new game since Japan began its assault on the U.S. market.  There are no real barriers in front of them nor are European countries likely to impose restraints on cars made in the U.S. by Japanese companies.  Europeans recognize that U.S. policy-makers will regard those cars as U.S.-built and that restrictions upon them would provoke retaliation.  If worst comes to worst, Europe could withstand a trade war with Japan, but not the U.S.  The U.S. government should worry less about open markets and more about the long-term competitiveness of the U.S. as a production base.  It should, for example, sponsor a multicompany project similar to Sematech aimed at breakthroughs in product and process technology.  The focus ought to be in non-differentiable but important areas, for example, engineering materials and braking systems, and participants include the auto companies, new material specialists, e.g., GE Plastics, electronics companies and system suppliers.  The government should also increase incentives to ensure investment.  The U.S. industry has lots of money.  More of it should be going into R&D as well as investments in European plants.  Could Congress really encourage the latter?  Yes, if it can explain to voters that plants in Europe will a) insure markets and b) increase exports of components and supplies.  What Washington sometimes forgets is that in the $1 trillion business called automobiles, manufacturers account for $250 billion.  Suppliers account for $300 billion and lots of jobs. (The rest is made up of distributors, after market parts, and financing/leasing.) Keeping its suppliers alive is just as important to Americans as keeping Detroit alive.  Otherwise names like Nippon Denso and other Japanese suppliers are going to become more familiar to the citizens of Tennessee and others states with Japanese assembly plants.  ---  Mr. Kastil is a director in McKinsey & Co.'s Munich office.  The firm is consultant to several European automakers and suppliers.  The city's Department of Consumer Affairs said a New York state law intended to foster competition among credit-card issuers apparently has had little effect on card rates and charges.  A federal credit-card disclosure law, similar to the one in New York state, went into effect yesterday.  The state law, which took effect Jan. 1, 1988, requires disclosure of credit-card rates and charges at the time consumers apply, and was intended to "spawn competition among card issuers and to help consumers compare terms," city Consumer Affairs Commissioner Angelo J. Aponte said.  But four of eight card issuers tracked by the Consumer Affairs Department from December 1988 to May 1989 implemented or announced higher annual percentage rates for finance charges or made other changes in account terms.  "The effect of these changes on consumers will mean increased costs to those who do not pay their balances in full each month," Mr. Aponte said.  The department's report found, for example, that the annual percentage rate for finance charges rose at Chase Manhattan Corp.'s Chase Manhattan Bank to 19.8% from 17.5%; climbed at Manufacturers Hanover Corp.'s Manufacturers Hanover Trust to 19.8% from 17.8%; rose at Bank of New York Co. to 17.6% from a minimum of 16.98%; and increased at Chemical Banking Corp.'s Chemical Bank to 19.5% for some accounts by eliminating a 16.8% rate offered to some preferred customers.  The report noted that two major banks, Chase Manhattan and Chemical, changed the starting date on which finance charges begin to accrue, thereby adding six days of finance charges to monthly statements.  The report found that some banks also raised the fees they charge when card users exceed account limits or pay late.  Richard Evans, marketing executive of the Chase U.S.A. unit, said annual percentage rates for finance charges reflect higher administrative and operating costs and loan losses.  "I don't believe there is any kind of cause and effect between the New York state law and the changes in the rate of interest," Mr. Evans said.  "We have always disclosed this information, and the law didn't have any impact on us."  A Bank of New York spokesman declined to comment on the Department of Consumer Affairs report, but said the bank's rates for finance charges are "based on the prime rate, and have been and are generally lower than the credit cards of the large banks."  Manufacturers Hanover officials weren't available to comment on the report, but a spokeswoman acknowledged that the bank increased rates on some accounts while others remained at 17.8%.  She added that Manufacturers devised a new method for determining interest rates, based "on account usage and the customer's relationship with the bank."  Tony Nuzzo, business head of credit-card products of Chemical Bank, said he hadn't read the Consumer Affairs Department report.  But he said customers who have minimum deposits at Chemical are eligible to receive a credit card with a 16.8% annual interest rate.  "This was the case before the New York state law, and continues to be the case after the New York state law," Mr. Nuzzo said.  Pic 'N' Save Corp. said its sales for the four weeks ended last Sunday rose 29% to $33.6 million from $26 million a year earlier.  Sales in stores open at least one year rose 6.1%.  For the first 34 weeks of the year, sales of the discount retail chain rose 25% to $258.5 million from $206.1 million a year earlier.  Sales in comparable stores rose 6.3%.  "Customers responded well to the mid-August introduction of our new advertising and marketing theme," Lewis B. Merrifield III, the company's president and chief executive officer, said.  "This new program has strengthened our sales, following a softening trend in mid-summer, and we are optimistic that it will help maintain momentum going into the important fall selling season."  Pic 'N' Save operates a chain of 173 retail stores in the West and the South and the New York metropolitan area.  Orders to U.S. factories declined 1.7% in July to their lowest point in eight months, the Commerce Department reported.  The drop, a somewhat unexpected sign of economic weakness, followed a revised 0.6% rise in June.  The July decline affected a wide spectrum of manufactured goods, including cars, computers, clothes, engines and primary metals.  The extent of the decline surprised many analysts.  A recent spate of economic reports has suggested that the economy is considerably healthier.  On Tuesday, for instance, the government revised upward its calculation of the economy's annual rate of growth in the second quarter by a full percentage point, to 2.7% from 1.7%.  "I would have expected the numbers to be a little stronger," said Moncure Crowder, an economist at the First National Bank of Atlanta, referring to the latest factory-orders report.  "We seem to want the economy to slow down some, yet it tends to look stronger than we want; this would be one indicator that in fact the economy is slowing."  For much of the past year, the Federal Reserve has tried to engineer a slowdown in the economy in order to bring down inflationary pressures that accompany heavy demand and vigorous economic activity.  To that end, the central bank pushed up interest rates, making it more difficult to finance purchases.  But in order to avoid steering the economy into a recession, the Fed has allowed interest rates to decline a bit since June.  But despite slipping interest rates, new orders for durable goods -- big ticket items that are expected to last at least three years -- dropped 2.2% in July.  Durable goods usually are sensitive to interest rates.  Orders for nondurable goods, a category that includes paper, chemicals, food and textiles, fell 1.1%.  "My general outlook is fundamentally that the economy is weakening," said Sung Won Sohn, chief economist at Norwest Corp., a Minneapolis-based bank holding company.  He suggested that recent statistics showing strength are a "temporary aberration."  Two other numbers in the report pointed to softness in U.S. manufacturing: factory shipments of goods declined 1.9% in July, while inventories grew 1.1%.  The pile-up in inventories, the biggest such jump in years, could be dangerous for the economy; rising inventories without corresponding increases in orders could prompt businesses to cut production to get rid of excess stock.  And that could mean layoffs and a rise in unemployment.  But analysts predicted factories will be busy for at least a while.  Unfilled orders grew 0.9% in July after increasing 0.8% in June.  "That indicates industrial production will continue to go up in the coming months," Mr. Sohn said.  Capital goods other than those for the military sector rose a strong 5.7%, on top of a 5.0% increase in June, suggesting that businesses are still planning to invest and expand.  Overall, factory orders totaled $231.26 billion in July (see chart on page one).  The department originally had calculated that the June rise was 0.4%.  In May, orders declined 2.6%.  If it hadn't been for some big commercial aircraft orders in July, orders would have been even weaker that month, the department said; excluding the orders for transportation equipment, they fell 2.4%.  All the numbers are adjusted for seasonal fluctuations but not for inflation.  Here are the Commerce Department's latest figures for manufacturers in billions of dollars, seasonally adjusted.  @ July June  @ 1989 1989 %Chg.  @ All industries 231.26 235.16 - 1.7  @ Durable goods 122.42 125.14 - 2.2  @ Nondurable goods 108.84 110.02 - 1.1  @ Capital goods industries 49.01 48.08 + 1.9  @ Nondefense 41.37 39.15 + 5.7  @ Defense 7.64 8.94 - 14.5  @ Total shipments 226.93 231.24 - 1.9  @ Inventories 370.43 366.49 + 1.1  @ Backlog of orders 496.16 491.83 + 0.9  The World Bank and its affiliate, the International Development Association, approved $155.5 million in loans to Mexico, Nigeria and Ghana.  The World Bank authorized a $70 million loan for electric power projects in Nigeria, while Ghana will get a $40 million IDA credit to expand electric power distribution facilities in the southern part of that country.  Mexico will get a $45.5 million World Bank loan to help finance forestry projects, including logging operations and wood-processing facilities in the states of Durango and Chihuahua, which contain a large part of Mexico's dense, temperate forest land.  The World Bank loans to Nigeria and Mexico will be at a variable lending rate, currently 7.73% a year; the IDA credit to Ghana will be interest-free except for small administrative fees.  Fleetwood Enterprises Inc.'s net income for the fiscal first quarter fell 18% to $15.6 million from $19.1 million a year earlier.  Revenue for the quarter ended July 30 fell 7.5% to $394.9 million from $426.7 million.  The company, which produces motor homes, travel trailers and manufactured housing, attributed the drop in earnings to lower sales volume, which resulted in part because there was one less week in the latest fiscal first quarter.  The company said its sales were hurt by reduced consumer demand for recreational vehicles and manufactured homes.  Recreational vehicle sales for the quarter fell 9.3% to $251.5 million from $277.2 million, while motor home sales fell 6.7% to $170.7 million from $182.9 million.  Sales of travel trailers fell 14.3% to $80.8 million from $94.3 million, and sales of manufactured housing fell 7.3% to $133 million from $143.4 million.  The company's supply and finance subsidiaries contributed $10.4 million to revenue for the latest first quarter, compared with $6.1 million a year ago.  BUSH MAPS a political offensive to push his new anti-drug program.  After the Tuesday unveiling of the $7.8 billion plan, he will travel to Baltimore and New Orleans for speeches extolling it.  Meanwhile, White House aides are sounding out TV and cable networks to see whether they would carry a possible Sept. 12 daytime address aimed specifically at schoolchildren.  With Bush taking the lead on the issue, Democrats will complain he overemphasizes punishment at the expense of prevention and treatment.  Their probable tack: adding more money for such programs in an attempt to outbid Bush for public support.  Rep. Schumer is floating the idea of a 1% income-tax increase to pay for anti-drug efforts; Sen. Biden offers an even less likely plan, which would forgive some Latin American debt in return for crop substitution.  Conservatives are apt to swallow their states'-rights principles and back Bush's plan to make some federal grants contingent on state compliance with the national anti-drug strategy.  U.S. OFFICIALS GROW more pessimistic about Soviet reforms.  They suspect crackdowns and a slowdown in perestroika are inevitable because of the deepening economic mess and the unrest in the Baltic states.  Millions of ethnic Russians in outlying republics are voicing unhappiness over independence and native-language movements.  Other Russians are disturbed at how the trouble is disrupting their annual Black Sea vacations.  American aides still figure Gorbachev is likely to survive, but they see the next few months as crucial.  Though he's under fire from both left and right, his biggest worry now may be Politburo members who share his desire for reform but want to go slower.  Some analysts fear he may retrench on reforms himself and crack down on the republics to show he won't let order slip away.  LAWMAKERS FACE divisive decisions as they return to work next week.  A cut in the tax on capital gains appears likely to pass, despite Democratic leaders' reluctance.  And legislators will be hard pressed to avoid repealing the controversial catastrophic-illness insurance program, even though Bush wants to keep it.  They also face tough choices on how to approach child care and whether to include a gradual pay raise in the modest ethics bill being worked on.  Democrats are especially eager to project an image of workman-like competence after their travails of this year.  They hope to pass all 13 spending bills, work out a minimum-wage compromise with Bush and approve bills on flag burning, civil rights for the disabled and oil-spill cleanups.  "We hope to jerk the story line away from scandal and 'Dems in disarray' to 'Dems managing the government effectively,'" says a senior House aide.  PACIFIC-RIM NATIONS, including the U.S., plan a November meeting in Australia to discuss greater commercial cooperation in the face of Europe's 1992 plans.  A South Korean trade official calls the meeting "a message" that the Europeans "should move in a nondiscriminatory way."  Japan's Kaifu is likely to raise the issue of Pacific Rim cooperation during his visit with Bush today.  LABOR TRIES to put the best face possible on the UAW's stinging defeat at Nissan's plant in Smyrna, Tenn.  AFL-CIO president Kirkland insists the UAW did well to get a third of the vote.  He calls the vote "only perhaps the beginning of the first quarter."  SUNUNU ORDERS a major drive to shrink the backlog of presidential appointments.  At the start of August, some 80 to 100 potential nominees were stuck in the administration's internal clearance and security-check process; the chief of staff says the list will be down to two dozen by Labor Day.  SITUATION WANTED: Former one-term California Rep. Konnyu takes out classified ads in this paper using only his initials and billing himself as an ex-congressman seeking job opportunities.  He says he's now vice chairman of a land-investment company and wants "two more things just like that.  That would keep me busy."  VOYAGER'S NEPTUNE triumph doesn't remedy NASA's funding problems.  Despite the space probe's spectacular success, NASA still faces trouble winning money for follow-up unmanned missions to Saturn and a comet.  Sen. Mikulski, head of the space appropriations panel, calls the $1.6 billion proposal a low priority because "we have a cornucopia of science projects already."  A higher priority for her is the $30 billion manned space-station project.  Science officials suggest another reason for Mikulski's coolness to a Voyager followup: She felt snubbed by senior officials at the Jet Propulsion Laboratory during a visit there earlier this year.  She subsequently blasted the lab in committee hearings.  By proving that an unmanned mission can excite the public, Voyager's success could ultimately undermine support for the gargantuan plan for a manned Mars visit.  MINOR MEMOS: Odd Couple: The headliners at Texas Agriculture Commissioner Jim Hightower's re-election fund-raiser are TV actress Morgan Fairchild and Jim Wright. . . .  Rep. Aspin issues a nine-paragraph press release to announce the death of his dog, Junket. . . .  Bush is delighted to discover that a business operated by a Kennebunkport entrepreneur is called George's Bush and Tree Service. . . .  A lobbying group calls itself CAN'T -- the Coalition Against Noneffective Lightning Protection Technologies.  It is commonly believed that the peace arrangements after the First World War made the Second World War inevitable.  On closer inspection, this seems by no means certain.  To be sure, many grievances and and many claims were left unresolved in 1919.  But so they were after 1945, and for that matter, after every previous European war.  Many tribes live together in Europe -- sometimes peacefully, sometimes not -- without clearly defined boundaries between ethnic, linguistic and religious communities.  The quarrels over these territories must seem exotic to non-Europeans.  Where, they must wonder, is Dobruja?  What happened to Karelia?  Anything peculiar about Upper Adyga?  Why is Lvov so important?  Do you really mean to suggest that Catalan and Castilian are two different tongues?  What do the Basques want?  What are the Flemish and the Walloons unceasingly fighting about?  What language do the Alsatians speak?  Why is Yugoslavia falling apart?  Have you never heard of the Cieszyn region in Upper Silesia?  Thanks for telling me that Rijeka and Fiume are the same thing, but what do they need two names for?  Who precisely are the Ukrainian Uniates?  And tell me why -- exactly why -- were the Jews slaughtered by the Nazis?  The list never ends.  Nor do the conflicts.  If we were to assume that unsettled claims in Europe must inevitably provoke wars, we have to assume that wars in Europe will never stop, for there is no way -- short of Hitlerian and Stalinist annihilation and deportation of entire nations -- that all those claims ever could be settled according to commonly accepted legal, ethnic and historical criteria.  But there is no reason to accept this gloomy assumption.  Among Europe's uncountable wars, big and small, there has not since 1919 been a war between democratic countries.  This is not to imply that democratic countries have always behaved impeccably.  Some did revolting things in their dependencies; others displayed an abominable cowardice toward despotic regimes; but they have not waged wars against one another.  It is not likely that any of the conflicts and grievances within Western Europe today could trigger a European war.  It is only the post-Yaltan division of Europe, whereby Central European states were forced by violence into the Soviet empire, that could cause it.  The Second World War was not an unavoidable cataclysm, effected by impersonal forces beyond human control.  Nor was there anything inevitable in the victory of National Socialism in Germany, or in the Third Reich's dazzling successes between 1938 and 1942.  The West could easily have defeated Germany at any time between 1937 and 1939, if there had been the will to fight, as Gens.  Keitel and Jodl admitted.  The Germans march into the Rhineland; they annex Austria, the Sudetenland, Bohemia.  The Reich's early conquests are almost bloodless.  The Western states are "seriously concerned."  Hitler laughs: Let them be "concerned," those miserable cowards -- they will swallow anything.  Everything works as he predicted, blackmail, intimidation, lies.  So why shouldn't Poland be the next loot?  There was no reason to expect anything save more "serious concern."  But it didn't work out that way.  Hitler and Stalin divided Central Europe, but war had begun, and nobody could withdraw any longer from the horrible roulette table.  The Second World War was the product of the decisions of individuals: of the pussillanimity of those in the West who believed, or pretended to believe, the Nazis' lies; of the Nazis' direct accomplices; and, above all, of Hitler himself.  Social and psychological conditions made the Nazi seizure of power and all the subsequent genocidal carnage possible; nothing made it unavoidable.  Retrospectively, events seem to have been carried along by a fatal necessity, but this is an illusion.  The past is inevitable only once it has become the past.  I remember vividly hearing the announcement of the German invasion of Poland on Sept. 1, 1939, and then, two days later, the news of France and Britain declaring war.  I was just 12.  Then came the German bombs, and a desperate escape to eastern Poland.  On Sept. 17, the Soviets occupied eastern Poland and we returned home to Lodz again through burnt-out villages and cities.  Deportation and five years of murderous oppression followed.  Of the men in the family, one was killed in battle, another was murdered by the Gestapo, two were sent to Auschwitz (they survived), and a fifth was held in a POW camp (he survived as well).  A standard Polish family story.  In the first weeks of the war, nobody knew what was in store.  Some older people who remembered the German occupation during the last war expected that this one would be worse, but similar.  Nothing of the kind.  We lived through not military occupation but a genocidal terror.  Some 6 million Poles, half of them Jews, perished by German hands.  Poles are amazed when they read memoirs of the German occupation of France.  French life managed to continue, though at a lower level: The French still published books and magazines, attended high schools and universities, gave each other literary prizes, made movies, watched movies and so on.  To us, the war meant a catastrophic break of continuity; everything fell apart -- all of life was dominated simply by the will to survive.  From the first moment, we Poles deluded ourselves that the Germans would quickly lose the war.  It was a most beneficial illusion.  It sustained us, and contributed greatly to the final victory, after long years of suffering.  Then the ambiguous peace arrived, based upon a new surrender to another tyranny and on new illusions -- the "democratic cooperation" with Stalin expected by President Roosevelt, perhaps even sincerely, who knows?  But the fate of Poland was sealed in Tehran, Yalta and Potsdam without Poles' voices being heard, just as the fate of Czechoslovakia was set in 1938.  Forty-four years of peace, that is, of non-war, were purchased by the enslavement of Central and Eastern Europe.  Aspects of the postwar order -- the annexation of the Baltic countries, for example -- had as their only legal basis the Hitler-Stalin pact, decades after both Hitler and Stalin had met their ends.  And so, some people in Central and Eastern Europe keep saying that the war has not ended.  There was no peace treaty.  Poland's never regained its independence, the ostensible cause of war in 1939.  But thinking in such legal terms is of little help.  This peace treaty, a treaty that would take the Europe of 1937 as a legally valid starting point, will almost certainly never be concluded.  The borders that were drawn by Stalin's decrees were indeed enforced by violence and mass deportations, without the consent of any of the peoples concerned.  But 44 years later, as the third generation of inhabitants grows up inside those borders, the most sensible course for Europe is to accept the permanence of those national borders, especially between Poland and Germany in the west, and between Poland, Byelorussia, Lithuania and the Ukraine -- although this should not preclude independence for those countries that were entirely swallowed by the Soviet empire.  The de-Sovietization of Central Europe will result not from a treaty nor, let us hope, from another war, but from the self-assertion of nations.  This process has begun and will not stop, however long, difficult and dangerous it may prove to be.  The war is coming to an end through the lapse of time, by historical exhaustion (or should we call it convalescence?).  Within a few years more, the world will be ruled everywhere by people to whom the Second World War will be no more than stories from a textbook.  The last heroes, the last soldiers, the last hangmen will die or retreat and the living memory will fade away.  Only then will real peace, based on reconciliation, be possible.  To those who lived under German rule or fought against it, May 1945 was a moment of great joy.  The overwhelming majority of Germans, including anti-Nazis, must have perceived it as a national catastrophe.  That is natural, that one cannot help.  But younger generations of all nationalities will feel neither emotion, just as my generation cannot enter into the emotions of the people who witnessed November 1918.  Young Germans on the one side and young Poles, Russians and Serbs on the other will not be divided by feelings they have not experienced.  Their minds will therefore be more open; but not, we may confidently hope, open to the prospect of any future European war.  --- Mr. Kolakowski, a fellow of All Souls' College, Oxford, and a professor at the University of Chicago, is the author of "Main Currents of Marxism."  He was expelled for political reasons from the University of Warsaw in 1968.  Fifty years ago today, the lights in Europe started to go out for the second time in the 20th century.  Before they came on again, the most terrible conflict in human history had engulfed five continents and consumed 50 million lives.  World War II destroyed the fascist regimes of Germany, Italy and Japan, but of course it did not eliminate totalitarianism.  Stalin, emerging as a victor, looked on his former allies with contempt as he rang down the Iron Curtain and made Eastern Europe the world's largest prison.  Such profound thinkers as George Orwell and Hannah Arendt then feared that totalitarians might yet conquer the entire world.  Orwell in his book "1984" described the merciless efficiency of a modern police state, and his warning was taken seriously in the West.  Rightly so, because Stalin and his disciples, under guise of communist egalitarianism, were busily creating such states.  Now we know that the Stalinist scourge, as with the Hitlerian one, could be effectively resisted, given sufficient courage and willpower.  The human spirit is resilient enough and the love of freedom deep enough to survive the jackboot.  Moscow has been forced by economic necessity and military defeat in Afghanistan to relax its grip on its vast empire, with the result that free expression is once again emerging in Eastern Europe and in Russia itself.  Even in the immediate aftermath of World War II, there were positive changes in world politics, some of them little perceived in the U.S. even today.  The 1940s war furthered the breakup, begun in World War I, of ancient class systems in Europe and Asia that had restrained the creative energies of people for centuries.  Broader-based democracy submerged nationalistic impulses, moving Western Europe toward a true sense of community.  Some Asian nations, having discovered the liberating influences of market economics, have been moving away from authoritarianism and toward Western concepts of law and individual rights.  Indeed, non-communist nations as a whole have become more of a community, with the U.S. democracy and its $5 trillion economy at the center.  Japan and Germany have become serious economic rivals to the U.S. but friendly competition in the production and sale of goods and services is to be welcomed, not feared, by peoples seeking higher living standards.  There now is a remarkable degree of economic policy coordination among the seven leading non-communist industrial nations.  War must never be taken lightly, but World War II dramatically illustrated the consequences of fearing it too much.  The lesson surely can't be repeated too often.  In a new book entitled "How War Came," British historian Donald Cameron Watt reviews yet again the tragic sequence of events between September 1938, when Czechoslovakia was dismembered at Munich, and September 1939, when Hitler and Stalin carved up Poland.  British Prime Minister Neville Chamberlain acted out of a sincere, but misguided, "incredulity that anyone of an age to have lived through the events of 1914-18, let alone to have fought in them, could, wittingly, wish to go to war again."  He did not see that Hitler, motivated by a deep hatred for a society that had once rejected him, was a natural destroyer.  His hunger for conquest was whetted, not diminished, when he learned how easy it was to dupe and bully the aristocrats of Europe.  We now believe that had the "ancien regimes" of Europe resisted Hitler early on, World War II would not have happened.  They were too weak, morally, spiritually and, of course, militarily.  The war began a restorative process, and particularly so when the U.S. took a hand.  That restoration proved strong enough to resist the postwar totalitarians in Moscow.  Today, with communism in decline and Moscow itself looking for new answers to its deep-seated social, political and economic problems, we can believe more strongly than ever before that the Western democracies will not only survive, but prevail.  Future generations may look back on the mid-20th century and conclude it was then that imperialism, mercantilism and statism reached their zenith and were finally discredited.  More and more regimes have concluded that power cannot be enhanced by territorial conquest and oppressive control of the populace.  Economic and political power is flowing to those nations that are freeing up their systems and joining the global economy.  But as bright as the future might look, it is still perilous.  The Soviet Union may yet conclude it is too far behind to ever catch up with the West's vibrant economies and attempt to seize wealth through conquest or intimidation.  That is why the Free World will be risking so much if it falls once more into self-delusion and moral decay.  The enduring lesson of World War II is that the costs of appeasement and unreadiness are far more terrible than the price of military preparedness and vigilance.  Corona Corp. restated its second-quarter earnings to include profits from the Page-Williams gold mine, which was awarded to Corona earlier this month after an eight-year legal battle.  Corona said it is in the process of restating earnings from previous years to reflect the 40.5 million Canadian dollars ($34.4 million) in profit from the mine that has been held in trust pending the court decision.  The entire amount will be reflected on the company's 1989 balance sheet as retained earnings, Corona said.  As part of the legal settlement, Corona must pay LAC Minerals Ltd. C$107 million for past development costs.  The company said the C$40.5 million, which it received Wednesday, will be used toward paying that amount.  For the latest second quarter, the company had restated net income of C$13.9 million, or nine Canadian cents a share, on revenue of C$80 million, up from C$9.2 million, or six cents a share, on revenue of C$51.6 million before the restatement.  Toronto-based Corona is a gold producer.  The Page-Williams mine, in Hemlo, Ontario, is considered Canada's richest gold mine.  Richard J. Emerine, 44 years old, was named chairman and chief executive officer of this operator of facsimile centers, succeeding Robert Kaemmer , also 44, who continues as president and a director of the company.  Mr. Emerine was formerly a principal of Ernst & Whinney's Telecommunications Group in Washington, D.C.  Not everyone will be coming back to school this fall.  The latest victims of the tort crisis are thousands of Americans who once volunteered to help out in the nation's public schools.  Our absurd tort laws with their unlimited potential liability have snuffed out a once-bright point of light.  According to surveys by the American Tort Reform Association, nearly 60% of school principals say they have dropped or cut back on school-related programs because of the threat of lawsuits and high insurance premiums.  Nearly 20% of school lawyers report lawsuits or settlements in the past two years alone that caused their schools to drop or restrict activities.  Hardest hit, say the school lawyers, was volunteerism, with more than one-tenth of schools either stopping or restricting volunteer work, such as driving or chaperoning, because of liability fears.  Not surprisingly, gym, cheerleading and diving are highly suspect activities in many schools these days.  But so too are playground activities, field trips, vocational education, driver education, nurses stations and even recess.  One school actually modified its drum and bugle corps program because of fear of litigation.  The Association of Trial Lawyers of America has an answer for all this.  The plaintiff lawyers say the culprits are insurance companies "reaping incredible profits" from premiums and trying to "pressure the public into thinking there is a crisis in tort law."  The good news is that this game of contingency-fee lawyers attacking the messenger for bearing bad tort tidings may be just about over.  Lawyers for these schools have had to go to court to defend against all kinds of absurd charges, from teachers giving low grades to a school allowing a thief to fall through its skylight at night.  These legal costs are passed on to taxpayers, so you'd think that public officials would do all they could to put an end to this destructive litigation.  Instead, the state attorneys general attacked the insurers with a frivolous lawsuit.  The National Association of Attorneys General -- known increasingly as the National Association of Aspiring Governors -- filed a massive antitrust claim accusing insurers of somehow concocting the tort crisis.  A federal judge has announced that he plans to dismiss the lawsuit before trial.  California Attorney General (and aspiring governor) John Van de Kamp, who plotted the lawsuit, must now take some responsibility for the higher insurance premiums sure to be passed on to consumers because of the monstrous legal bills insurers incurred over the past year defending themselves from the state AGs.  Society has become used to watching goods and services fall victim to the U.S.'s deep-pocket-picking liability system, but burdening the public schools with these liability suits is a special outrage.  We need more parent volunteers to help teach and coach.  We need more businessmen willing to offer school-related work to underclass youth.  The last place we need to spend education money is on lawyers chasing the chimera of a risk-free environment.  Education, like almost every human pursuit, entails some measure of risk.  Some kids inevitably will be hurt learning carpentry or playing basketball.  But they'll be hurt more if plaintiffs' lawyers keep shutting down aspects of education.  Judges and legislators should redouble their efforts to reform tort law before our schools become sterile hallways of risk aversion and boredom.  Say you own a house worth $100,000.  You wouldn't dream of paying a real estate agent $40,000 just to sell it.  But if you're not careful, you might wind up paying an equally extravagant 40% commission to one of those charming fellows who peddle options over the telephone.  It's a game that has somehow managed to survive years of regulatory scrutiny.  Hundreds of salesmen play it, especially from outposts on both coasts.  Armed with little more than a tiny office and a telephone book, they typically wheedle and coax small investors across the nation into buying a product that many of them barely comprehend: options on futures contracts.  The National Futures Association is aware of at least 20 firms that charge mammoth commissions for selling such options over the telephone, says Douglas Campbell, chief investigator of the industry self-regulatory group.  But it's all perfectly legal -- as long as the firms disclose their fees in the sales pitch.  So how does one avoid being hosed by huge commissions?  First, listen for a pattern in the sales spiel.  These firms depend on customers who know little about options or futures except what the salespeople "teach" them.  Any knowledgeable trader would hang up at the first mention of the commission rate.  Once a prospect's ignorance of options is established, the pitch begins in earnest.  Here's how it goes at International Trading Group in San Mateo, Calif., probably the largest player in this high-commission crowd.  A phone call to ITG seeking information produces a speedy return call from a broker.  He begins by asking a series of innocuous questions: What type of investments do you have?  What do you consider the ideal investment?  Ah, so you're looking for a shot at a high return with a limited risk.  How fortunate, the salesman says.  That's exactly what he has available -- an option to buy a sugar futures contract (or crude oil, or whatever is today's hot commodity).  He then explains that the firm's research department can tell just when the time is ripe to trade in these highly volatile markets.  Not surprisingly, "the perfect time" is usually that very moment.  A futures contract is an obligation to buy (for people who have purchased a contract) or deliver (for those who sold one) a specified quantity of a commodity at the agreed-upon price by a certain date.  An option, by contrast, confers the right -- not the obligation -- to buy or sell the underlying futures contract.  The salesmen are correct when they state that option owners can lose only what they pay for an option.  Moreover, if the price of the underlying commodity swings sharply, the option holder can reap a paper profit of many times the initial investment.  That's the good news.  The bad news lies in the sales commissions that must be paid, win or lose.  ITG levies a 40% commission on top of the price of the option.  In a client's case seeking reparations from ITG in Chicago earlier this year, Administrative Law Judge William Spruill found, "it is almost a mathematical impossibility to make a profit in the long term with a markup of 40%."  ITG is appealing the decision.  The reparations division of the Commodity Futures Trading Commission has received 139 customer complaints against ITG from October 1983 through August 1989.  And 35 of those complaints have come in the past 11 months.  On a single option whose premium (or cost) is $2,000, ITG would charge a commission of $800.  By contrast, a full-service broker such as Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. would charge only 5% of the premium, with a $17.50 minimum and a $100 maximum per option.  Allegiance Financial, a Chicago-based discount commodity broker and a division of Kemper Clearing Corp., charges a flat $27 per option; this amounts to 1.4% of a $2,000 premium.  A reporter suggests to Michael Diamond, outside counsel for ITG (and a partner in the law firm of Skadden Arps Slate Meagher & Flom) that the firm's commissions seem high.  He replies: "The firm's commissions are what they are, and they are always fully disclosed to customers."  A broker for First National Trading Corp. of Southfield, Mich., tells a caller that his firm's commissions range from 8.75% on trades involving premiums above $50,000 to 35% on trades with premiums below $5,000.  He says he has some very successful clients that have been with him since 1979.  He declines to name any.  Another Southfield-based firm called First National Monetary Corp. -- which has been dissolved -- listed as its officers four people who now are officers of First National Trading.  The dissolved firm was formerly cited for various violations by the Commodity Futures Trading Commission at least five times since 1979.  In 1986, for example, First National Monetary agreed to a CFTC order permanently barring it from "engaging in deceptive and misleading sales campaigns falsely representing the nature, risk, liquidity and profitability of the contracts it offers to the public."  Without admitting or denying the allegations, the firm paid a $225,000 fine.  The CFTC's reparations division got 63 customer complaints against First National Monetary in the four years before the firm was dissolved in 1987.  The division received 29 complaints in the past six years against First National Trading.  A reporter's calls weren't returned by the president of First National Trading, Joseph A. Pick, who was also an officer of First National Monetary.  In 1988 ITG settled for $90,000, without admitting wrongdoing, a case brought by the Chicago-based National Futures Association alleging that it cheated and defrauded commodity customers.  One of seven salesmen listed in the administrative proceedings, Edward F. Carr, now has started his own New Jersey-based options-selling firm called Carr Investments Inc. Mr. Carr's firm charges a flat $195 fee per option, although the commission drops to $100 if the option sells for less than $500.  Mr. Carr says his firm's commissions are fair considering the service it provides.  Leslie Jordan in Highland Park, Ill., who has served as an expert witness in cases against firms that use high-pressure sales techniques, says there's a better route for investors who want to trade options.  She recommends they subscribe to an options hotline service or newsletter and then place their own trades through a discount broker.  The latest of the Bush administration's increasingly numerous Fortress America types has surfaced at Transportation.  Assistant Secretary Jeffrey Shane warned this week that DOT may take "active steps in response to the levels of debt and foreign ownership being discussed" in airline takeovers.  Just last week, Mexico announced it would sell control of Mexicana Airlines to Chase Manhattan, Drexel and Sir James Goldsmith.  We don't know what Mr. Bush thinks of Jeffrey Shane promoting interventionism and protectionism on his behalf, but soon our Latin neighbors may be able to joke about the banana republic to the north.  Ames Department Stores Inc., citing a "slightly greater" than anticipated loss in its second fiscal quarter, said earnings for the fiscal year ending Jan. 27, 1990, will be lower than last year "unless there is a significant improvement in second-half business."  For the last fiscal year, the discount department store chain had net income of $47.2 million, or $1.20 a share, on sales of $3.36 billion.  The company declined to make a specific forecast.  It earlier had predicted that earnings would be higher than last year.  For the second quarter ended July 29, the company reported a loss of $8.4 million compared with last year when it had net income of $7.8 million, or 21 cents a share.  The company said sales in the latest quarter were "disappointing" in May and June and that clearance markdowns were higher than it had projected.  Sales in the latest quarter, which include results of the Zayre stores division acquired last October from the recently restructured Zayre Corp., were $1.22 billion, up sharply from the year-ago quarter's sales of $550.9 million.  For the six months, Ames reported a loss of $20.7 million compared with net income of $13.7 million, or 37 cents a share, in the year-ago period.  Sales in the latest six months were $2.33 billion, compared with $1.04 billion last year.  Speculation has returned and intensified in markets here that Saab-Scania AB is seeking a buyer for its troubled car division -- and that Ford Motor Co. of the U.S. is the most ardent suitor.  The Swedish auto maker and Ford didn't deny Swedish press and television reports that they are in serious negotiations; however, a Saab-Scania spokesman declined to comment on the reports.  A Ford spokesman called the reports about the talks "speculation," and wouldn't comment further.  Ford is, however, interested in acquiring a luxury European nameplate at some point, company officials say privately.  While Saab may be one possibility, another is Britain's Jaguar PLC.  The prospect of a shakeout among European auto makers in the early 1990s may provide a prime opportunity, these Ford officials say.  The attraction for Ford would be to obtain an upscale brand that could broaden the appeal of its product lines both in the U.S. and in Europe.  Ford has tried to accomplish that in the U.S. by importing some of its existing European cars under the Merkur nameplate, but sales of those cars have been slow.  Saab-Scania's Saab car division had a loss of 450 million Swedish krona ($68 million) for this year's first four months.  Saab-Scania officials blamed most of the divison's woes on slumping sales in the U.S., Saab's biggest single market.  A window to the sole is at the center of a suit filed in U.S. District Court by Reebok International Ltd.  The suit seeks to invalidate patents held by Autry Industries Inc. for transparent windows in the soles of sneakers.  Canton, Mass.-based Reebok said the suit was filed in response to claims by Autry that certain Reebok products, including its new Visible ERS line of athletic footwear, infringe on patents held by Autry.  The shoe's windows showcase the cushioning technology embedded in the sole, said Jack Douglas, Reebok's vice president and general counsel.  The Reebok Energy Return System, which was introduced in February, is designed to put a spring in your step, he explained.  The suit pits Reebok, one of the world's largest shoe companies, against Autry, a much smaller Dallas-based shoe maker.  "They're not one of the giants of the industry," Mr. Douglas conceded.  Autry's president and owner, Jim C. Autry, declined comment yesterday.  The suit says Mr. Autry phoned Reebok in July and unsuccessfully tried to sell the patents to Reebok.  Mr. Autry then prepared to sue Reebok for violating the patents, the suit alleges.  So far, Autry has not filed suit.  "We moved first," Reebok's Mr. Douglas said.  Apparently, the stakes are significant.  Reebok North America President Frank O'Connell said, "Our Visible ERS products are one of the most successful new product introductions in our history, and we intend to do what we need to do to eliminate any threat to the continued success of these products."  Reebok also said it wanted to reassure its dealers that it will stand by the Visible products.  Nike Inc., Beaverton, Ore., also offers a line of see-through shoes, called Nike Visible Air.  "That's part of our case," Mr. Douglas says.  "The window technology is really nothing new."  Nike's corporate counsel, Lindsay Stewart, says that Nike holds a patent on its window, too.  "Our technology is different.  But this is an extremely competitive business, and there's a lot of crossover when products are successful."  And it's not a laughing matter, he points out.  "These lawsuits don't come cheap."  L.F. Rothschild Holdings Inc. collapsed earlier this summer, but its takeover trading group -- which was widely blamed for the firm's demise -- is still alive and well.  It isn't unusual for specialized segments of Wall Street firms to take on lives of their own as if they weren't even part of their parent companies.  And it isn't unheard of for everybody in a group to quit in a collective snit, marching off to work someplace else.  But the takeover-trading "risk arbitrage" unit at Rothschild is unique in that it was seen as a major contributor to its parent company's demise in the first place.  The Rothschild takeover speculators had losses of $44 million on Black Monday, which former managing directors say greatly aggravated the problems that ultimately killed the company.  "After the crash, the value of Rothschild stock fell from about 20 to zero and a lot of the partners were shell-shocked," recalls James Belakian, a former Rothschild trader now with Stonebridge Capital Corp.  "They were devastated financially."  But out of the wreckage, the 16 L.F. Rothschild & Co. arbitragers went on to prosper while many of their colleagues lost their former prestige and pay.  The arbs survived not only Rothschild's carnage, but a new owner's fruitless attempt to transform their awesomely risky trading habits into something tamer.  "They are very good, disciplined traders," one investor says.  "This isn't any kind of Ivan Boesky operation."  L.F. Rothschild's arbitrage department, one of the oldest on Wall Street, for years was a big profit center for the firm, which isn't related to Rothschild Inc., the New York investment bank.  In 1987, John Angelo and Michael Gordon ran the department with Donald Friedman, who now is investing on his own.  Warming to the pre-crash rally, they made big bets on takeover stocks such as Kidde Inc., GAF Corp. and Allegis, now UAL Corp.  On the fateful day, Oct. 19, the value of those stocks fell through the floor.  Word of the $44 million loss spread as fast as gossip on Wall Street could carry it.  Soon television crews swooped into Rothschild's lobby, turned the bright lights on departing employees and demanded, "What do you think of the arbitrage department?"  As takeover-stock traders, Messrs.  Angelo and Gordon were used to hearing rumors all day long, but they soon learned how bad gossip can be for business.  Alarmed clients started to yank money out of their $100 million arbitrage fund.  After some consoling phone calls to clients, the arbs managed to stem that outflow.  Later L.F. Rothschild & Co. reported a $129 million loss for the year, instantly becoming a symbol of what history's largest one-day stock rout can do to a securities firm.  The arbitrage fund's investors didn't want to become part of the legend.  They feared creditors would find a path to their pockets.  So to halt yet another exodus, Messrs.  Angelo and Gordon simply took away their $100 million fund and sequestered it in an account at Citibank.  That was in December 1987 -- their first step toward independence.  For a while, it looked as though things would settle down.  The arbs kept trading while they watched Rothschild hunt for cash.  A buyer was found -- Franklin Savings Association in Ottawa, Kan., led by Ernest Fleischer, who had built up the sleepy thrift into a trading giant known for its complex bond investment strategy.  Franklin took control of Rothschild in mid-1988.  Mr. Fleischer launched into a reorganization that left heads spinning and rolling, and soon the block trading desk, the over-the-counter stock staff, and the highly respected equity research staff joined the ranks of the jobless.  The trading floor looked like a used furniture showroom.  "We were 20 people sitting in 35,000 square feet," says Mr. Angelo.  "We began to read the writing on the wall."  But Mr. Fleischer kept the arbs because they had been so profitable in past years.  Despite their crash losses, the group managed to finish $6 million in the black for all 1987.  And besides, Mr. Fleischer thought the day of "hedged arbitrage" had dawned.  "Ernie was willing to commit capital -- big capital -- as long as it was hedged" by some kind of risk-reducing tactics, says Mr. Angelo.  "Ernie" even lent the arb desk some of his hedge wizards from Franklin Savings.  But hedged arbitrage turned out to reduce returns, making it less competitive with other investments.  Clients believed it wouldn't work; so did Messrs.  Angelo and Gordon.  "We had a very amicable parting," with Franklin, Mr. Angelo says.  On Nov. 1, 1988, the entire arbitrage department resigned, and Angelo, Gordon & Co. was born as an independent company right on Rothschild's trading floor.  To start, they had $135 million in the arbitrage fund, and $25.5 million in start-up stock positions they bought from Mr. Fleischer.  So far the startup capital has more than doubled to about $65 million, and return on the arbitrage funds is running at about 30% annually, investors said.  Once the bitter memories of Rothschild fade, many former managing directors say that Messrs.  Angelo and Gordon are top traders.  But, they add, the survival of Angelo, Gordon & Co. is typical of how a single profit center within a firm can grow so powerful that it walks away from disaster with barely a scratch.  "It was Angelo's bat, ball and baseball diamond," says Andrew Blum, a former Rothschild managing director who now works for the National Association of Securities Dealers Inc.  "The sad part is that there are still fistfuls of Rothschild people looking for a job."  Cleveland-Cliffs Inc. is operating its iron-ore mines at near-capacity rates, and its steel company partners haven't asked for any production cutbacks during the remainder of the year, M. Thomas Moore, chairman and chief executive said.  Earlier this year, there was speculation that steel demand would slow enough to require ore-production cutbacks before the end of the year.  Such cutbacks could still occur, Mr. Moore said.  However, by the end of August, steel companies usually have a fairly good estimate of their ore requirements for the remainder of the year, he said.  Cliffs is the largest iron-ore producer in North America, operating seven mines.  Several industry analysts forecast that capacity operation through year end would produce operating profits for the year of around $4.50 a share, up from profit from continuing operations of $41.7 million, or $3.05 a share last year.  Mr. Moore declined to make his own forecast or to comment on analysts' estimates.  Share earnings in 1989 will be sharply higher than for 1988 because of the buy-back in May of 1988 of 31% of the common shares outstanding and all of the convertible preferred stock as part of a restructuring.  The company has 11.6 million shares outstanding, compared with an average of 13.2 million shares during 1988.  Cliffs has a minority ownership in four of the five major North American mines it operates.  The fifth is owned by LTV Steel Co., a unit of LTV Corp. Cliffs earns management fees and royalties, and sells its share of the output of the four mines in which it is a partner.  In addition, Cliffs manages two small ore mines in Canada that are scheduled for closing March 31, 1990.  Closing the two facilities won't have a significant effect on the company's profit, Mr. Moore said.  Also, Cliffs operates a small mine in Australia, which "is a minor contributor" to earnings.  The company is making progress with negotiations to extend the life of that mine by another four to five years, Mr. Moore said.  There were plans to close that facility in a year or two.  As previously reported, first-half operating profit was $23.6 million, or $2.04 a share, compared with $17 million, or $1.04 a share, a year earlier.  Net income, including gains on sale of assets in both years and a loss from discontinued operations in the 1988 half, was $30.8 million, or $2.66 a share, compared with $18.5 million, or $1.14 a share, a year earlier.  Operating revenue rose to $199.3 million, from $190.2 million.  Net income for all of 1988 was $39.2 million, or $2.86 a share, after adding gains on asset sales and loss from discontinued operations.  Revenue totaled $413.9 million.  Cliffs probably won't receive any of the proceeds from bankruptcy claims against Wheeling-Pittsburgh Steel Corp. and LTV until next year, Mr. Moore said.  The Wheeling-Pittsburgh claim may be settled early in 1990, but the LTV bankruptcy proceedings aren't likely to be completed until at least the 1990 second half.  Mr. Moore declined to estimate the likely recovery from those claims, but analyst estimates range from $7.50 to $9.50 a share.  Under terms of last year's restructuring, Cliffs agreed to pass any recoveries along to shareholders.  Cliffs expects to produce 39 million tons to 40 million tons of iron pellets in North America this year, about the same as the 39.3 million tons produced in 1988, Mr. Moore said.  The company can't predict 1990 operating rates and iron-ore prices until year end, Mr. Moore said.  Its steel company partners estimate their ore needs and indicate the price they'll pay for merchant ore during discussions in November and December, he said.  About 60% of the ore Cliffs receives as its share of mine output has been priced under multiyear contracts, he said, but the other 40% is sold mainly under one-year agreements.  Cliffs isn't currently planning to reopen the Republic Mine in Michigan nor expand capacity at its Tilden, Mich., mine, Mr. Moore said.  Both options were considered earlier this year, when iron ore was in short supply.  The Republic mine was closed in 1981, when there was excess capacity in the ore industry.  However, the company has done preliminary studies and could return Republic to production at a rate of 1.3 million tons annually with about three months notice, Mr. Moore said.  Cliffs is continuing to look for additional investment opportunities in the North American iron-ore industry, Mr. Moore said, though, nothing is imminent.  In addition, Cliffs would be interested in becoming more of a factor in international iron-ore production, he said.  Currently, the company exports a small amount of ore to Europe from one Canadian mine and operates an Australian mine with capacity to produce 2.5 million tons annually.  The company will end the year with about $70 million of cash and short-term investments, Mr. Moore estimated, up from $52.4 million at the end of 1988.  The board in July voted to resume quarterly dividends at a rate of 20 cents quarterly, or 80 cents a year.  The company halted dividends in 1986 because of operating losses.  Give a vital actor like Jim Dale a meaty, funny, heart-rending role like Terri Dennis in "Privates on Parade" and an audience will know instantly that it is experiencing theater -- in the best and most magical sense of the word.  For however long we've been dutifully going to the theater, hoping and hoping (and failing) to see the real thing, we recognize it at once when it appears.  That unmistakable thrill can currently be had at the Roundabout Theater's revival of the 1977 play/musical by Peter Nichols.  Terri Dennis is a British civilian-entertainer serving in her majesty's army in Malaya in 1948.  He is the star of a band of fortunate soldiers (the rest of them draftees) whose job it is not to fight the guerrilla war against the Malayan People's Anti-British Army but to entertain the men who are doing the fighting.  Dennis's troupe is known as SADUSEA -- the Song and Dance Unit of Southeast Asia.  Their corny skits and pastiche musical numbers are meant to enliven the fighting soldiers' spirits and give them respite from the gloom of wartime.  But because the numbers were written by an enormously gifted playwright (Mr.  Nichols supplied the lyrics to the songs, which were composed by Denis King), the musical interludes in "Privates" also reveal invaluable information about the characters who perform them and about the mores of the society those characters have been drafted to maintain.  An unrepentant homosexual struggling to maintain his dignity in an eerily conservative culture, Terri uses the shabby, fragile glamour of army show business as an escape from reality.  His audience might snigger when he dresses up as Carmen Miranda or Marlene Dietrich for the show, but Terri puts his whole heart and soul into the charade.  When he meets the newest member of the troupe, a likable young private named Steve Flowers (Jim Fyfe), Terri recalls his own young romantic ideals and the necessarily cruel emotional deflowering of his early dreams.  In a monologue halfway through the first act, Mr. Dale shows us the ache that fuels Terri's constantly convivial chatter.  He remembers a time when "nothing sordid or unforgivable could happen," when "nobody could use you or chuck you off like an old pair of drawers when they'd finished with you."  For a moment Terri's hands stop their busy fussing and his tongue stops playing erotically over his teeth, and his face -- upon which rouge and powder have been defiantly yet tastefully applied -- lets slip its cheery mask.  At that moment, Terri Dennis -- the man who loves finery -- is naked in his long-suppressed pain.  And for Mr. Dale, it's an acting coup; he piercingly reveals a complex, complete human being.  Terri Dennis may be the play's most empathetic character, but he is not its protagonist.  That role goes to Private Flowers, the kid who learns to be a man in the army.  Unfortunately, the kind-hearted Terri is only briefly his mentor; Flowers is soon taken under wing by a much more "suitable" role model, Maj. Giles Flack (Simon Jones).  Maj. Flack is that wonderful specimen that British playwrights so love to draw (remember Clive, Caryl Churchill's colonialist in Africa in "Cloud Nine"?) -- the ostensibly paternal British representative in one of the they-ought-to-be-grateful colonies.  Unlike Ms. Churchill's more brutal comic portrait, Flack is a more fully drawn man with sincerely beneficent impulses.  He wants to assist the young private out of a "spot of bother" -- Flowers has fallen in love with and impregnated Sylvia Morgan (Donna Murphy), a 28-year-old Eurasian woman who sings and dances with the troupe.  Flack, an unquestioning patriot and philistine who blathers on about God and King and who once saw half a film and walked out, sees the boy's impending marriage to a Eurasian woman as an irreversible social disaster.  Like Terri he is touched by the boy, and he sees him as his natural successor, not only in the army, but in the world at large (he has no sons).  He infiltrates Flowers's mind with his opinions and suggests that Sylvia wants to marry him only for the free trip to Britain.  He tells Flowers that Eurasian women may be handsome early on but that they "tend to put on weight rather soon."  If in its colonies Britain is waging a war for the souls of the natives, "Privates on Parade" delineates how a country also wages war for the souls of its young men -- through the intensity of wartime bonding it persuades them to relinquish whatever idiosyncratic personal instincts that arise in them.  It teaches them to conform.  In the character of Flack, Mr. Nichols also makes clear how, for the bored older generation, the one that has suppressed every natural impulse, waging war is a way of relieving boredom and of getting away from the "not very brilliant company . . . {of} only my wife and the Labradors," as Flack says.  This production, directed by Larry Carpenter (formerly of the dreadful Broadway oddity "Starmites"), is immeasurably enhanced by the presence of Mr. Dale, who played the role in a 1979 production at the Long Wharf Theater in New Haven, and by Mr. Jones, who was in the original 1977 Royal Shakespeare Company production, albeit in another role.  The cast is uniformly good, with standout performances from Jim Fyfe and the effortlessly sultry Donna Murphy.  This "Privates on Parade" finally gives New Yorkers a chance to see Mr. Dale's first-rate performance in a play by a first-rate Brit.  The fall season is already off to a strong start.  The Environmental Protection Agency announced steps to protect the public from cancer-causing vapors of benzene, one of the most widely used chemicals, at a cost to industry of more than $1 billion.  The new regulations would force a broad range of companies -- including coke producers, petroleum and chemical plants, and about 200,000 gasoline service stations -- to cut emissions of benzene that now pose cancer risks to people living nearby.  The government has been wrestling with the issue of benzene restrictions for 15 years.  But it hasn't acted previously because of footdragging and legal action, even though the chemical is a proven cause of an incurable form of leukemia in humans.  Almost half of all Americans are exposed to it from industrial sources.  The new regulations are important more broadly because they set a new EPA policy for regulating all sorts of toxic air emissions.  The new policy was mandated by a 1987 court decision in which the EPA was told to pay more attention to health considerations and less to costs to industry.  Even so, environmental groups claim the new approach doesn't protect enough people from unacceptable cancer risks.  Most of the cost of reducing benzene emissions -- $932 million -- would fall on half of all gasoline stations in the U.S. and on 15,000 bulk gasoline plants and 1,500 gasoline-storage terminals.  The gasoline stations are those that don't already control emissions during refilling of their large underground tanks to meet city smog-control standards.  The new rules wouldn't affect filling of individual automobile tanks, but that could be covered by future regulations.  The American Petroleum Institute, while pleased with the EPA's overall approach, complained that the rules would force the installation of expensive vapor recovery systems and other solutions, and that they "would achieve virtually no public health benefits."  The group claimed the EPA used outdated risk data.  Mark Engle, president of the American Coke and Coal Chemicals Institute, said the rules would require some of the oldest coke-producing plants to undergo major or total overhauls.  "We have to import now to meet current demand, and this will certainly further that situation," he said.  The EPA said that the 36 coke-byproduct plants affected by the rules would incur capital costs of $74 million, pushing up the price of furnace and foundry coke no more than 1%.  The agency said it realized the new standards could trigger the closing of some plants that are marginal or unprofitable.  The EPA's new policy sets out to limit chemical emissions so that the greatest number of people possible face no more than a one-in-a-million risk of contracting cancer.  In the case of benzene, EPA Deputy Administrator Henry Habicht said that industrial emissions of benzene will be cut 90% and that more than 99% of those living near industrial plants would face insignificant, if any, cancer risks.  Further, the EPA would seek to guarantee that any person with maximum exposure to benzene -- calculated to be 24 hours a day for 70 years -- would face no more than a one-in-10,000 chance of contracting cancer.  Environmentalists complained that's still too much risk.  "That's 100 times riskier than what the agency says ought to be the risk for pesticides on the food we eat," said David Hawkins, a lawyer with the Natural Resources Defense Council.  But he said it's too early to say whether the new standard would be challenged in court.  The EPA said its rules, half of which are final and will take effect in two years and half of which still are subject to public comment, would reduce the number of cases of leukemia from benzene among people who live near emissions sources from four a year nationwide now to one case every three years.  The rules also will require about 125 benzene storage facilities, mostly along the Gulf Coast, to spend some $660,000 to control emissions within the next two years.  Proposed rules would affect chemical plants, petroleum refineries and hazardous waste treatment facilities that handle or use benzene.  Benzene is one of only seven toxic industrial emissions regulated so far by the EPA, out of some 280 known toxic air pollutants.  The EPA wants to drop its current arduous chemical-by-chemical approach to cutting toxic industrial emissions.  Mr. Habicht said more emissions could be cut quicker if Congress adopts President Bush's clean-air proposals, which would focus on requiring control technologies for broad ranges of industries rather than examining chemicals one at a time.  If a new clean-air law is passed, the EPA's policy for benzene would be overtaken.  The EPA's industrial-emissions rules address only 20% of the nation's benzene problem.  Almost 80% of benzene emissions are blamed on emissions from automobile tanks and tailpipes.  There already are separate regulations to protect workers exposed to benzene.  The Federal Communications Commission cleared McCaw Cellular Communications Inc. to acquire LIN Broadcasting Corp.  Separately, McCaw extendeds it $110-a-share offer for LIN to Sept. 22 from today.  LIN, based in New York, has rejected the $5.9 billion bid as inadequate, but no other offer has materialized.  McCaw, Kirkland, Wash., originally offered $120 a share, but later cut it to $110.  Now, the makers of worry beads here really have something to worry about.  Long a mainstay of the tourist's image of Greece -- along with skirt-clad evzone soldiers and retsina wine -- worry beads are slowly disappearing from the Greek landscape.  Tourists buy them and the older generation still uses them, but they're going out of fashion.  "Business doesn't go very good," sighs Leo Dedousis, co-owner of The Bead Shop in Athens, as he sits in a store full of unsold beads.  "After 1980, it slowed down, and the last couple of years it's down a lot."  Contrary to what the tourists think, worry beads have little to do with worrying.  Playing with the beads (which are called "komboloi" in Greek, derived from "kombos", or knot) is actually a sign of peace of mind and tranquillity.  And that's the problem.  "Greeks don't sit and relax a la the Middle East anymore," says Peter Doukas, head of investment banking at the Athens office of Citibank.  "Now the in thing is to be up and uppity, so it doesn't look good if you have worry beads.  People think you're too relaxed."  Indeed, playing with worry beads traditionally was part of Greece's "kafeneion", or cafe, society and was almost exclusively a man's sport.  Men would sit for hours in the kafeneion and nonchalantly flick the beads, which are loose on a tied string, while pondering the events of the world over a glass of ouzo or a cup of muddy Greek coffee.  Worry beads were just a way of keeping one's hands busy and whiling away the time.  The rhythmic, clicking sound of the beads, like one billiard ball hitting another, was the sound of a contented Greece.  But time, tranquillity and contentment are in short supply here now.  The country is burdened by a mammoth budget deficit, sky-high inflation, competition from its Common Market neighbors and a legacy of financial scandals left behind by the government of former Prime Minister Andreas Papandreou.  What's more, the sexual revolution has largely done away with the all-male cafes -- at least in the cities -- and industrialization and economic modernization have changed the pace of Greek life.  "It's the era of speed," laments Costas Sotaras, one of the last remaining makers of Greek shadow puppets, another dying tradition.  "Now people have stress, they want to run, run.  They eat fast food in the middle of the street.  There's no time for komboloi."  Flipping beads also isn't hip among the cultural cognoscenti.  "Young girls look at a guy playing worry beads, and they think he's a hillbilly from the mountains," says Emmanuel Lirarakis, a waiter at an outdoor cafe on Sindagma Square, the bustling central square of Athens.  So Mr. Lirarakis, and others, are shying away from the pastime.  That has many keepers of the cultural flame plenty worried.  They see a tradition waning, and a part of the Greek identity disappearing.  How worry beads appeared in Greece in the first place is a matter of debate.  There is no recognized authority on the topic, but one expert, who resides in San Francisco, is Michael Larsen, author of "The Worry Bead Book," which is scheduled to be published soon.  The 32-page booklet "is the definitive word on worry beads," boasts Mr. Larsen, who has used worry beads since encountering them on a trip to Greece in 1966.  He concludes they are "the oldest and simplest way to beat stress."  But even he is uncertain of their origin.  Based on earlier research by other historians, Mr. Larsen says worry beads may have evolved from both Christian and Islamic prayer beads and the "secular and religious values of worry beads may have merged because the sense of security they offer may be subconsciously spiritual."  As a result, it's hard to say where prayer beads stop and worry beads begin.  Worry beads apparently traveled from East to West.  Historians say they may have originated in India, where they were used by Buddhists and Hindus as prayer beads.  From there, they went to the Moslem world, where they are still used today both as worry and prayer beads, often with 99 beads on a string -- one for each way Allah can be glorified in the Koran.  They then appear to have been introduced to the West by crusaders, and in the 12th century St. Dominic taught his Dominican monks to use beads as rosaries.  The most commonly accepted theory is that Greeks adopted them from the Turks.  The beads are frequently made at monasteries in Greece, but they have very little religious use.  In polite society, they are left on coffee tables so people can play with them while they talk.  Traditionally, worry beads were made of amber, a fossil resin that has become too expensive for most manufacturers.  Now, says Nikos Dimou, a prominent Greek commentator, "there are all kinds of horrible komboloi made of plastic and shiny things."  This offends worry-bead purists, who say the substitutes lack the special feel and sound of true komboloi.  Worry beads, they sniff, are now best left to the tourists.  "When you see every second American or German using them, you don't use it anymore," says Mr. Dimou.  As a result, makers of komboloi are rethinking their sales strategies.  Many have diversified into necklaces and bracelets to offset declining sales.  They are aiming more for export markets, such as the Middle East and the U.S., and are pitching them as cures for stress and a means to help people stop smoking.  Mr. Larsen says he knows a San Francisco psychiatrist who prescribes them to his patients.  Some in Greece, nostalgic for the old days, say that if worry beads were in greater use today, officials could have avoided recent financial scandals.  "If they'd been doing useful things with their fingers, like playing with worry beads," one businessman says, "they wouldn't have their hands in the government till."  Except for the vice presidency, the job of commerce secretary usually is just about the most important sounding but uninfluential post in the nation's capital.  In most administrations, the commerce secretaries have been figureheads, bit players to the secretaries of state, defense and treasury in setting and executing policy.  Though the Commerce Department has many roles, such as collecting economic statistics, its views traditionally haven't counted for much.  That perception may soon change.  The views of the current commerce secretary, Robert Mosbacher, seem to be counting for a great deal.  He benefits from the fact that the Commerce Department is more in the limelight today.  Promoting exports and making U.S. companies more competitive internationally have risen in the list of the nation's priorities as it struggles to cut its huge trade deficit and retain its economic leadership.  But more important, the 62-year-old former oil man, whose net worth is estimated at more than $200 million, has as much White House clout as anyone in the cabinet.  In an administration loaded with George Bush's friends, Mr. Mosbacher is one of his two or three closest pals, along with Secretary of State James Baker and Treasury Secretary Nicholas Brady.  And Mr. Mosbacher isn't shy about dropping the president's name -- so much so that some of his colleagues already seem wary of his close ties to Mr. Bush.  "At cabinet meetings, he's like the 800-pound gorilla," says a senior official in the Reagan administration.  "He can sit where he wants."  Although Mr. Mosbacher comes across as easygoing, he has already won some significant battles, especially against Defense Secretary Richard Cheney.  Mr. Mosbacher carried the day in a dispute over terms for the joint development with Japan of a new jet fighter, the FSX, which the Pentagon opposed on national-security grounds.  At a crucial point in the deliberations, shortly before President Bush's final decision, Mr. Mosbacher flew down to Texas with him and, during the trip, lobbied him.  The terms to which the administration eventually agreed were those advocated by Mr. Mosbacher.  In another incident, Mr. Cheney publicly complained, also on national-security grounds, about a Mosbacher decision, announced a day before, to decontrol many computer exports.  The White House supported Mr. Mosbacher.  Mr. Cheney backed down.  And pressure from Mr. Mosbacher helped push the administration into reviewing its policy on mergers and acquisitions.  Some big companies argue that the U.S. must relax its antitrust policy to remain competitive in new, capital-intensive industries, such as high technology.  But in pushing his views, Mr. Mosbacher has done little to avoid the appearance of being somewhat cozy with big business -- and has stirred up some criticism.  For example, he recently backed Motorola Inc. in a trade spat with Japan.  Michael P. Galvin, a major contributor and fund-raiser for Mr. Bush's presidential campaign, is a former Motorola executive; in fact, Mr. Galvin's father, Robert, heads the big electronics concern.  Today, Michael Galvin is an acting assistant secretary at Commerce.  Or take the personal-computer industry.  For years, the American Electronics Association has been lobbying for the government to ease export controls on PCs.  When Mr. Mosbacher finally opened the door in July, the order was signed by James LeMunyon, the deputy assistant secretary for export administration.  Only a few weeks earlier, working six blocks away, Mr. LeMunyon had been the trade group's lobbyist on the issue.  There's nothing illegal in either of these potential conflicts of interest.  Michael Galvin recuses himself from any actions involving Motorola, officials say.  And Mr. LeMunyon's role in the PC issue was judged lawful by agency attorneys.  But to many, even the appearance of a conflict is undesirable.  The PC-export decision "isn't illegal, but it stinks," says Frank Gaffney, director of the Center for Security Policy, a Washington think tank worried that the Soviets would get access to more-powerful computers.  Mr. Mosbacher doesn't care about such appearances, however.  He believes that any action that benefits U.S. business in an increasingly global economy enhances national security.  And in this, he is flexible.  Where free trade benefits U.S. industry, he is a free trader.  Where other industries are helped by protectionism, he's a protectionist.  Where government intervention provides a solution, he is an interventionist.  And where friendships and connections come into play, he is a crony capitalist.  Through the years, he has had notable cronies.  For many years, in fact, the Bush, Baker and Mosbacher families lived within a two-mile radius in Houston.  "It's hard to believe the same ZIP code would produce all these people," says James Bayless, a Washington lawyer whose family hails from that same clique.  Mr. Mosbacher's valuable friendship with Mr. Baker is evident on his office wall at Commerce, where he displays a framed Time magazine cover of Mr. Baker bearing the headline "A gentleman who hates to lose."  Mr. Baker presented the picture after adding an inscription: "To Bob, who hates to lose even worse."  As Mr. Bush's national finance chairman, the personable, glad-handing Mr. Mosbacher raised millions of dollars for the presidential campaign.  The two native Easterners had become fast friends in the 1950s, when both were building their fortunes in the clubby, trust-your-buddy world of the Texas oil and gas industry.  Like Mr. Bush, Mr. Mosbacher came from a wealthy family.  After he graduated from Washington & Lee University, his father, a successful New York investor, staked him in the business.  The son then built up one of the larger private oil and gas companies in Texas.  Even then, Mr. Mosbacher and Mr. Bush held remarkably similar political ideas -- a pragmatic, less ideological brand of Republicanism.  "Bob stayed pretty much behind Bush.  They were strong Ford people.  Reagan upset them," says E.O. Buck, a Houston banker who has known Mr. Mosbacher for years.  The commerce secretary, in fact, sees possible future parallels in his career and the president's.  When Mr. Bush dropped by his department, Mr. Mosbacher pointed to the portrait of one-time Commerce Secretary Herbert Hoover hanging in his office and reminded Mr. Bush of the job to which that illustrious engineer eventually rose.  Mr. Mosbacher's blindness to ideological compass points enables him to draw power from yet-another source: congressional Democrats.  Among his social friends here are Rep. John Dingell, the Michigan Democrat who heads the powerful House Commerce Committee, and Lloyd Bentsen of Texas, the Senate's most forceful voice on trade issues.  What Mr. Mosbacher is doing with his power is nothing short of radical in a government that has long tried to eschew the coddling of peacetime industry.  Mr. Mosbacher believes that if promoting global competitiveness requires a federal policy toward industry, so be it.  He has advocated "business-led industry-government partnerships," particularly for development of high-definition television and other technology industries.  That approach, he said in a recent interview, is applicable to "all sorts of areas: space and aviation, composite-wing development, the next generation of planes and rockets, biochemistry and many other areas I haven't even thought of."  He has also proposed relaxing antitrust rules, particularly to encourage such joint ventures as the newly established consortium, led by International Business Machines Corp., for developing advanced computer memory chips.  In addition, he has vigorously used the nation's anti-dumping laws.  When Japan's Matsushita Electric Industrial Co. recently began stonewalling on the department's request for reams of information on mobile-telephone pricing, the agency simply made use of the evidence advanced by American Telephone & Telegraph Co. and Comdial Corp., a Charlottesville, Va., telephone-equipment company.  Matsushita could face heavy penalties.  Mr. Mosbacher's intervention against the Japanese has been so forceful that his third wife, Georgette, was recently asked on a business trip to Japan how she could live with such a tough guy.  His unrelenting pursuit of interventionist strategies has run afoul of some other administration officials.  After hearing of his comments to Congress on business-government partnerships, Budget Director Richard Darman and Council of Economic Advisers Chairman Michael Boskin "went ballistic," according to an administration official.  The two men complained to White House Chief of Staff John Sununu, who called a meeting at which Mr. Mosbacher was dressed down.  That cooled the commerce secretary's rhetoric but didn't change it fundamentally.  Mr. Mosbacher has suffered other defeats.  Steel import quotas weren't extended for as long as he and the nation's major steelmakers wanted.  In implementing tough provisions of the 1988 Trade Act, the president didn't come out as strongly against Japan and other nations with trade barriers as the secretary had sought.  Similarly, Mr. Mosbacher's initiative to encourage U.S. development of HDTV was quietly slapped down by the administration.  A six-page draft of a report on encouraging the industry drew "hundreds of pages of comment," according to Wayne L. Berman, a former lobbyist now serving as Mr. Mosbacher's personal counselor.  "It was a bit rough around the edges," Mr. Berman concedes.  Such disappointments don't greatly disturb Mr. Mosbacher, an eager team player and former Olympic sailing champion (whose brother successfully defended the America's Cup).  Mr. Mosbacher says he is happy to scrap one day and make up the next.  And his victories have been more notable than his defeats.  At least one friend in the Texas oil business expects Mr. Mosbacher to stretch his influence into an area beyond his department's traditional domain: the energy industry.  "We're going to have an energy problem in two to three years.  Mosbacher knows that, Bush knows that," the friend says.  Reminded that Mr. Mosbacher has recused himself from decisions involving the oil industry, the friend responds, "Yes, but in those private conversations with the president" he'll get his view across.  General Dynamics Corp. received a $112.4 million Army contract for improvements to the M-1 tank.  Lockheed Corp. was given a $64 million Air Force contract for space operations rockets and vehicles.  United Technologies Corp. got a $57.9 million Navy contract for CH-53 helicopter gear boxes.  The Defense Logistics Agency awarded jet fuel contracts to Amoco Oil Co., a unit of Amoco Corp., for $49.7 million; Conoco Inc., a unit of Du Pont Co., for $45.7 million; Fina Oil & Chemical Co. for $34.5 million; Wyoming Refining Co. for $23.7 million, and Frontier Oil & Refining Co. for $11.8 million.  Grumman Corp. won a $25.5 million Air Force contract for space operations equipment.  Computer Sciences Corp. got a $16.2 million Air Force contract for flight testrange support.  Texas Instruments Inc. was given a $12.5 million Army contract for computer research.  Hallwood Energy Partners, formerly Saxon Oil Development Partners Limited Partnership, said it completed the acquisition of the stock of Quinoco Oil & Gas Inc. and related assets from Angeles Corp., of Los Angeles, for $26.2 million.  The France Fund seems to be taking a cue from Napoleon Bonaparte's quest for an expanded empire.  After a bitter takeover battle, the fund's shareholders approved plans for the fund to change its investment thrust.  Its new strategy: to broaden its borders by investing all over Europe.  But the fund stands a far better chance of succeeding than did the former French ruler.  That's because many European nations are poised to gain from the planned 1992 unity of the continent's economic community.  Still, some fund executives urge caution, noting that Napoleon's expansion plans were foiled when he tried to stretch into Russia.  "The fund should look south, not east," quipped Thomas Herzfeld, a Miami-based investment manager.  Managed by Dillon, Read & Co., the fund will concentrate its investing in continental Europe, including Germany, France, Switzerland, Italy, Belgium and Norway.  Pending approval by the Securities and Exchange Commission, the fund will be renamed the DR European Equity Fund.  Shareholders also approved the fund's conversion from a so-called closed-end portfolio to an open-end mutual fund.  The restructuring stemmed from an unusual legal skirmish.  In March, the fund sued the controlling holders of the Scandinavia Fund, alleging an underhanded attempt to gain control.  The France Fund said it would convert to an open-end fund structure as part of a settlement dropping its suit.  Closed-end funds issue a fixed number of shares that trade on an exchange.  Open-end mutual funds continuously issue and redeem shares on demand.  The closed-ends can trade at either a discount or a premium to the value of the stocks they own; open-end shares, by contrast, are priced strictly on the basis of the portfolio's value.  It makes sense broadening the fund's base in its new format, fund specialists say.  This is because bad economic or political news in one country could trigger redemptions in an open-end fund more easily than if the investments were spread around the continent.  As an open-end fund, "it's essential they not lose their asset base," Mr. Herzfeld says.  High Voltage Engineering Corp. said it's carrying to the U.S. Supreme Court its so-far unsuccessful legal challenge of the state anti-takeover law that has blocked its hostile bid for Universal Foods Corp.  The Burlington, Mass., maker of industrial instruments and electrical parts disclosed in a Securities and Exchange Commission filing that it had petitioned the high court's review.  High Voltage, through its Amanda Acquisition unit, has a $38-a-share, or $657 million, tender offer outstanding for Universal Foods.  But the board of the Milwaukee producer of cheese and food additives has spurned the offer, as it had turned down previous, lower offers by the company.  Under a Wisconsin law passed in 1987, a bidder must have board approval, or wait three years to complete a merger, even if most of the target's shares are tendered under the offer.  High Voltage has argued that Wisconsin's law violates the commerce clause of the U.S. Constitution, and is pre-empted by federal securities law.  But the federal appeals court in Chicago ruled in May that while "Wisconsin's law may well be folly" because it injures shareholders, it is nonetheless constitutional.  Universal Foods wouldn't comment on High Voltage's latest legal move.  In composite New York Stock Exchange trading yesterday, Universal shares rose 25 cents to $34.75 each.  The National Tennis Center is in the noisiest part of this noisy city, but they found a relatively quiet spot for the Jimmy Arias-Jared Palmer first-round U.S. Open singles match Wednesday afternoon, on Court 16, in a far corner of the Queens complex.  A crowd of about 150 people, exhibiting varying degrees of interest in the contest and knowledge about the unseeded contestants, was on hand for the start.  "Haven't I heard of Arias?" a man asked the fellow next to him.  "Could be," came the reply.  "He used to be good."  The 25-year-old Arias, who used to be good, had his hands full with Palmer, a lanky, beardless 18-year-old who one day might be.  Several times Arias blew roundhouse forehands past his foe, as of former days, but more often than not the youngster would hit the first strong shot in a rally and put Arias on his heels.  The first two sets teetered on a handful of key points, most of which Palmer won.  The scores were 7-5 and 7-6.  Arias's frustration showed in set three; he threw a racket, argued a line call and mockingly shouted "Nice shot" at himself after miscues.  He hastily lost eight of the last 10 points, the set, 6-3, and the match.  "He played well, but it was mostly me," Arias said afterward.  "I was hitting great until three days ago, but today, nothing.  Fine place for things to go wrong, huh?"  Not all that long ago, Flushing Meadow truly was a fine place for Arias.  As a baseline-basher prodigy of 16, he not only became the youngest player ever to compete in the men's section of the Open, but also won his first-round match in the 1980 event.  Three years later, at age 19, he reached the semifinals, finally losing to Ivan Lendl in the Big Bowl.  That year he won four tournaments and $340,000, and ended the year ranked No. 6.  It has been downhill since for the slim, dark-eyed native of Buffalo, N.Y.  His 1983 victories -- at Florence, Rome, Indianapolis and Palermo -- were to be his last, and his year-end rankings in the next five years fell to 14, 21, 48, 34 and 106.  He came here rated 100th on the tennis computer, one spot ahead of Nicolas Pereira and a spot behind Marian Vajda.  The story of Arias's slide may be instructive as well as of intrinsic interest, because this land has been better at producing tennis prodigies than durable champions of late.  Aaron Krickstein was a Grand Prix-circuit winner at age 17 in 1983 and 61st-ranked four years later, although he has rebounded.  Andre Agassi won six tournaments last year at age 18, and none this year.  Seventeen-year-old Michael Chang won gloriously at Paris in June, but hasn't made it past a quarterfinal round since.  "Are the Americans Back?" asks a headline on the cover of a tennis magazine being hawked on these premises.  Seems we've heard that question before.  Why "the Americans" have anywhere to come back from isn't a subject the off-court-affable Arias is eager to ponder.  "You can't generalize.  Every player is different," he insists.  Yet he has noticed, as have others, that he, Krickstein, Agassi and Chang are baseliners, and that all save Chang are graduates of the Bollettieri Academy of Bradenton, Fla., the nation's foremost tennis factory.  Jack Kramer, the ex-champion and promoter, is among those who hold that the baseline game of the Bollettieri bunch makes for winners at the junior level but not among the big boys on the fast courts of Wimbledon and Flushing Meadow, tennis's showcases.  Arias takes issue with that assessment.  "Borg was a baseliner and he won Wimbledon five times.  Lendl is a baseliner, and he's won three times here," he notes.  "My problem wasn't my style," he goes on.  "I had injuries and trouble with equipment.  It was difficult to deal with the media attention.  I lost confidence, and it's been hard to get it back.  People don't realize how competitive tennis has become.  You slip a little and a lot of guys pass you."  The 5-foot-8, 145-pounder's injuries included tendinitis in his shoulder and elbow.  It started when he was riding high, and has persisted.  "I guess I played too much too soon.  I was a skinny kid who hit the ball very hard.  Maybe too hard," he says.  He says that the news-media attention that accompanied his early triumphs pleased him, but the taste quickly turned sour.  "After I'd won a few in '83, the press expected me to win 'em all," he avers.  "The next year I made a lot of quarters and semis, and played some good matches against tough opponents.  But to read the papers you'd think I was doing terrible, and I guess I started believing it.  When you're a kid, you think that way."  He adds: "You're seeing that with Agassi now.  What's he ranked, No. 6?  Why is everyone so down on him?"  Arias did, nevertheless, have real problems that didn't disappear.  Manufacturers stopped making the wood-framed rackets he grew up with, and he hit balls into the seats using his old swing with rackets with newfangled frames.  He's still not fully comfortable with them, he says.  A coach's misguided attempt to change his backhand took two months to learn and six months to unlearn.  His serve has resisted improvement and, he fears, probably relegates him to permanent scuffler's status.  "Guys like Becker and Lendl, who serve big, can win even if the rest of their games are off," he notes ruefully.  "It's a lot tougher having to battle for every point."  Arias says that last year he pondered retirement after his mother died from cancer and his match record hit bottom at seven wins and 14 losses.  Instead, he decided to lighten up, and took up golf for fun.  He's playing less tennis now and doing better, at least before Wednesday.  His match record this year is 14-14, and he has taken the likes of Lendl, Stefan Edberg and Mats Wilander to the limit in best-of-three-set matches.  He plans to marry in December, and while it's premature to discuss children, he has some advice he'll pass on if the occasion arises.  "I'd only send a kid to a tennis academy if he wanted to be a pro.  All the tennis there creates a lot of burnouts," he says.  "And I'd suggest he take up a hobby -- like golf."  Thursday, August 31, 1989  The key U.S. and foreign annual interest rates below are a guide to general levels but don't always represent actual transactions.  PRIME RATE: 10 1/2%.  The base rate on corporate loans at large U.S. money center commercial banks.  FEDERAL FUNDS: 9% high, 8 7/8% low, 8 15/16% near closing bid, 9% offered.  Reserves traded among commercial banks for overnight use in amounts of $1 million or more.  Source: Fulton Prebon (U.S.A.) Inc.  DISCOUNT RATE: 7%.  The charge on loans to depository institutions by the New York Federal Reserve Bank.  CALL MONEY: 9 3/4% to 10%.  The charge on loans to brokers on stock exchange collateral.  COMMERCIAL PAPER placed directly by General Motors Acceptance Corp.: 8.50% 28 to 32 days; 8.775% 33 to 59 days; 8.625% 60 to 89 days; 8.25% 90 to 119 days; 8.125% 120 to 149 days; 8% 150 to 179 days; 7.625% 180 to 270 days.  COMMERCIAL PAPER: High-grade unsecured notes sold through dealers by major corporations in multiples of $1,000: 8.875% 30 days; 8.80% 60 days; 8.675% 90 days.  CERTIFICATES OF DEPOSIT: 8.33% one month; 8.32% two months; 8.30% three months; 8.27% six months; 8.26% one year.  Average of top rates paid by major New York banks on primary new issues of negotiable C.D.s, usually on amounts of $1 million and more.  The minimum unit is $100,000.  Typical rates in the secondary market: 8.85% one month; 8.80% three months; 8.80% six months.  BANKERS ACCEPTANCES: 8.73% 30 days; 8.62% 60 days; 8.53% 90 days; 8.48% 120 days; 8.40% 150 days; 8.35% 180 days.  Negotiable, bank-backed business credit instruments typically financing an import order.  LONDON LATE EURODOLLARS: 9% to 8 7/8% one month; 9% to 8 7/8% two months; 9% to 8 7/8% three months; 9% to 8 7/8% four months; 9% to 8 7/8% five months; 9% to 8 7/8% six months.  LONDON INTERBANK OFFERED RATES (LIBOR): 9% one month; 9% three months; 9% six months; 8 15/16% one year.  The average of interbank offered rates for dollar deposits in the London market based on quotations at five major banks.  FOREIGN PRIME RATES: Canada 13.50%; Germany 8.50%; Japan 4.875%; Switzerland 8.50%; Britain 14%.  These rate indications aren't directly comparable; lending practices vary widely by location.  TREASURY BILLS: Results of the Monday, August 28, 1989, auction of short-term U.S. government bills, sold at a discount from face value in units of $10,000 to $1 million: 7.94% 13 weeks; 7.88% 26 weeks.  FEDERAL HOME LOAN MORTGAGE CORP. (Freddie Mac): Posted yields on 30-year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days. 10.14%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.625%, 2% rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  FEDERAL NATIONAL MORTGAGE ASSOCIATION (Fannie Mae): Posted yields on 30 year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days (priced at par) 10.08%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 9.10%, 6/2 rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  MERRILL LYNCH READY ASSETS TRUST: 7.96%.  Annualized average rate of return after expenses for the past 30 days; not a forecast of future returns.  Gannett Co. said it sold its El Diario-La Prensa Spanish-language daily newspaper in New York to a group including its publisher.  Terms weren't disclosed, but industry sources close to the sale said the price was close to $25 million.  Gannett acquired El Diario in 1981 for a reported $10 million.  For Gannett, the sale signals the company's withdrawal from the Hispanic market, where it once envisioned expanding El Diario into a national paper.  The sale of the 60,000-circulation newspaper is also the first sign that Gannett Chairman and Chief Executive Officer John Curley is willing to sell off properties acquired and nurtured under his predecessor Allen Neuharth, who resigned as chairman of the Washington-based media giant in March.  Gannett sold El Diario-La Prensa, New York City's largest Spanish-language newspaper, to El Diario Associates, a New York-based limited partnership.  The partnership is headed by Carlos Ramirez, 43 years old, publisher of El Diario-La Prensa since 1984, and Peter Davidson, 30, who until last month was a newspaper industry investment banker in Morgan Stanley's Media and Communications Group in New York.  The other principal is Rupert Phillips, president of Hometown Communications of Destin, Fla., the publisher of daily and weekly newspapers in several southern states and Kansas.  Gannett, one of the largest newspaper publishing groups with 83 dailies, once considered expanding El Diario into a national publication or using it as an insert for Gannett daily newspapers in states with large Spanish-speaking populations.  The expansion, however, never materialized, according to industry analysts.  "At one time Gannett had great plans for the paper, it seemed," said John Morton, newspaper analyst for Lynch, Jones & Ryan.  Hylton Philipson, president of Henry Ansbacher Inc., the New York-based media investment banker, said Gannett appears to have overestimated the opportunities in the Hispanic marketplace.  "Hispanics are one of the fastest-growing special-interest groups in the country, but I think Gannett learned that Spanish language is not a single market," said Mr. Philipson.  "It is fragmented and has many varying interests depending on the country the reader is from.  Costa Rica, Puerto Rico, and Colombia all represent different markets."  Mr. Philipson also said the sale is a signal that Gannett's Mr. Curley is willing to "rethink" Gannett's ownership of certain properties that were "sacred cows under the old regime."  Mr. Curley was traveling and couldn't be reached for comment.  Mr. Davidson of the purchasing group denied industry analysts' contentions that the newspaper is unprofitable, but declined to elaborate.  He said both circulation and advertising linage are increasing.  Mr. Davidson, who will act as president of the newspaper, said he had been seeking to invest in a newspaper, "and when I became aware of this, I saw it as an amazing opportunity."  Citing theft problems and increased reserves for bad debts, Egghead Inc. reported a first-quarter loss of $5.2 million.  In the year-ago period, the retailer of personal-computer software posted a loss of $161,000.  The year-ago period was restated to reflect a change in accounting.  Sales in the quarter ended July 31 rose 49% to $122 million from $82 million.  Egghead, once a Wall Street favorite, said it expects a loss in the current quarter as well, although a spokeswoman wouldn't be specific about how much.  Egghead attributed the first-quarter loss, in part, to theft by customers and employees.  The company also said lack of inventory controls contributed to its woes.  Egghead said it established new procedures for inventory accounting and established an internal audit team to combat internal theft, and is testing surveillance systems to battle customer theft.  The firm, which expanded too quickly, said it increased its reserve for bad debts but wouldn't be specific.  In addition, the company set up a $600,000 reserve for expected legal expenses related to a shareholder class-action suit filed in July and a Securities and Exchange Commission inquiry announced in August.  The suit claims shareholders were damaged as a result of misstatements made before Egghead went public, while the SEC inquiry focuses on activities of the company from January 1988 until its public offering in June 1988.  The company has said the shareholder claims are without merit.  However, Egghead said it believes other cases, making similiar charges, may be filed.  Egghead also said results in the quarter were hurt because a higher portion of total sales came through direct sales channels, which have lower margins than retail sales.  Egghead has seen more than a year of rapid growth and management shake-ups, culminating in a loss of $12.1 million for the fiscal year ended April 1.  Rapid expansion, write-downs, accounting changes and employee theft were blamed.  During the first quarter, Egghead opened 10 new retail stores and closed two, finishing the period with 204 stores.  The company wouldn't predict when it may return to profitability.  In national over-the-counter trading, Egghead closed at $10.75, up 25 cents.  Visitors to Istanbul often sense a second, invisible layer beneath the city's tangible beauty.  This invisible stratum that shapes the surface is the residue of all the history that has passed through here over the centuries during which the late Roman empire dissolved into the florid decadence of Byzantium and later the Ottomans, and finally turned fully Turkish and nervously modern as Istanbul.  Along the way, this mysterious place has been crucial in world affairs, and is luxuriant in stories.  Many of the best of these tales take place during World War II, when Istanbul was a center for international intrigue.  Austrians, Americans, Czechs, Germans, Russians, Hungarians, Turks, Zionists and Italians flitted through the city's ancient streets selling and buying secrets in the clandestine information bazaar.  Barry Rubin's "Istanbul Intrigues" (McGraw-Hill, 301 pages, $18.95) lifts at least a few of the city's veils.  While he is not the compelling storyteller we might have hoped for, the material is too rich to ruin and Mr. Rubin has worked well to uncover so much.  Subtitled "A True-Life Casablanca," the book describes Istanbul as the glamorous hothouse of dispossessed European nobility, of diplomats and nightclubs, refugees and saboteurs.  As the German war machine rolled inexorably through the Balkans down to the Turkish border, the forces of conspiracy settled on Istanbul, the last haven.  Unlike in World War I, the Turks insisted on neutrality, and the book is a tacit testament to their standfastness, nothing short of a miracle under the circumstances.  They did it, in part, by allowing a free rein to the contending intelligence services, thus making Turkey more valuable out of the conflict.  Still, neutral though they were, the Turks leaned toward the Allies, as Mr. Rubin often points out, quoting a Royal Navy commander as saying, "The assistance given by Turkey is entirely in keeping with its position as an ally."  Allied agents had an easier time using Turkey as a base against Axis operations in the Middle East.  In contrast to the Cold War era of institutionalized espionage, this was in many ways still a time of individual operators and passionate amateurs, often eccentric and not always gifted.  Shaped by older codes of chivalry, they move through "Istanbul" like sad dinosaurs.  The British ambassador to Turkey, for instance, couldn't bring himself to believe that his own valet, code-named Cicero, was one of the highest placed Axis agents in the war.  One of the problems the American OSS (Office of Strategic Services, the precursor of the CIA) had in Istanbul was controlling one of its self-styled contacts: the flamboyant, naive and wealthy American George Earle, who liked to tout his friendship with Roosevelt and ogle pretty Mata Haris of dubious allegiance at local nightclubs.  The Nazi and Soviet operatives were cut from different, newer material.  Their overlords were, after all, already creating new orders and "modern" social systems, and their actions were more pitiless and impersonal.  Of all the Allies, the Soviets were predictably the most ruthless.  In 1942, their agents tried to blow up German ambassador Franz von Papen on a street in Ankara, which, like all of Turkey, was neutral territory.  The bomb went off prematurely, spattering passers-by with the bombers' remains.  Mr. Rubin suggests the American OSS in Istanbul took first prize for gullibility.  Against all advice, the OSS persisted in using notorious double agents for the most sensitive tasks.  For instance, the OSS helped organize the Hungarian government's attempted surrender to the Allies in 1944.  But since the Germans had been alerted to the plan, they moved in first with half a dozen divisions.  While the Hungarians escaped by the skin of their teeth, members of the Austrian underground assisting in the venture were betrayed by the double agents and killed.  The book is full of such incidents, and it is engrossing stuff, even when Mr. Rubin doesn't tie the story strands together very well or reveals an Orientalist bias that threatens to undermine his history.  He tries to convince us that Arab nationalism was fostered by Nazism, outlining a few rather tenuous connections to that end.  The Arab cause was primarily anti-colonial and it was the British who were the colonizers.  Above all, Mr. Rubin is weakest on the Turks.  He mentions everywhere that Turkish security was astoundingly well-informed, and gives numerous examples.  Well, how did they do it, and who were they?  He states tantalizingly that a Turkish newspaper was the first to reveal the secret development of the atomic bomb, without giving us any details.  He asserts that the Turks probably knew of spy valet Cicero's activities before anyone.  They did, and he should have asked the relevant Turkish officials -- many are still alive.  The Turks helped save thousands of Jews, handing out passports in such places as Sicily.  This needs to be underscored, in a book that often cites Allied neglect of the Jewish plight.  The Turks were invaluable to the Allied cause.  In a book about their own country they deserve to be more than mere extras.  ---  Mr. Kaylan is a free-lance writer based in New York.  If George Bush gives the drug speech he's expected to give Tuesday night, he'll finally have presented the country an anti-drug strategy worthy of the name.  He'll also be endorsing the inspired madness in the political method of Washington's most interesting public figure, "drug czar" William Bennett.  Bill Bennett is fascinating because he's so disdainful of Washington's conventional political limits.  Most cabinet members (e.g., Attorney General Richard Thornburgh) are heralded as skilled for figuring out the prevailing political interests and then somehow accommodating them.  Mr. Bennett would rather force those interests to accommodate him.  In his favorite metaphor for Washington -- football -- he insists on "playing offense" and "moving the ball," lest others first move it on him.  With his drug strategy, Mr. Bennett and his band of neoconservative aides are moving the ball less against one political constituency than against an entire world view.  "We're trying to change the terms of debate," he says, much as he did earlier as education secretary.  He wants to hold all drug users accountable for the problem, not just the Medellin cartel or local dealers.  The cocaine addict of tomorrow is the casual user of today, he's found; he wants to stigmatize the casual user.  He sees merit in traditional drug treatment and in pursuing cartels, too, but his centerpiece is street-corner law enforcement -- more certain arrest, more certain punishment.  Like Pogo, he thinks the public now understands that the drug problem is us, our appetite for drugs, and wants to respond accordingly.  "We've seen this hardening of public opinion.  It's happened very quickly," says the man who grew up in the Age of Aquarius and once had a blind date with one of its victims, Janis Joplin.  "The culture is changing."  Mr. Bennett's strategic departure is radical enough that it even had to be sold to many in the Bush administration.  The Justice Department, fond of high-profile "kingpin busts," resisted the down-and-dirty street-level approach.  Others resisted Mr. Bennett's revolutionary notion that the strategy itself be held accountable, judged by survey results of future drug use.  And while George Bush has embraced Mr. Bennett's ideas, the first draft of his Tuesday speech turned out by the White House staff was largely a rehash of old drug cliches.  A White House used to reacting and playing defense can't quite believe Mr. Bennett has given it a chance to play offense.  The Bennett strategy has also turned the tables on Congress.  Created by Sen. Joe Biden (D., Del.), among others, the "drug czar" was supposed to whipsaw the executive into pursuing congressional priorities.  Shortly after Mr. Bennett's nomination, Sen. Daniel Patrick Moynihan called to tell him that the czar's job was simply to expand drug-treatment spending, a form of pork-barrel.  But Mr. Bennett has called Congress's bluff.  The members' usual agenda of "spend more" won't be enough, especially since the Bennett strategy also calls for more than $1 billion in new spending.  If they do take on Mr. Bennett, Democrats will find an opponent well-armed for argument.  The drug czar is at his best when carving up reigning pieties, such as the one that blames "root causes" for the drug problem.  "When you get a difficult social problem, there are always those who want to make up the most difficult answers," he says.  The language of sociology -- with its excuses and "victims" -- has corrupted the way we look at social ills.  Poverty, family breakdown, poor schools -- these are all problems.  But while we wait to solve them, lives are being lost.  Drugs, especially crack, have made parts of our inner cities a Hobbesian world, a "state of nature," where life is "solitary, poor, nasty, brutish and short."  The first duty of government in that world is to take back the streets, to "ensure domestic tranquillity," as Mr. Bennett puts it.  Since the buying and selling of drugs is a market, the duty of government is to disrupt the market wherever it is.  "If a mother doesn't want to send her child to school because of drug activity in the streets, how can you worry about root causes?"  Mr. Bennett asks.  In the notorious case of Dooney Waters, a Washington, D.C., crackhouse child, social workers well knew Dooney's predicament.  They just didn't dare risk their lives in the state of nature that is a crack house.  In the inner city, Mr. Bennett sees a new "invisible man," stealing novelist Ralph Ellison's famous metaphor to describe the majority who don't do drugs or join gangs.  They are the victims government should protect.  Mr. Bennett wants nothing less than to rehabilitate the notion of "individual responsibility."  In drug users, many have preferred to see only victims; Mr. Bennett sees offenders first, violaters of the social contract.  He wants sanctions -- names in the newspaper, boot camps, loss of welfare benefits -- as a form of community stigma as much as punishment.  Liberals, and conservative legalizers, will object, but the public seems fed up enough to try it.  Whether the public also has the stomach to follow through when the going gets tough, even Bill Bennett isn't sure.  "That's the question I'm asking. . . .  It's going to be hard.  Arresting the mayor's son, the kid next door," he muses.  "But if we're serious about it, I don't think it will have to be very hard for very long.  Because people will stop using drugs."  He's that rare public official who's willing to risk his reputation in order to try.  General Motors Corp. expects to resume production soon of its Oldsmobile 88 model at the Wentzville, Mo., plant after a two-week hiatus, a company spokeswoman said.  GM had temporarily halted production of the car Aug. 17 and reduced the hours of Wentzville's workers, who also were assigned to work on other models.  The auto maker took similar measures at its factory in Flint, Mich., but production of the Olds 88 resumed there last Monday.  The two plants employ a total of 9,800 salaried and hourly workers.  GM said it closed the Olds 88 assembly lines because of a materials shortage, but declined to give details.  As of July 31, GM had a 66-day supply of the Olds 88, a little above the 60-day supply considered desirable.  The Olds 88 is essentially the same car as the Buick LeSabre, which has been outselling the 88 ever since the LeSabre was rated highly in a consumer survey earlier this year.  As previously reported, Ford Motor Co. plans Tuesday to resume building Thunderbirds and Mercury Cougars at its plant in Lorain, Ohio, after a one-week shutdown because of slow dealer orders.  Ford also has previously announced that it will close its Taurus-Sable plant in Chicago for five work days, starting today.  Nationwide, the nine domestic auto makers planned to produce 121,326 cars this week, compared with 136,771 cars the year-earlier week.  So far this year, the auto makers have built 4,668,203 cars, down a bit from the 4,681,845 cars built by this time in 1988.  @ This Last Yr.  Ago -Yr. to Date- %  @ Week-e Week-r Week 1989 1988 Chg.  @GM 61,802 54,651 67,908 2,122,503 2,207,241 - 4  @Ford 21,017 34,809 31,400 1,172,473 1,229,355 - 5  @Chrysler 16,900 19,087 19,556 624,750 692,027 -10  @Honda 6,230 5,179 7,318 253,704 249,328 + 2  @Nissan 2,724 2,628 2,898 79,455 73,333 + 8  @Nummi* 2,300 4,079 3,287 137,612 112,274 +23  @Mazda 4,340 3,900 4,404 150,487 82,448 +83  @Toyota 3,420 3,791 0 82,689 0 d  @Diam.Star 2,593 2,856 0 44,530 0 d  @Industry 121,326 130,980 136,771 4,668,203 4,681,845 x  @ d-Percentage change is greater than 999%. e-Estimated. r-Revised. x-Includes Volkswagen domestic production to July 1988. *Includes Chevrolet Prizm and Toyota Corolla.  Moody's Investors Service Inc. said it lowered its ratings on about $909 million of securities of this utility and its funding corporations.  The rating concern said the downgrades reflect continued deterioration of El Paso Electric's already thin cash position, which is primarily attributable to increased construction costs and to the costs of outages at the Palo Verde nuclear plant.  Ratings were lowered on El Paso Electric's first mortgage bonds to Ba-2 from Baa-3, preferred stock to single-B-1 from Ba-1, and commercial paper to not prime from prime-3; on Del Norte Funding Corp.'s secured lease obligation bonds to Ba-3 from Ba-1; and on El Paso Funding Corp.'s unsecured lease obligation bonds to single-B-1 from Ba-2.  Moody's also said the company's long-term debt and preferred stock ratings remain under review for further possible downgrade, pending resolution of its liquidity problem.  A stipulated rate moderation plan has failed so far to generate anticipated revenue, leaving the company with a thin cash position and forcing it to suspend payment of its common dividend.  The government is about to take a step that will raise questions for manufacturers and consumers about the latest trend in health-oriented cereals.  The Food and Drug Administration is expected to ask General Mills Inc., and perhaps Kellogg Co. as well, to prove that the amounts of an esoteric Asian grain they're putting in new high-fiber cereals are safe to eat -- even though millions of Americans consume the ingredient daily in laxatives.  A letter is being drafted by the FDA asking General Mills to prove that the husks of psyllium seeds in its new Benefit cereal present no long-term health risk, people familiar with the case said.  Just this week Kellogg also introduced a cereal with the husks -- and is testing another -- meaning it is also likely to get a letter.  There is no indication that the FDA believes psyllium represents a potential health hazard.  In fact, psyllium is the primary ingredient in such popular laxatives as Metamucil and Fiberall.  But as yet the agency hasn't determined what it considers a safe level of psyllium in cereals.  Right now, the only FDA standard for psyllium in food allows one-half of 1%, by weight, in ice creams and other frozen desserts.  A spokeswoman for Minneapolis-based General Mills said yesterday that while the company has no knowledge of the FDA's position, "We will cooperate with them with whatever information they are requesting."  The FDA wouldn't comment on its intentions, but a spokesman said that it often notifies companies when they "put something into food that the FDA doesn't consider to be generally accepted as safe."  The company can respond with supporting data, file a formal petition for a safety ruling or ignore the request, he said.  As a last resort, the agency can go to court and seek authority to seize a product.  Before it introduced Benefit in April, General Mills funded a University of Minnesota study that found psyllium apparently helped to reduce blood cholesterol.  In seeking verification that psyllium is safe in cereals, the FDA may ask for other research, however.  While numerous studies have focused on soluble fiber's effect on cholesterol, little has been done on the long-term effect of eating psyllium.  The use of psyllium poses another issue for the FDA: Should it permit the grain's reputed cholesterol-lowering property to be touted in advertisements for products?  Procter & Gamble Co., which is the largest U.S. user of psyllium husks, raised that question soon after General Mills rolled out Benefit.  Psyllium is a major ingredient in P&G's Metamucil laxative, but so far the FDA has refused to approve a P&G request to advertise the grain's cholesterol-lowering property.  In rejecting P&G's request, the FDA said: "From a safety point of view, the effects of long-term treatment with psyllium hydrophilic mucciloid on . . . metabolism of minerals and fat-soluble vitamins have not been clearly determined."  P&G has submitted several studies -- including one done by the same researchers as those on the Benefit study -- showing that psyllium can reduce blood cholesterol.  Larry Bell, who worked on one such study, published in the Journal of the American Medical Association in June, concluded that "for many people with elevated cholesterol levels, daily doses of psyllium combined with the proper diet may be all the therapy they need to control their high cholesterol."  In protesting General Mills's claims for psyllium, P&G pointed out to the FDA that boxes of Benefit advise consumers to "start with one-half serving of Benefit and gradually increase to a full serving."  Moreover, P&G said, consumers are directed to "consult a doctor and avoid laxatives" if use of the cereal results in "digestive discomfort."  In a letter to the FDA in June, P&G said that a review of Benefit and its promotional materials "reinforce the conclusion that the product is a drug pretending to be a food."  There was no indication as to when the FDA might rule on P&G's contention.  The matter of timing is clouded because one arm of the agency deals with food issues while another is responsible for drugs.  Before introducing Benefit, General Mills notified the FDA that the product would contain psyllium, the company said yesterday.  The spokeswoman also noted that the company had researched psyllium before including it in Benefit and had concluded "psyllium is a common grain that's been in use with consumers across the country for at least 30 years."  A spokesman for Kellogg, which introduced its Heartwise cereal earlier this week, yesterday also defended the grain's use.  "We feel very comfortable," he said.  "We've done our homework and we consider psyllium GRAS."  GRAS is an acronym for Generally Recognized as Safe, an FDA standard for food ingredients.  India, the world's primary source of psyllium, recently raised the price of husks to $3 a kilo from about $2.20 a kilo, a move that grain brokers say effectively halted imports into the U.S.  But P&G and other large users are believed to have several months' supply of psyllium stockpiled.  The deadline for Cie.  Industrielle Chairman Jean-Marc Vernes to submit a counteroffer to Cie.  Financiere de Suez's takeover bid expired last night without Mr. Vernes giving any indication of his plans.  Suez is offering 15.9 billion francs (US$2.42 billion) for the holding company.  Mr. Vernes is reported to have met discreetly with stock market regulatory officials a few hours before the expiration of the midnight deadline.  But he declined to confirm that the meeting had occurred or its purpose.  "I won't say anything until tomorrow morning," Mr. Vernes said in a brief telephone interview.  He said he would give a radio interview this morning to disclose his position.  Mr. Vernes had been given until midnight to put together a counterbid to Suez's double-barreled offer for Cie.  Industrielle and its main asset, the insurer Groupe Victoire.  The two bids have a combined value of 23.7 billion francs, by far the largest takeover ever attempted in France.  Analysts estimated that a counterbid by Mr. Vernes for both companies would cost him approximately 31 billion francs, and some speculate he has had trouble finding allies to put up that much money.  Meanwhile, financial sources say that top executives of West German insurer Colonia Versicherung AG, which was just acquired by Victoire, will be in Paris tomorrow to express their displeasure about the fight for control of Victoire.  Some financial sources speculate they will try to push for an agreement between Mr. Vernes and Suez.  Fred Meyer Inc., Portland, Ore., reported that net income for the second quarter ended Aug. 12 fell 30% to $7.4 million, or 30 cents a share.  The general merchandise retailer said net was hurt by an 82-day strike by grocery department workers at nine of its Seattle stores and a 10-day strike at its main distribution center in Portland, Ore.  It said the labor problems were resolved by the end of the quarter.  Costs related to a corporate reorganization also cut into profit.  Sales rose 3.2% to $487.7 million from $472.5 million a year earlier.  In the year-earlier quarter, Fred Meyer earned $10.6 million, or 44 cents a share.  For the first six months, net fell 19% was $13.2 million, or 53 cents a share, compared with $16.3 million, or 67 cents a share, the year earlier.  Sales rose 7% to $1.1 billion from $1 billion.  The company also said it expects to soon complete a refinancing of part of its floating rate bank debt through a private placement of $50 million of five-year, zero-coupon debt that carries fixed rates.  Guardian Royal Exchange PLC, a major British insurer, posted a first-half pretax profit decline of 10% to #100.1 million ($157.9 million) from #111.7 million a year earlier, largely because of a tripling in underwriting losses.  Profit after tax and minority interests fell 13% to #60.7 million, or 7.2 pence a share, from #70 million, or 8.7 pence a share, a year earlier.  Total premium income rose 18% to #976 million from #828.5 million.  Guardian will pay an interim dividend of four pence a share, up 14% from the 1988 interim payout of 3.5 pence.  First-half underwriting losses rose sharply to #48.7 million from #11.5 million a year earlier.  Guardian said these losses in Ireland were #22.5 million, or 46% of total losses, owing to a "sudden and significant increase" in the frequency of auto claims.  Year-earlier underwriting losses in Ireland were #1.5 million, or 13% of total losses.  Some analysts faulted Guardian's recent rapid expansion in Ireland.  Guardian said it had a #900,000 underwriting loss on British activities, a reversal from the #10.7 million gain there a year earlier.  Underwriting losses widened in Australia, Canada and the U.S.  Barely four years after passing laws aimed at pressuring big companies into severing ties with South Africa, several American cities are finding they've managed little more than to complicate their own business.  In fact, of the city officials and company executives interviewed, none could name a single major contract that was denied because of a company's ties to South Africa, where the government continues its internationally condemned policy of racial separation.  The idea sounded simple: If companies retained links with South Africa, cities would deny them contracts, and thus pressure them to cut those ties.  Implementing that policy has been another matter.  Most municipal officials underestimated not only the difficulty of discerning corporate ties to South Africa but also the complexity of defining which ties are acceptable and which aren't.  Those aren't the only complications.  Most municipal services come from small companies with few foreign ties of any kind, so the new laws were essentially aimed at multinational companies.  Yet some laws apply only to small contracts -- leaving the multinationals unscathed.  And in some places where the rules apply to even the biggest transactions, cities are finding they need big companies more than big companies need them.  "We call it the IBM problem," says Ibrahim Gassama of Transafrica, a lobbying group based in Washington, D.C.  The computer giant, which retains significant ties with its former South African subsidiary, is a tough supplier to avoid because of its dominant position in mainframe computers.  "We get calls all the time from various localities trying to tighten up their laws.  Cities from San Francisco to Pittsburgh have this problem."  A New York City law, for example, flatly bars the city from buying goods that originate in South Africa, such as diamonds, gold or sardines.  But it doesn't cover companies whose parents have units in South Africa -- links known as "brother-sister" relationships -- or substantial business ties there.  It also doesn't cover nonownership relationships such as licensing, trademark and franchise agreements held by giants including General Motors Corp., Ford Motor Co. and International Business Machines Corp.  In addition, a supplier of, say, office products, doesn't have to vouch for the manufacturer of the goods it sells, because the law covers only the immediate contractor.  "If a parent had a company called Apartheid Inc. in South Africa, and they had a subsidiary here called Apartheid USA, the city could contract with it," fumes Manhattan Deputy Borough President David DeLeon.  Until June, local anti-apartheid measures also were hitting snags with the U.S. government.  The Transportation Department threatened to cut off funding for various projects in states where sanction measures were deemed "exclusionary and discriminatory" for bidders, in violation of federal rules.  When the department moved to cut off $125 million in funds for a Seattle transit project, Senator Brock Adams (D., Wash.) pushed through a rider barring such interference.  Determined to overcome such obstacles, some cities already are rewriting their laws.  Miloanne Heckathorn, a consultant for Oakland, Calif., studied laws in 25 localities last year when Oakland decided to tighten its 1985 law.  Under its ordinance, Oakland tries to avoid contracts with companies that it lists as doing business in South Africa.  The list, redrawn by Ms. Heckathorn last year, covers license and franchise agreements, though it still doesn't touch brother-sister companies.  As a result, more Apple Computer Inc. and Compaq Computer Inc. personal computers have been put on city desktops, because neither company is on the sanction list.  This denies some sales to IBM, where price and performance are roughly comparable.  But Ms. Heckathorn concedes the law hasn't denied any major contracts to big companies because another provision requires the city to accept the lower bid -- even from a company on the sanction list -- if the next bid is more than 5% higher.  "If {a competitor} is 8% above General Motors' price, General Motors would get the contract," she says.  "Basically the ordinance says the city is willing to pay only up to 5% more" to implement its social policy.  GM sold its South African unit, renamed Delta Motor Corp., but the firm operates under a licensing and supply agreement with GM that, supporters of South Africa sanctions say, vitiates the effect of the divestiture.  Even so, Ms. Heckathorn feels Oakland's law has the potential to work because it gives companies that don't have South African connections an edge over those that do.  If that edge hasn't been enough to deny a major contract, Ms. Heckathorn says, it's because Oakland couldn't afford to put a high enough preference figure in the law.  Joel Copperman, a New York City contracting official, says trying to penalize offending companies while not damaging the purchasing process can be a tough balancing act.  "If you made it so that {the law barred} all the auto manufacturers, then what would you do?" he asks.  "The city has to buy cars.  You have to find the balance that encourages them to get out of South Africa without having a law that amounts to nothing."  Still, Mr. Copperman says he knows of no "significant cases" where the city wasn't able to buy from the low bidder because of its South Africa law.  The situation frustrates many city officials.  David Dinkins, Manhattan borough president and a mayoral candidate, wants New York to stop granting service and purchase contracts to Minnesota Mining & Manufacturing Co., which has a subsidiary in South Africa.  Easier said than done: The city looked hard and found an alternative microfiche reader-printer from Eastman Kodak Co., but it cost twice as much.  "And the service 3M supplies on this is phenomenal," says a city official familiar with the procurement problem.  Under New York's law, if a company can't certify that it is free of significant ties to South Africa, and if its bid isn't more than 5% lower than that of a company without such ties, the Board of Estimate can choose to give the contract to the "clean" bidder.  But if an agency determines that no other "clean" company can provide goods or services comparable to those of a South Africa-linked company, it can ask the Board of Estimate to approve a contract with the company.  Hence, companies like 3M can still get the business.  "The tougher the law, the more opportunity for a safety valve you have to have," says George Wolfberg, chief administrative analyst with the Los Angeles city administrative office.  He calls New York's law "a tough statement with nothing to back it up," but his city's statute may not have much more bite.  Los Angeles amended its statute last month to cover franchise and distributorship relationships.  Now, a supplier has to certify that neither it nor the maker of the goods it sells either owns or has other substantial interests in South African companies.  A sanction-list company won't be considered unless its bid is 10% below a "clean" company, up from 5%.  To get around that law, a city agency must request a waiver from the city council, arguing that the desired item is essential and can't be procured except from the sanction-list company.  But the Los Angeles effort has a major loophole: It doesn't apply to goods costing more than $25,000, though services are covered.  "And there doesn't seem to be anything we can do about it," Mr. Wolfberg says.  Kloeckner-Humbold-Deutz AG, saying it has met its goal for the first half, said its net loss was cut to 30 million Deutsche marks ($15.4 million) from 90 million marks in the year-ago period.  Sales slipped 2% to 2.03 billion marks from 2.08 billion marks, largely because of a 7% drop in domestic sales, which fell to 689 million marks from 741 million marks.  Foreign sales were fractionally higher at 1.35 billion marks from 1.34 billion marks a year earlier.  The West German farm machinery and engineering concern, repeating an earlier pledge that it expects to reach at least a "black zero" for the full year, said in an interim report to shareholders that order inflow rose 5% to 2.28 billion marks, from 2.18 billion marks a year earlier.  Back orders as of June 30 stood at 1.80 billion marks, up 7% from 1.68 billion marks a year earlier.  KHD has undergone a massive restructuring program that entailed cutting its work force 22% to 18,751 employees in 1988 from 24,075 at the end of 1987.  In the first half of 1989, its staff had been reduced further to 18,388.  Financial markets slogged through another dull round of pre-Labor Day trading that saw stock prices and the dollar post some modest gains while bond prices slipped.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average climbed 9.12 points to 2737.27 in thin trading.  But news reports that the Transportation Department might move to limit leveraged buy-outs and mergers in the airline industry tripped up the Dow Jones Transportation Average, sending it down 20.10 points from Wednesday's record level.  Bond prices moved lower and the dollar strengthened on expectations that a batch of economic reports today will show the U.S. economy humming along at a strong but sustainable rate of growth.  A decline in the use of computer-assisted stock trading programs kept prices in a narrow range and volume lackluster.  But the small gains made were enough to reassure traders that the overall trend remains strong.  They expect activity and prices to pick up next week as money managers return to their offices and begin plotting strategy for the rest of the year.  Bond and currency traders are focusing on two important reports this morning that will provide the first major clues to how the economy performed in August.  The employment report is expected to show a gain of 70,000 in non-farm payrolls and a modest rise in the jobless rate to 5.3% from 5.2% in July, consistent with healthy economic growth.  Apparently to avoid confusion when the data are released, the Labor Department already has said that analysts should add 108,000 jobs to the payrolls number to offset the effects of strikes at regional telephone companies.  But while the employment report probably will show an expanding economy, the national purchasing managers' survey is expected to indicate that the manufacturing sector remains relatively sluggish.  In major market activity:  Stock prices rose in light trading.  Volume on the New York Stock Exchange totaled 143.4 million shares.  Advancing issues on the Big Board were ahead of losers, 801-672.  Bond prices slumped.  The Treasury's benchmark 30-year bond lost about a quarter of a point, or more than $2.50 for each $1,000 face amount.  The yield on the issue rose to 8.20%.  The dollar was up against other major currencies.  In late New York trading, the dollar was quoted at 1.9668 marks and 145.00 yen, compared with 1.9544 marks and 144.30 yen late Wednesday.  Why Send a Person  To Do Radiation Work?  WHEN THERE'S a radiation leak at a nuclear plant, who wants to go check it out?  Scientists at the University of Michigan are developing a robot-mounted camera to do the job.  While devices exist to detect and measure radioactive contamination, the Michigan camera sees, or rather, senses where radiation is coming from.  Radiation leaks are normally invisible, but the camera contains chemical substances that are sensitive to gamma rays.  The camera can process the radiation detected by the substances and convert the impulses into a color image displayed on a television screen.  The intensity of the color indicates the level of gamma radiation and the presence of other types of radioactive contamination.  Because gamma rays can penetrate most metals, the camera could detect them without dismantling pipes or containers.  Researchers hope the camera, being developed under a three-year, $491,000 Energy Department grant, will "keep people out of dangerous radioactive environments," says David K. Wehe, assistant professor of nuclear engineering.  But not for a while: The camera's picture ability and durability still need improvement.  "We're three years from turning it over to an industrial partner," he says.  Fiber-Optic Technology  Turns to Gyroscopes  IT TOOK THREE decades for a new technology to challenge mechanical, spinning-wheel gyroscopes in navigation systems.  But just as that technology -- called "ring-laser gyros" -- starts to win wide acceptance, along comes an even newer technology to rival it.  The upstart is the fiber-optic gyroscope.  Gyroscopes, when combined with an accelerometer and a computer, enable aircraft, ships and a variety of unmanned vehicles to measure speed, direction and exact location.  Ring-laser gyros determine the angle at which a vehicle is moving by measuring the differences in speed of two counter-rotating beams of light inside a mirrored, gas-filled path.  When a laser gyroscope is still, each light pulse takes the same time to travel the distance.  In motion, one light beam takes longer, indicating a rotation in pitch, roll or yaw.  In the newer fiber-optic gyroscopes, light pulses travel in opposite directions around a spool of optical fiber.  Litton Industries Inc., which already makes ring-laser gyroscopes, is working on fiber-optic devices and views them as potentially cheaper and more durable than ring-laser gear.  The telecommunications industry has made optical fiber relatively inexpensive, and the need to seal in the gas makes ring-laser gyros fragile and limits their life span.  Litton and Honeywell Inc., another company developing fiber-optic gyros, say the devices may initially take over simpler tasks in backup aircraft navigation systems, tactical missiles and "smart" munitions.  Both companies are testing fiber-optic gyros in aircraft guidance systems.  Next month, Litton will deliver to the Army a 1.2-inch-diameter fiber-optic gyro designed to guide an experimental artillery shell.  The fiber-optic gyro beat out a laser device for use in the experimental shell because it was considered sturdier.  "Within three years we'll see fiber-optic gyros starting to replace laser gyros in certain applications," says A. David Klein, a Litton executive.  Scientists Pick Camera  To Detect Apple Bruises  TO KEEP A FEW bad apples from spoiling the barrel, scientists are developing a computer-aided camera system to spot defective fruit.  Packing and processing inspectors currently scrutinize apples rolling past them at a rate of six per second.  Many injured apples go undetected because bruises often take time to show up on the fruit's skin.  Researchers at the Agriculture Department say a system using cameras aided by computer software could spot blemishes before browning occurs and help packers sort the produce according to color, size and grade.  A similar camera system is already used for oranges, but apples require more sophisticated technology because they have more natural variations.  Government scientists in Kearneysville, W.Va., are experimenting with a video camera to examine Red Delicious apples through a lens filter.  The method breaks down a light beam into its individual colors, or wavelengths.  When a light beam is directed at the apples, bruised areas can be detected because they reflect less of certain beams.  The system is still a few years from market, the researchers say.  Odds and Ends  THE FBI ENLISTED a camera originally meant for plant-cell study to do some sleuthing.  Designed by University of Illinois scientists, the camera produces digitally constructed images of plant cells.  But because of the camera's ability to clarify details, the FBI requested that it be used on a blurry bank security photograph taken during a robbery.  Investigators now know the criminal sports a goatee. . . .  Seventeen timber bridges will be built by the Pennsylvania Transportation Department this year to test a theory that old-fashioned wooden bridges, because they don't rust, may be more cost effective than modern steel structures. . . .  Zenith Electronics Corp. introduced a voice-controlled PC system for quadriplegics.  But the workstation, using a voice recognition system by Prab Command Inc. is pricey: $21,990, or $49,990 with a robotic arm and printer.  Astra AB, a Swedish pharmaceutical company, reported a 23% increase in first-half pretax profit to 916 million kronor ($138.8 million), or 6.15 kronor (93 cents) a share, from 745 million kronor, or 4.90 kronor a share, a year earlier.  Sales increased 21% to 3.63 billion kronor from three billion kronor.  New-product launches accounted for six percentage points of the growth in sales, the company said.  Astra said all major product groups had good growth.  Sales of the cardiovascular agent Seloken, Astra's biggest-selling product, rose 5%, and sales of the anti-asthma agent Pulmicort increased 60%.  Astra's pretax profit was in line with market expectations.  Managing director Hakan Mogren said he expects Astra's favorable earnings and sales trend to continue the rest of the year, though not at the same high rate as in the first half.  TV: An Act III Communications Inc. subsidiary agreed to buy WUTV in Buffalo, N.Y., from Citadel Communications Co. for about $46 million.  Act III, 80%-owned by TV producer Norman Lear, also said it intends to buy the programming of competing Buffalo station WNYB; those terms weren't released.  In turn, Niagara Frontier Broadcasting Partnership will sell WNYB to Tri-State Christian Broadcasting and then, it is expected, invest in Act III.  PUBLISHING: Italy's Cie.  Industriali Riunite stepped up its stake in publisher Arnoldo Mondadori Editore S.p.A., squelching rumors that media executive Silvio Berlusconi was attempting a takeover.  CIR Chairman Carlo De Benedetti raised his ownership of preferred shares, which can be converted into ordinary shares and have voting rights on certain issues, to 71% from 51% previously.  Lincoln N.C. Realty Fund Inc. said Bank of New York approved refinancing of an existing loan, and extended the real estate investment trust an additional $1 million loan.  The new $9.2 million loan matures Dec. 31, 1990.  Phillips Petroleum Co. said operations resumed at its polyethylene, polypropylene and K-resin plastics manufacturing facility that was shut down late last week following an explosion.  The energy concern also said that one of five workers injured in the explosion died at a Houston-area hospital, and three others remained hospitalized.  The plant is near the Houston Ship Channel.  Spain's state industrial holding company, Instituto Nacional de Industria, is negotiating with a number of foreign companies for the possible sale of its Empresa Nacional de Autocamiones S.A., or Enasa, trucks unit, a spokesman confirmed.  AB Volvo of Sweden, DAF Trucks B.V. of the Netherlands and MAN AG of West Germany are among several firms that have made offers for the Spanish trucks producer, the INI spokesman said.  Enasa, which makes trucks, buses and armored military vehicles, was created in 1946 from the remnants of the defunct Hispano Suiza auto company.  After years of heavy losses and various unsuccessful attempts to find a purchaser, Enasa recently has shown a financial improvement, owing to cost-cutting and a more aggressive commercial strategy.  Last year, Enasa reduced its loss to 5.5 billion pesetas ($45 million) from a year-earlier deficit of 12.1 billion pesetas.  Revenue rose to 116 billion pesetas from 104 billion pesetas.  This year, Enasa expects a further narrowing of its loss or a small profit.  MetPath Inc., a medical-clinical laboratory, agreed to acquire Universal Diagnostic Laboratory Inc., a clinical laboratory based in Brooklyn, N.Y., for $10 million.  MetPath is a unit of Corning Glass Works.  Savin Corp., Stamford, Conn., agreed to pay $6 a share of arrearages, a total of nearly $1.6 million, on its Series A preferred stock.  The agreement reached with two dissident directors calls for Savin to pay the dividends in cash or stock, at the company's option.  The agreement is subject to approval by holders of two-thirds of the 263,709 shares outstanding.  The dissident directors, Andrew South and John Vida, hold 43% of the Series A.  The pact also calls for the copier distributor to pay Messrs.  Vida and South as much as $3,000 of legal fees.  And the company won't contest a verdict in small-claims court in San Francisco, giving Messrs.  South and Vida certain directors' fees.  Savin Chairman David Sadler said he is "very confident" that the agreement will be approved by Series A shareholders.  Mr. South, who with Mr. Vida owns a San Francisco investment firm, said, "We are very happy about {the agreement}, and I think it will help the company."  Robert Whittredge, vice president and treasurer at Savin, said the company last paid a dividend on the Series A in August 1985.  In November 1985, the company suspended the payout.  Around that time, the executive said, Savin announced the cancellation of a manufacturing project; it took some write-offs and suspended the dividend to conserve cash.  Dong-ah Construction & Industry Co. said it was chosen for a $5.31 billion construction project in Libya.  Choi Won Suk, chairman of Dong-ah Group, a South Korean business conglomerate, signed an initial contract in Tripoli after the company beat competitors from the U.S., Japan, West Germany, France, Britain and India, Dong-ah officials said.  The contract calls for the South Korean company to lay a 680-mile concrete waterway to carry two million tons of water a day to Tripoli from a huge underground reservoir in southern desert areas, they said.  Dong-ah had been favored to win the contract since it took on the first stage of the waterway project in 1984.  The project has been divided into five stages, with an estimated total cost of $27 billion.  The latest contract comes under the second stage.  The South Korean company said it wants to complete work on the first stage by 1991 and the second stage by 1998.  Centel Corp. said its Centel Cable Television Co. unit completed the $211 million sale of its Ohio cable television operations to Time-Warner Inc.'s Warner Cable Communications Inc.  Centel in March announced plans to sell six cable operations for about $1.4 billion.  The latest sale, combined with the completed sale of Centel operations in Michigan and central Florida, brings total proceeds to $671 million.  Centel has also announced agreements to sell operations in southeastern Florida, Illinois and Kentucky.  Those sales, totaling $760 million, are expected to close early in the fourth quarter.  Ramada Inc., Phoenix, Ariz., said the New Jersey Casino Control Commission unanimously approved the company's restructuring plan.  The restructuring calls for Ramada to sell its lodging business to New World Development Co. of Hong Kong for $540 million, and to distribute cash and shares in the remaining casino company, to be renamed Aztar Inc., to Ramada shareholders.  The transaction, which Ramada expects to complete on or about Sept. 21, has already been approved by Ramada holders and Nevada gambling regulators.  Ramada said it filed registration statements with the Securities and Exchange Commission for offerings of three Aztar debt issues totaling $400 million.  Aztar expects to issue in mid-September $130 million in subordinated reset notes, $100 million in senior subordinated notes and $170 million in first mortgage notes.  The first mortgage notes are secured by assets in Atlantic City, N.J., including TropWorld Casino & Entertainment Resort.  Salomon Brothers Inc. is underwriting the offerings.  They aren't exactly trendy just yet.  But in their struggle to regain respect around the dinner table, Maine's potato farmers are trying to shed their hidebound image.  In short, the state's potato growers and dealers have discovered that marketing counts -- even in the unglamorous world of agricultural produce.  More Maine growers are shipping potatoes in clear plastic bags, instead of the old-fashioned, peephole-equipped paper sacks.  Many are scrubbing the spuds, too, rather than shipping them with a layer of Down East soil.  The state has instituted a quality-control program, with participating packers using an official state logo.  And a new law gives producers a financial incentive to label the variety in each sack, so that names such as Katahdin might aspire to the cachet that now adheres to, say, a Cabernet Sauvignon wine -- or, at least, to an Idaho potato.  The marketing push comes none too soon for Maine's once pre-eminent potato industry.  The state's 600 or so remaining potato farmers planted 81,000 acres this year, about the same as last year but down from 113,000 acres a decade ago.  The No. 1 potato-producing state for many years before the rise of big irrigated farms in the Northwest, Maine last year ranked third nationally behind Idaho and Washington with output of 22 million hundredweight, or 2.2 billion pounds -- less than one-fourth the volume of Idaho's crop.  There are signs, though, that the long slide is ending.  The amount of Maine land devoted to potatoes, which dropped steadily for decades, has stabilized in the past two years.  And Maine potato farmers last year enjoyed one of their most profitable seasons in many years, partly because of poor weather in some other states.  "We've got a lot more work to do, but we feel pretty good about" the progress so far, says Dwight Sewell, executive director of the Maine Potato Board.  "We think we've bottomed out."  Still, Maine has a long way to go to regain its past glory.  And state promoters fear that Maine's homely, round-white varieties are now viewed as poor cousins of the elegant, oblong russets closely identified with Idaho.  Maine and other states grow russets, too -- in fact, Maine die-hards insist theirs taste better -- but the short New England growing season often prevents them from reaching the size of Western potatoes.  To bolster the image of the state's potatoes, the Maine Potato Board has devoted its advertising and promotional budget solely to the quality theme for the past two years.  But at roughly $500,000 a year, the budget is only about one-tenth the size of Idaho's, industry people say.  "Idaho has done an incredible job in their advertising campaign," says Alan Kezis, associate professor of agricultural and resource economics at the University of Maine.  "If you go out to a white-dining-cloth restaurant, you're never going to see a round white," says Mr. Kezis.  "That has shaped the consumer's view."  Surveys and focus-group studies, however, found some openings for Maine promoters.  Some studies showed that consumers -- at least in East Coast surveys -- actually prefer the taste of round whites, but tend to look down on them as "generic" commodity items.  Promoting varieties could solve that problem, researchers suggest.  A relatively recent variety, the Shepody, developed in the Canadian province of New Brunswick, has gained popularity as an alternative to the russet for baking and french fries.  Last year, Burger King Corp. agreed to use Maine-grown Shepodies for french fries -- a public-relations coup for the state, which has long battled to overcome fast-food companies' concerns about the quality of its product.  Researchers also have drawn attention to a new variety, the FL657, developed by PepsiCo Inc.'s Frito-Lay division for use in potato chips.  Partly because of Maine's interest in developing it as a general-use potato, Frito-Lay has agreed to release the yellow-fleshed potato for public use this year, the company says.  In one university-sponsored consumer study, the FL657 held its own against the popular Russet Burbank, whether baked, boiled or mashed.  A lot of growers "are going heavy to the 657," says Roland Buck, 75-year-old patriarch of Prairie View Farms, a 250-acre spread in the central Maine town of Corinna.  It's "a very-good-yielding, very-good-storing" potato, he says.  Certain other high-yielding varieties are another matter.  Some advocates of labeling hope the practice will discourage production of the Ontario, a prolific round white that "you can throw against the wall" without bruising, says Mr. Kezis.  Growing the Ontario, asserts Mr. Buck, "is the worst thing that Maine has ever done."  It turns mushy when cooked and darkens after it's been sitting on the table awhile --just the kind of thing that has blackened the image of all Maine potatoes, he says.  Some elements of Maine's marketing plan have run into resistance.  Safeway Stores Inc., for instance, still insists on unwashed, paper-sacked Maine potatoes for its East Coast stores, on the theory that they keep better under those conditions. (That creates something of a headache for Mr. Buck, who must disengage his scrubbing equipment when he bags potatoes for Safeway.) Maine growers say more stores are coming to prefer plastic sacks, however, since they let shoppers inspect the goods more closely and don't harm the potatoes so long as the stock is managed carefully.  And Maine's modernization efforts are continuing.  Seed-potato growers are trying to crack the Venezuelan and other foreign markets.  A new state law calls on Maine farmers and packers to use the industry-standard hundredweight measure, instead of the traditional 165-pound "barrel" unit unique to Maine.  And, in a high-tech fillip, the University of Maine last month cosponsored at Bar Harbor the First International Symposium on the Molecular Biology of the Potato.  British Columbia Telephone Co. and Northern Telecom Ltd. said they formalized an accord to form a new company that will market certain telecommunications products including network systems.  The companies said the new concern will have initial annual sales of about 45 million Canadian dollars (US$38.2 million), and will be based in the Vancouver suburb of Burnaby, where British Columbia Telephone is now based.  The concern, which requires federal regulatory approval, will be 51%-owned by Mississauga, Ontario-based Northern Telecom, a telecommunications equipment maker, and 49%-owned by British Columbia Telephone, a unit of Stamford, Conn.-based GTE Corp.  In a related pact, Northern Telecom agreed to acquire the switching business of British Columbia Telephone's manufacturing unit, Microtel, including its Brockville, Ont. operations.  The Brockville operations will be operated as Brock Telecom Ltd., a unit of Northern Telecom.  Terms weren't disclosed.  The following issues were recently filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission:  Caere Corp., proposed initial offering of 1.9 million common shares, of which, 1.1 million are to be sold by the company and 800,000 by holders, via Alex.  Brown & Sons Inc. and Wertheim Schroder & Co.  Citicorp, shelf offering of up to five million preferred shares, via: Merrill Lynch Capital Markets; Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc.; and Dean Witterr Reynolds Inc.  Imperial Oil Limited, 70%-owned by Exxon Corp., shelf offering of up to $500 million of debt securities.  InterVoice Inc., proposed offering of 1.3 milion common shares, via William K. Woodruff & Co. and Robertson, Stephens & Co.  Lifetime Corp., offering of 1.8 million common shares, via Salomon Bros.  Inc. and Prudential-Bache Capital Funding.  Reynolds Metals Co., shelf offering of up to $300 million debt securities.  Canadian steel ingot production totaled 286,110 metric tons in the week ended Saturday, down 2.5% from 293,566 tons a week earlier and up 24.3% from 230,119 tons a year earlier, Statistics Canada, a federal agency, said.  A metric ton is equal to about 2,204.62 pounds.  For this year through last Saturday, output totaled 10,374,443 tons, up 8% from 9,603,121 tons a year earlier.  Tokyo stocks closed easier in thin dealings but recovered from their worst levels toward the end of the day.  London stocks finished slightly higher in hesitant trading.  Traders in Tokyo said the key Nikkei index was down because of declines for large-capitalization issues such as steels, shipbuildings and constructions.  Fund managers said institutional investors, especially those who close their midyear books in September, stayed on the sidelines rather than risk losses in the directionless market.  Some individual investors and small- and mid-sized corporate investors turned their attention to merger and acquisition-related issues and smaller-capitalization issues in an effort to turn quick trading profits, but this activity wasn't enough to make up for the losses caused by the large-capitalization issues.  The Nikkei index of 225 selected issues was down 40.46 points at 34431.20, but up from the intraday low of 34244.43.  The index fell 215.99 points Wednesday.  In early trading in Tokyo Friday, the Nikkei index added 51.50 points to 34482.70.  Thursday's volume on the First Section was estimated at 650 million shares, up from 519 million Wednesday.  Declining issues outnumbered advancing issues, 552 to 375, while 179 remained unchanged.  The Tokyo Stock Price Index (Topix) of all issues listed in the First Section, which fell 8.56 points Wednesday, was down 3.69 points, or 0.14%, at 2603.38.  The Second Section index, which gained 23.14 points Wednesday, was up 29.76 points, or 0.89%, to close at 3365.30.  Volume in the second section was estimated at 30 million shares, unchanged from Wednesday.  The approaching settlement for a rash of steel shares bought on margin last February when steels were rising also depressed prices, traders said.  Other losers included paper and pulps and electric powers.  Sony and Pioneer gained but Kyocera and Matsushita continued to suffer from the impact of downward revisions by several brokerage firms of their earnings, traders said.  Among notable gainers Thursday were retailers, which were boosted by speculation about possible mergers and acquisitions.  The speculation, which was first excited last month when Shuwa tried to buy and merge two medium-sized retail chain operators, had faded from memory, but was revived, traders said, by Tuesday's announcement of plans to merge by Taiyo Kobe Bank and Mitsui Bank.  The speculation was fueled by the knowledge that restructuring of Japan's distribution system will be a subject of discussion at the U.S.-Japan structual adjustment conference scheduled to open in Tokyo on Monday.  The advance was led by Isetan and Sogo on a rumor that Shuwa has been accumulating shares of these two issues, traders said.  Isetan was up 30 yen (21 cents) at 3,720 yen ($25.77).  Sogo gained 110 to 1,800.  Thursday's losers included steels, which had been sluggish due to fading expectations of lower interest rates both in the U.S. and Japan and declining U.S. demand.  Nippon Steel shed 6 to 793.  NKK was down 10 at 770.  Kawasaki Steel fell 17 to 840.  Kobe Steel was down 19 to close at 753.  Sumitomo Metal lost 11 to 763.  At London, share prices ended higher but down from intraday peaks, as the market drifted.  The market opened firmer and then rallied on unsubstantiated rumors that a U.S. corporate finance specialist was considering taking a large stake in United Biscuits.  However, buying interest wilted at higher levels, encouraging several players to take profits.  A lackluster opening on Wall Street provided little incentive for the London market to push higher, dealers said.  The Financial Times-Stock Exchange 100-share index ended up 6.6 points at 2387.9, but down from an intraday high of 2394.3, a rise of 13 points.  At its lowest, the index touched 2384.6.  Near-term, traders reckon the key FTSE 100 index will be hard pressed to breach the psychologically important 2400-point level.  Dealers said the market is cautious ahead of a series of interim company earnings reports due in coming weeks, which might confirm fears of a slowdown in U.K. corporate profitability.  "This market's been driven by speculative stories and so no one wants to be reminded of the fundamentals," one dealer said.  The narrower Financial Times 30-share index ended up 6.7 points at 1977.6.  Most buying interest tended to focus on a few stocks that have recently tempted speculative interest.  United Biscuits was the main star, ending 10 pence (15.7 cents) firmer at 398 pence ($6.28) on the back of rumors that Kohlberg Kravis Roberts, the corporate finance group that recently declared an intention to buy as much as 15% of Britain's BTR, intends to make a similar declaration to U.S. regulators on United Biscuits.  However, traders tended to discount the rumor, doubting KKR's ability to make a move.  "There are several rumors like this circulating in the market all the time," one trader said.  "This one is currently the most fashionable."  Rolls-Royce rallied 6 1/2 to 198 as players ruminated on the implications of plans to raise the limit on foreign ownership in the company to 29.9% from a previous 15%.  Dealers said the stock's continued rise was part of a general re-rating.  "Rolls has underperformed the market for some time and is now recovering," one dealer said.  British Aerospace also was strong, rising 17 to 713 on buying following its announcement Wednesday that it has won a Japanese order for several jets against fierce competition.  Elsewhere, stocks closed higher in Paris, Frankfurt, Zurich, Amsterdam, Stockholm and Milan and mixed in Brussels.  South African gold stocks closed lower.  Share prices closed higher in Singapore, Taipei, Manila and Wellington, were mixed in Hong Kong and lower in Seoul and Sydney.  Here are price trends on the world's major stock markets, as calculated by Morgan Stanley Capital International Perspective, Geneva.  To make them directly comparable, each index is based on the close of 1969 equaling 100.  The percentage change is since year-end.  @ % This  @ Aug 30 Aug 29 Year  @ U.S. ................. 322.6 321.7 + 26.0  @ Britain .............. 714.1 714.9 + 30.8  @ Canada ............... 435.9 434.3 + 18.7  @ Japan ................ 1530.8 1540.1 + 7.8  @ France ............... 537.0 535.9 + 21.3  @ Germany .............. 250.7 251.5 + 20.6  @ Hong Kong ............ 1860.9 1849.0 - 8.3  @ Switzerland .......... 233.3 238.0 + 34.9  @ Australia ............ 356.2 357.0 + 22.7  @ World index .......... 537.7 537.2 + 8.7  Assets of money-market mutual funds edged up to $343.4 billion in the week ended Wednesday following a decline to the lowest level since January.  The increase of $53.7 million compares with the usual weekly swings of $1 billion to $3 billion in total fund assets in recent months.  The Investment Company Institute, a Washington trade group, tracks the levels and reports them to the Federal Reserve weekly.  "The rapid buildup of money-market fund assets over the past several months slowed last week to a crawl, as a modest decline in institutional holdings was more than offset by moderate increases in assets of general-purpose and broker-dealer funds," said Jacob Dreyer, vice president and chief economist at the Investment Company Institute.  The small asset move wasn't surprising, Mr. Dreyer says.  "What was really surprising was the continuing strength {of asset inflows} until the previous week," he said.  So far in 1989, assets have swelled about $65 billion and stand at a record.  Earlier this week, Donoghue's Money Fund Report of Holliston, Mass., reported that the average seven-day compounded annual yield dipped to 8.64% in the week ended Tuesday from 8.66% the previous week.  Short-term yields on Treasury bills edged up, however, at the weekly auction on Monday.  "There was nothing in interest rate movements to spur larger asset flows since the configuration of yields on various short-term instruments has remained virtually unchanged for about a month," Mr. Dreyer said.  The Investment Company Institute tracks 464 funds.  The 142 institutional funds lost $380.9 million to $85.33 billion in the most recent week.  The general-purpose fund and broker-dealer fund categories, those used by individuals, each posted a rise.  The 227 general-purpose funds climbed $124.3 million, to $109.91 billion, while the 95 broker-dealer funds added $310.3 million, to $148.16 billion.  Leaking inside information doesn't always lead to alleyway exchanges of suitcase-sized payoffs or even involve above-average levels of greed.  Consider the case of Robert A. Rough, a former director of the Federal Reserve Bank of New York.  He made nothing from leaking to a New Jersey government securities trader inside information about the discount rate, at which the Federal Reserve lends to banks and other financial institutions.  It's an important rate that can influence stock and bond prices, but in recent years it hasn't been as important to investors as other signals of the Fed's monetary policy.  In June, Mr. Rough, who served as a director of the New York Fed from 1982 to 1984, pleaded guilty to one count of bank fraud.  He was indicted last December on seven counts of wire, securities and bank fraud.  This week, a sentencing memorandum to the judge handling the case provided details of how Mr. Rough passed along privileged information -- and made nothing from it.  Mr. Rough admitted that he leaked to Gilbert Schulman, then president of the brokerage firm of Bevill, Bresler & Schulman Inc., the New York Fed's discount rate recommendations to the Federal Reserve in Washington.  It's believed to be the first case in which inside information about the discount rate was leaked.  Bevill Bresler, based in Livingston, N.J., traded heavily in government bonds and other securities before it collapsed in April 1985.  Former officers of Bevill Bresler, including Mr. Schulman, were later convicted of siphoning millions of dollars from the company.  Had Mr. Rough pleaded innocent but then been found guilty, he could have been sentenced to a maximum of 29 years in jail and fined as much as $141,000.  As it is, he could get a maximum of five years in jail and a $10,000 fine when he is sentenced Sept. 13.  But the prosecutor in the case recommends leniency.  In a memorandum filed with Judge Dickinson R. Debevoise in Newark, N.J., Assistant U.S. Attorney Paul A. Weissman asked that Mr. Rough be sentenced to no more than a year in jail.  Michael Himmel, Mr. Rough's attorney, had recommended probation for his client.  He described the government's memorandum as unique because it made strong arguments against a long sentence.  The U.S. attorney's office in Newark declined to comment on why it recommended a lenient sentence.  But the memorandum depicts Mr. Rough as a reluctant tipster who, motivated by friendship or a vague belief that he might advance his career, leaked confidential information to Mr. Schulman.  Mr. Rough, the government noted, sought no immediate gain from the arrangement and ultimately did not benefit by it.  Also, according to the memorandum, Mr. Rough may have convinced himself that the information was not as valuable as Mr. Schulman believed.  The New York Fed's recommendations often weren't followed by the Federal Reserve, but Mr. Schulman and his partners relied on the information for almost six months before they learned that the information wasn't always useful.  Mr. Rough and Mr. Schulman had been friends since the early 1970s.  Mr. Schulman and his company had borrowed money from National Bank of Sussex County, of which Mr. Rough was the president before he joined the New York Fed in early 1982.  Even then, Mr. Schulman's company was reeling from the loss of several million dollars from speculating in Treasury bonds and Treasury bond futures.  "Schulman and his colleagues do not appear to have used the information in a very sophisticated manner, and may well have profited less by it than others in their position would have done," the memorandum said.  On at least seven occasions from spring 1982 to November 1984, Mr. Rough briefed Mr. Schulman about the board's recommendations.  When Mr. Schulman learned about the limited value of the information in late 1983, he persuaded Mr. Rough to analyze the recommendations.  But the analysis wasn't enough to give Mr. Schulman and his partners the edge they had sought.  Bevill Bresler approved loans totaling $47,000 to Mr. Rough in 1983.  But the government couldn't prove that the loans were payment for the inside information.  "Rough himself, the government believes, never traded on any confidential information," the memorandum said.  It said: "Nor did he accept, or even ask for, any monetary payment in return for the information he gave Schulman and BBS."  Live Entertainment Inc. said it retained an outside law firm to assist the company in "conducting an internal review" after the recent murder of the company's chairman and chief executive officer, Jose E. Menendez, and his wife, Kitty.  The company said it retained Paul, Weiss, Rifkind, Wharton & Garrison, a New York law firm.  Live "wants to know whether there is any relationship between the murder and the company's operations," a spokesman said.  Live Entertainment has purchased two companies in the past three years from individuals whom law enforcement authorities have identified as having ties to organized crime.  These purchases, along with the fact that the Aug. 20 killings were described by a coroner's investigator as appearing to be "a hit," have raised questions about whether the murders were connected to organized crime.  Company officials have dismissed that possibility as "bizarre and offensive."  In a statement announcing the hiring of the law firm, Live said that "many of the rumors which are the subject of press speculation are frankly absurd."  However, the spokesman said, "Ultimately, they {company officials} don't know the answers."  A murder investigation is being conducted by the Beverly Hills Police Department, which has declined to divulge any details of the inquiry.  However, sources familiar with the investigation have said it appears that two assailants walked into the house and fired multiple gunshots at Mr. and Mrs. Menendez as they were seated on a couch in front of a television set.  Live Entertainment is 48%-owned by Carolco Pictures Inc. and the shares of both companies have fallen since the murders.  Yesterday, Live Entertainment closed at $15.75, down 75 cents, in over-the-counter trading.  On the Friday before the Sunday night murders, the stock closed at $21.  Yesterday, Carolco closed at $9, unchanged, in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange; that Friday before the murders, Carolco closed at $10.25.  Richard Borisoff, a partner at the law firm retained by Live Entertainment, wouldn't comment on the focus of the internal review.  "There's nothing we can say at this point.  We will try to learn as much as we can."  Live Entertainment is a major distributor and retailer of video and audio entertainment.  Carolco finances, produces and leases motion pictures.  Carolco is known for action pictures such as "Rambo III" and "Extreme Prejudice."  Separately, Carolco said it is arranging a new $100 million three-year revolving credit facility with a syndicate of banks led by Bankers Trust Co.  The existing credit line is for $35 million.  Carolco described the increased credit line as a "sign of faith Carolco has received from the credit marketplace."  Carolco said it hopes to have the credit arrangements signed by late this month.  Carolco didn't specify how the credit line will be used and company officials didn't return phone calls.  However, the company has been negotiating to buy De Laurentiis Entertainment Group for more than $30 million.  Carolco was also rumored to be in talks to buy another company shortly before the murders.  In its statement, Live Entertainment reiterated that it conducted an "unusually careful and exhaustive" due dilligence process before completing its purchase of the Strawberries retail music chain this year.  Live Entertainment said the review didn't identify any questionable practices or improprieties.  The company also reiterated that it hasn't had any connection to the pornography business.  Live Entertainment said its International Video Entertainment unit was purchased from an individual who previously had a separate ownership interest in a company producing pornographic material.  Hudson's Bay Co. said it plans to issue about 12.6 million shares in a rights offering to fund the redemption of about 263.6 million Canadian dollars ($223.8 million) of convertible preferred shares and to reduce short-term debt.  The new shares would have an indicated value of C$425.3 million at current prices, but Hudson's Bay said they would be offered at a discount to market prices.  Hudson Bay has 31 million ordinary shares outstanding.  No Hudson's Bay ordinary shares traded on the Toronto Stock Exchange yesterday.  The previous close was C$33.75.  The company said the rights offering will entitle holders of its ordinary shares, except residents in the U.S. and Britain, to subscribe for two additional shares for every five shares held.  It said the record date has been tentatively set for Nov. 7.  Hudson's Bay said that Woodbridge Co., which currently holds about 73% of the ordinary shares, will subscribe for all the shares to which it is entitled and for any shares that aren't otherwise taken up.  Woodbridge is a holding company owned by Toronto's Thomson family.  Hudson's Bay said it plans to redeem its 9.5 million Series H preferred shares at C$27.75 a share on Oct. 31.  Each Series H share would have been convertible into 0.6944 ordinary shares.  It said it will hold a meeting of shareholders on Oct. 26 to approve the transactions.  Hudson's Bay, based in Toronto, is Canada's largest department store operator.  American Healthcare Management Inc. said it was informed that Bain Capital and Merrill Lynch Capital Markets have ended their plan to purchase the company.  The company said it will proceed with its own reorganization plan, which calls for a combination of notes, common stock and warrants to be issued to its bank group, general unsecured creditors and subordinated unsecured creditors.  Dallas-based American Healthcare is operating under Chapter 11, which protects a company from creditors while it tries to work out a plan to pay its debts.  Bain Capital is a unit of Bain & Co., Boston; Merrill Lynch Capital Markets is a subsidiary of Merrill Lynch & Co., New York.  In July, a U.S. Bankruptcy Court approved a reorganization plan for the hospital-management concern calling for Bain and Merrill Lynch to pay American Healthcare creditors $210 million in cash and $10 million in preferred stock and to assume about $68 million in debt.  Creditors were to have received between 42.5 cents and 70 cents for each dollar owed by American Healthcare.  Eastern Airlines faces a month or more of difficult negotiations with its creditors to work out changes to its bankruptcy-law reorganization plan that will compensate for the huge gap in its projected cash position.  At a meeting in New York, Eastern, a unit of Texas Air Corp., formally informed creditors that if its plan isn't modified, its year-end cash position would be nearly $800 million shy of projections, people who attended the session said.  The gap primarily reflects the failure of some planned asset sales to materialize.  In addition, Eastern has encountered some higher-than-expected expenditures.  The long-ailing airline has been under Chapter 11 protection since March.  Without changes to the original reorganization plan approved by creditors last month, Eastern theoretically would be out of cash before year end.  Previously, Eastern had projected having $774 million in cash on hand by the end of the year for operating purposes.  However, Eastern expects to work out changes in that plan acceptable to creditors that will produce a positive cash balance of around $400 million, Rolf Andresen, chief financial officer, said in an interview.  Mr. Andresen also said that the airline's operating performance is running somewhat ahead of expectations, which should help its cash position.  The major problem is that Eastern hasn't been able to sell its South American route network, which creditors valued at about $365 million.  The carrier now intends to operate those routes itself.  It also hasn't been able to sell its Miami maintenance base and certain other assets.  And, creditors said, Eastern is spending some $300 million more this year than anticipated, mostly in its efforts to restart operations crippled by a strike March 4.  Members of Eastern's creditors committee expressed displeasure but not outrage following yesterday's meeting.  One lawyer said, "Today was the beginning of resolving the problems."  The creditors plan to examine the revisions Eastern proposed yesterday and then to sit down with the airline again.  Several creditor-representatives predicted that process would take weeks.  They said Eastern made a number of proposals to make up for the cash gap, though it isn't known how fully they have been developed.  Among the ideas offered for creditor evaluation were:  -- Raising $100 million in the financial markets.  The form any such effort would take couldn't be determined.  -- Dropping plans to prepay a total of around $200 million of debt.  The airline hoped to prepay that debt so it could use the collateral behind it to secure some $240 million of currently unsecured debentures held by the public.  -- Finding a way for its parent, Texas Air, to provide all or part of a $99 million payment due Eastern's pension plan Sept. 15.  Creditors indicated they want Eastern to pay at least $25 million.  Eastern wouldn't discuss details of what it told creditors.  "What we presented to them is an update," Mr. Andresen said.  He noted that the original plan submitted in July was based on assumptions because it was made before the airline began to vigorously rebuild.  "The rebuilding of the airline is going very well," he said.  Eastern said it still expects a pretax profit next year, now estimated at $62 million instead of $25 million.  It projected 1991 pretax profit of $140 million, $195 million for 1992, and $224 million for 1993 -- all close to or slightly above earlier targets.  The revision of the reorganization plan will delay court confirmation of the plan.  ---  Bridget O'Brian contributed to this article.  Santa Monica Partners proposed that Bel Fuse Inc. consider making a rights offering to shareholders to raise funds.  In a letter to Elliot Bernstein, president and chief executive officer of Bel Fuse, Lawrence Goldstein, a Santa Monica Partners general partner, objected to Bel Fuse's plan to sell 15% to 20% of the company to an Employee Stock Ownership Plan.  He also asked Bel Fuse to reconsider the New York investment firm's $7.50-a-share, or $36.8 million, takeover plan, which Bel Fuse rejected.  Bel Fuse, a Jersey City, N.J., maker of electronic parts, proposed to establish the ESOP to raise funds to acquire the FilMag unit of Sprague Technologies Inc. Bel Fuse proposed a price of the lower of $5.25 a share or the appraised value on the sale date.  Mr. Goldstein said he hadn't yet heard from Mr. Bernstein, who couldn't be reached for comment.  In national over-the-counter trading yesterday, Bel Fuse shares closed unchanged at $6.25.  The nation's big retailers reported mixed results for August, reflecting cautiousness on the part of consumers and a continuing shift in spending to apparel from big-ticket durable goods.  The August sales figures, which rose an average of about 5% for stores open at least a year, modestly outpaced inflation.  But sales at many big chains weren't as buoyant as the numbers suggest because they reflect comparisons with weak year-earlier results.  "August sales appeared stronger than they actually were, mainly because August was one of the worst months last year," said Jeffrey Edelman, an analyst at Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.  While noting that consumer spending is still growing, Mr. Edelman said, "We're past the point where we're going to see dynamic sales increases."  Walter Loeb of Morgan Stanley & Co. agreed.  Sales of back-to-school merchandise were strong in August, he said.  But Mr. Loeb maintained that "the consumer is cautious and we're heading for a slow-growth period."  He predicted that, in the second half of the year, sales will rise only 1 to 1.5 percentage points more than the inflation rate, which he pegs at about 3.5%.  "The Christmas season could be no better than the inflation rate," he added.  Apparel specialists and department stores that depend heavily on sales of clothing rang up the biggest sales gains in August.  But general merchants whose inventories contain more furniture, appliances and other big-ticket durable goods didn't fare as well.  Wayne Hood, an analyst at Prudential-Bache Securities Inc., attributed the strength in apparel sales partly to lower inflation.  For the first seven months of this year, he said prices rose an average of just under 2% for women's and girls' clothing, compared with a 5.3% increase in the same period a year earlier.  "As long as we have low inflation," he said, "I think apparel is going to continue to do very well."  Drexel's index of 40 companies' sales at stores open at least a year illustrates the trend.  Drexel's overall index rose 5.3% for August, a faster pace of growth than the 4.6% gain in July.  But sales at apparel specialists and shoe stores increased a healthy 7.2% and sales at department stores and discount chains rose 5.3%.  Sales at specialty stores that carry appliances and other durable goods increased only 2.7%.  PaineWebber Inc.'s index of 20 companies' sales at stores open at least a year, meanwhile, rose 5.2% in August.  J.C. Penney Co., Dallas, said "record" sales of children's merchandise and young women's and men's clothing helped boost sales at stores open at least a year by 15.7%.  Although August sales exceeded the company's plans, Penney noted that it had expected a strong gain for the month because of its weak performance a year earlier.  Apparel specialists, Gap Inc. and Limited Inc., also posted big gains.  Gap's sales at stores open at least a year rose 15%, while Limited's increased 7%.  Wal-Mart Stores Inc., the Bentonville, Ark.-based discounter that is growing rapidly, rang up an 11% gain in same-store sales.  And Woolworth Corp., which said its back-to-school season started off strong, posted a 7.8% increase in same-store sales.  Dayton Hudson Corp., which operates department stores and the Target discount chain, posted a more modest 5.1% gain in same-store sales.  May Department Stores Co., meanwhile, said same-store sales at its department stores and shoe stores rose 6.5%.  May's Caldor and Venture discount chains, which the company considers discontinued operations because it is trying to sell them, posted a 4.9% increase in same-store sales.  But Sears, Roebuck & Co., the nation's largest retailer, disappointed analysts with a 1.1% decline in sales at U.S. stores open at least a year.  The Chicago-based chain said slow sales of some categories of durable goods, including furniture, home improvement products, hardware and automotive products, offset gains in apparel, home appliances and home electronic goods.  Same-store sales inched up only 0.8% at Montgomery Ward and 1.5% at K mart, the nation's second-largest chain.  Ward said its apparel division posted a "double-digit" sales increase.  But it blamed cool weather for sluggish sales of seasonal merchandise such as air conditioners and said the "slowdown in the economy" hurt sales of other big-ticket goods.  @ ---  @ Four-week August period  @ a-'89 sales '88 sales b-%  @ millions millions change  @ Sears .................... 2,197.9 2,176.0 + 1.0  @ Wal-Mart ................. 2,122.0 1,686.0 + 26.0  @ K mart ................... 1,968.8 1,881.6 + 4.6  @ J.C. Penney .............. 1,201.0 1,026.0 + 17.1  @ Dayton Hudson ............ 1,044.9 926.1 + 12.7  @ c-May Dept. .............. 687.3 627.2 + 9.6  @ Melville ................. 594.0 519.7 + 14.3  @ Woolworth ................ 458.0 404.0 + 13.3  @ d-Ames Dept.  Stores ...... 373.0 161.0 +131.7  @ Montgomery Ward .......... 360.5 356.9 + 1.0  @ Limited .................. 359.4 324.4 + 11.0  @ Carter Hawley Hale ....... 194.0 190.5 + 1.8  @ TJX Cos. ................. 183.8 161.1 + 14.1  @ Mercantile Stores ........ 173.6 165.5 + 4.9  @ Gap Inc. ................. 119.0 95.0 + 25.0  @ a-Total U.S. store and catalog sales, excluding supermarkets, from continuing operations. b-Based on exact sales. c-Excludes sales of Caldor and Venture discount chains, which May considers discontinued operations because it is seeking a buyer for them. d-Ames results include Zayre discount store division, which was recently sold to Ames.  @ ---  @ First 30 weeks of fiscal year  @ a-'89 sales '88 sales b-%  @ millions millions change  @ Sears ................... 15,922.7 15,113.9 + 5.4  @ K mart .................. 14,474.6 13,883.2 + 4.3  @ Wal-Mart ................ 13,542.0 10,813.0 + 25.0  @ J.C. Penney ............. 7,510.0 6,992.0 + 7.4  @ Dayton Hudson ........... 6,846.9 6,047.7 + 13.2  @ c-May Dept. ............. 4,716.0 4,045.2 + 16.6  @ Melville ................ 4,308.6 3,858.1 + 11.7  @ Woolworth ............... 2,713.0 2,489.0 + 9.0  @ d-Ames Dept.  Stores ..... 2,700.0 1,206.0 +123.9  @ Montgomery Ward ......... 2,524.3 2,401.5 + 5.1  @ Limited ................. 2,310.0 2.030.0 + 14.0  @ Carter Hawley Hale ...... 1,414.0 1,331.1 + 5.3  @ Mercantile Stores ....... 1,157.2 1,120.5 + 3.3  @ TJX Cos. ................ 1,150.4 992.9 + 15.9  @ Gap ..................... 755.0 601.0 + 26  @ a-Total U.S. store and catalog sales, excluding supermarkets, from continuing operations. b-Based on exact sales. c-Excludes sales of Caldor and Venture discount chains, which May considers discontinued operations because it is seeking a buyer for them. d-Ames results include Zayre discount store division, which was recently sold to Ames.  Scientists have uncovered evidence that a mysterious form of hepatitis can be spread by heterosexual activity, a fact that could complicate the fight against the chronic liver disease.  The finding, by researchers at the Centers for Disease Control here, involves a strain of the disease known as non-A, non-B hepatitis.  Scientists have long known this type of hepatitis is transmitted through blood transfusions and intravenous drug use, but some experts have doubted that sexual transmission played a significant role.  Non-A, non-B hepatitis in some ways is a more insidious health menace than the better understood hepatitis B.  The CDC estimates 1% to 3% of Americans carry non-A, non-B hepatitis, compared with only 0.3% of the population that carries hepatitis B.  And most people who contract non-A, non-B show no symptoms, even though at least half of them probably will develop other chronic liver conditions, possibly including cirrhosis and liver cancer.  The CDC study comes as rapid strides are being made in the fight against non-A, non-B hepatitis.  The virus that accounts for at least 80% to 85% of non-A, non-B has been identified and is now widely called hepatitis C.  The first diagnostic test for hepatitis C has been developed and could be on the market next year, offering hope that contaminated blood can be identified and that a vaccine can be produced.  Researchers are also working to determine whether there are other, unidentified strains of non-A, non-B hepatitis or whether all varieties are hepatitis C.  CDC researchers compared hepatitis victims around Birmingham, Ala., and Tacoma, Wash., with a group of healthy but otherwise similar people.  One finding: Victims who engaged in heterosexual activity with more than two partners were 11 times more likely to get non-A, non-B hepatitis than people in the control group.  Heterosexual contact with multiple partners accounted for the disease in 6% of the victims.  Household contact with people who had the disease -- possibly including sharing toothbrushes and razors but probably not kissing, embracing or other casual connections -- accounted for transmission for an additional 5%.  "The strength of the heterosexual transmission was a surprise," says Miriam J. Alter, CDC's chief of hepatitis surveillance and primary author of the study, published in today's issue of the Journal of the American Medical Association.  Experts hailed the CDC finding as a breakthrough in understanding non-A, non-B hepatitis.  Such knowledge may alert the medical community and the public to previously unrecognized dangers and could lead to further research on such topics as whether widespread use of condoms might stem the disease.  At the same time, the task of identifying victims among such a huge and diverse population group as heterosexuals likely will be daunting.  And, getting people to change their sexual habits may be even more problematic.  Medical specialists also cautioned the results must be confirmed by other studies.  The question of whether non-A, non-B hepatitis, like hepatitis B, is spread sexually has been controversial.  Until now, no one had been able to provide evidence of such transmission.  "It's as convincing as we can get for the moment," Allan Redeker, professor of medicine at the University of Southern California in Los Angeles, says of the CDC study.  But not everybody is so sure.  Adrian De Bisceglie, a visiting scientist in the liver disease section of the National Institutes of Health, says he still doubts sex is a frequent transmission route for non-A, non-B hepatitis.  Sexual activity hasn't been shown to transmit non-A, non-B Hepatitis among homosexual men, and other studies have failed to show significant transmission between heterosexual victims and their spouses.  The author of the CDC study acknowledges that homosexual men so far haven't been shown to transmit non-A, non-B Hepatitis.  But she says that more extensive follow-up research in the Alabama and Washington study areas confirms the heterosexual transmission link.  That study now is being prepared for publication, she says.  Amerada Hess Corp., New York, said it completed the acquisition of substantially all the oil and gas producing and developing properties of Transco Exploration Partners Ltd. for $866 million, after adjustments.  Amerada originally agreed to buy the properties, located in the Gulf of Mexico off the coasts of Louisiana and Texas, from the Houston-based affiliate of Transco Energy Co. for $911 million.  The acquisition includes interests in 41 natural gas fields and three oil fields, and could increase Amerada Hess's total natural gas reserves by 25% while doubling its domestic natural gas reserves.  The natural gas field currently produces about 150 million cubic feet a day and production is expected to rise in the near future.  Crude oil production is averaging 7,800 barrels a day.  Banking regulators are hammering out a compromise in a dispute over the minimum capital levels for banks, and the outcome could mean thrifts have to raise several billion dollars more capital than required under the new bailout law.  The Comptroller of the Currency and the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp. have been feuding over the minimum capital-asset ratio that will be included in the risk-based capital standard now being put in place.  While the thrift bailout law sets new capital standards for savings and loans, it also requires that thrifts meet bank capital rules.  The risk-based standard -- which replaces a flat 6% capital minimum -- gears a bank's capital requirement individually to the riskiness of its assets.  The FDIC has argued that the minimum capital requirement, even for banks with very low-risk portfolios, should be 6% of assets, while the Comptroller's office earlier this year backed a 3% level.  In recent weeks, officials say, Comptroller Robert Clarke has offered to split the difference and settle for a 4.5% minimum.  FDIC officials said yesterday that they received the details of the compromise last week and are checking to see what effect it would have on banks.  Most banks already meet the current 6% standard.  "We're looking at it.  We haven't ruled anything out," said Paul Fritts, director of bank supervision at the FDIC.  If the 4.5% minimum capital requirement is adopted, it will almost surely mean that thrifts will have to raise several billion dollars more capital than is required under the 3% tangible capital ratio that thrifts must meet in five years under the bailout law.  But it is unclear exactly how much more would be required because the tangible standard and the risk-based minimum measure capital differently.  Thrifts are currently $43 billion short of the 3% tangible level.  Of that amount, $28 billion is the deficit in insolvent thrifts that the government will make up.  Thus, the industry must raise about $15 billion in new capital, or shrink its assets, to meet the 3% tangible standard.  A 4.5% minimum standard would increase even more the amount of capital needed from outside investors.  A spokesman for Mr. Clarke, who is on vacation and couldn't be reached for comment, said that the issue was being negotiated directly by Mr. Clarke, FDIC chairman William Seidman, and Danny Wall, the chairman of the Office of Thrift Supervision.  The three plan to meet next week.  The OTS, the successor to the Federal Home Loan Bank Board, is an arm of the Treasury.  Officials at the OTS said the agency is trying to sort out what Congress intended when it passed the bailout bill.  In deliberations on the bill, Congress focused intensely on the 3% tangible capital minimum but didn't give much scrutiny to the effect of forcing thrifts to meet bank standards.  The OTS could take the position that Congress didn't intend for thrifts to have to meet a tougher standard.  Foreign investing is back in vogue.  A new study by Salomon Brothers Inc. estimates that cross-border equity trading -- investors in one country buying stocks in another -- will grow to about $1.40 trillion this year.  That follows a contraction in 1988 and surpasses the record $1.34 trillion set in 1987.  "The international equity market has recovered from the effects of the {1987} stock market crash," said Michael Howell, European equity strategist for Salomon Brothers in London.  "Measured in either new money-terms or gross turnover, it will exceed the annualized rate of activity that occurred just prior to the crash, when investors were piling into foreign stocks."  A major reason, say money managers and analysts, is a return of confidence.  "Immediately following the crash, we entered a period of uncertainty, and investors returned to their more familiar home markets," said Mr. Howell.  The total value of cross-border stock trading fell by nearly 10% in 1988.  The value of new international equity issues fell even more, 23.9%.  But with the return of confidence, plus fatter corporate profits and attractive stock prices -- particularly in Europe -- investors are being lured back, Mr. Howell said.  In addition, he contends that aging populations in both Japan and the West will lead to greater savings for retirement that, in turn, should make more funds available for equity investment.  A good chunk of that will flow overseas, according to Salomon Brothers.  The firm projects that investment portfolios will eventually have about 15% of their holdings invested in foreign securities, up from less than 10% now.  Mr. Howell notes that many U.S. pension managers have said they would prefer to have 20% to 25% of their funds invested overseas in about 10 years, up from an average of 4% currently.  More immediate factors pushing investors into foreign stocks include the relatively low level of interest rates in most major industrial countries, the scheduled easing of trade barriers among the 12 countries of the European Common market by 1992 and growing cross-border mergers and acquisition activity.  But despite increased international stock trading, "markets aren't as liquid as they were in the good old days of the summer of 1987.  Maybe they never will be," said Barry M. Gillman, managing director of PCM International, an international investment division of Prudential Insurance Company of America.  Domestic trading volume in most foreign stock markets has declined, he said.  If it weren't for that contraction, international buying and selling might even be higher.  The reduced trading activity "leads us in some cases not to do a trade that we might have done two years ago," said Mr. Gillman.  A big trade in a thin market can distort prices.  Nonetheless, Salomon Brothers predicts that international equity trading will expand nearly three-fold to $3.90 trillion by the year 2000 and to $12.85 trillion by 2010.  The New York investment bank estimates that at year end 1988, investors world-wide held about $640 billion in foreign stocks, or 6.7% of the value of global equity markets.  British investors held the most, about $180.5 billion.  Salomon Brothers projects total foreign stock holdings will roughly triple by 1995, rise to $3.25 trillion by 2000 and to $10.75 trillion by 2010.  European investors have led the renewed cross-border charge, accounting for about 73% of the net new international equity investment last year, according to Salomon Brothers.  Moreover, the British and Continental European markets received 82% of that business.  British investors were net purchasers of $7.2 billion of foreign shares in 1988, while Continental investors added $8.1 billion to their portfolios.  By contrast, Americans sold a net $252 million, and the Japanese bought about $3 billion net -- a tiny amount for such a cash-rich nation.  "The great paradox is that ahead of 1992, U.S. and Japanese institutions haven't been participating heavily in European investment," said Mr. Howell.  But evidence points to a U.S. rebound in 1989.  In the first half, net new cash committed to international or global investment by U.S. tax-exempt investors -- mainly pension funds -- equaled the total for all of 1988: $4.5 billion, according to InterSec Research Corp., an investment advisory firm in Stamford, Conn.  About $2.1 billion of that was awarded to "passive" equity managers who try to match stock markets but not necessarily outperform them.  As a group, U.S. corporate pension funds, public employee retirement systems and other tax-exempt institutions such as foundations and endowments had $68 billion committed to international or global investments at the end of June, said Duncan Fordyce, a senior vice president at InterSec.  That's up from $53.5 billion a year earlier. (Funds managed on a global basis, as opposed to purely international, can also include investments in U.S. equities.) "There was a long-term, secular trend toward cross-border equity investment and it got ahead of itself in 1987," said Mr. Gillman of PCM International.  "Then the crash scared a lot of people into pulling back.  Now we are seeing a lot of people getting back into that long-term trend line."  DRUG EMPORIUM Inc., a Columbus, Ohio, discount drugstore chain, proposed an offering of $50 million of convertible subordinated debentures, due 2014.  In addition, a prospectus provides for the purchase by the underwriter, Goldman, Sachs & Co., of an additional $7.5 million of the debentures to cover over-allotments.  Proceeds will be used to repay bank debt outstanding and for working capital, among other things.  Ford Motor Co. said it is recalling about 18,000 of its 1988 and 1989 model Merkur Scorpio cars equipped with 2.9-liter engines, because of a throttle-position sensor problem that could affect engine performance.  The Dearborn, Mich., auto maker said that if the sensor sticks, the engine might idle roughly or too fast, or might run poorly or stumble when the transmission is shifted into the drive position.  A spokesman said Ford isn't aware of any accidents or injuries related to this problem.  Ford will notify owners by mail to return the cars to their dealers for a free replacement of the defective sensor.  Boeing Co. received its second big airplane order in little more than a month, evidence that there's still plenty of pent-up demand for commercial jetliners.  The Seattle aircraft manufacturer confirmed that Air Canada booked nine 767-300s with extended range, valued at roughly $936 million in all, and placed options for nine more.  Three of the firm orders and three related options are subject to reconfirmation.  If all options are exercised, the transaction's value would total $1.87 billion.  "It's a very good order," said Jerry Cantwell, an analyst with Wertheim Schroder & Co. in New York.  Generally, "there's been a dearth of activity since the big surge this spring" when United Airlines led a global buying frenzy with an order potentially worth $15.74 billion.  Then, late in July, Texas Air Corp. placed a $2.8 billion order with Boeing, the world's leading airplane maker, to upgrade its Continental and Eastern airlines units.  And, analysts said, there undoubtedly are more significant purchases on the way.  Though orders as huge as United's are unlikely, "airlines are looking to fill in gaps" in their fleets, explained Lawrence Harris, of Bateman Eichler, Hill Richards, a Los Angeles securities firm.  The reasons he cited are standard: growth in air traffic, the aging of the fleet, the fuel efficiency of the new models.  In fact, Boeing noted yesterday that Air Canada's 767-300s should consume up to 30% less fuel than the Lockheed Corp. L-1011s they replace.  Direct operating costs will be about 25% lower than the L-1011, Boeing said, and flight range will increase 15%.  The planes will use PW-4000 engines, made by the Pratt & Whitney unit of United Technologies Corp.  Air Canada's president and chief executive officer, Pierre J. Jeanniot, said in a statement that the Montreal-based national carrier selected the 767-300 as its principle jetliner for long-range domestic and international service.  "This aircraft will become the backbone of Air Canada's fleet," Mr. Jeanniot said.  The first of Air Canada's new 767-300s, scheduled for delivery in 1993, will be used on North Atlantic routes.  Also yesterday, Aloha Airlines booked four 737-300 twinjets to meet growth and replacement needs.  That deal is worth $125 million.  The Honolulu-based carrier, a unit of Aloha Airgroup Inc., also took options for four more 737-300 airliners.  Deliveries are to begin in November 1992.  The Aloha planes will be powered by CFM56-3C1 engines produced by CFM International, a joint venture of General Electric Co. and Snecma of France.  The engine order is valued at $80 million.  Boeing's total backlog stands at 1,593 planes, up from 1,034 a year ago.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Boeing shares closed up 50 cents, at $54.75.  Bolar Pharmaceutical Co., under investigation for substituting SmithKline Beecham PLC's Dyazide to obtain governmental approval to market a generic version of the blood pressure drug, acknowledged submitting another brand-name drug as its own to a testing laboratory seven years ago.  But Robert Shulman, president of the Copiague, N.Y., concern, blamed the 1982 incident "on a manufacturing error."  In attempting to copy the tablet color of Mellaril, an anti-psychotic drug produced by Sandoz Corp., Mr. Shulman said Bolar mixed up the innovator product with its own pills and sent them off for testing at an outside laboratory.  "We made a mistake seven years ago," Mr. Shulman said.  "It was an isolated case."  Bolar later resubmitted different generic versions of Mellaril and won approval from the Food and Drug Administration in 1983 and 1984 to make copies of all seven strengths of Mellaril.  Yesterday, in trading on the American Stock Exchange, Bolar common closed at $20.625, off $1.125, on volume of 1,053,800 shares.  In Washington, chief FDA spokesman Jeffrey Nesbit indicated that the agency's investigation of Bolar is far wider than the Dyazide matter.  "We have additional Bolar drugs under investigation, including thioridazine," the generic version of Mellaril, he said last night.  In the course of investigating Bolar and 10 other generic drug makers, FDA investigators obtained a 1982 letter from PharmaKinetics Laboratories Inc. to Bolar that outlined the laboratory's discovery that Bolar had submitted Mellaril tablets for testing.  Initial news of Bolar's problem with its copy of Mellaril was disclosed yesterday when PharmaKinetics, Bolar's outside testing laboratory, issued a statement saying that a visual inspection of a client's test tablets in 1982 "caused company officials to question the true identity of the product."  Paul L. Perito, an attorney for PharmaKinetics, said the laboratory detected that the pills submitted were actually the Sandoz product when sugar coating on the tablets peeled away during handling.  PharmaKinetics concurred with Bolar's Mr. Shulman in describing the incident as "isolated.  To the best knowledge of company officials, there have been no other occurrences of this nature at PharmaKinetics. . . .  from this or any other pharmaceutical manufacturer."  PharmaKinetics, Baltimore, also did laboratory testing for the only two generic versions of Dyazide that were approved by the FDA.  A version made by Vitarine Pharmaceuticals Inc., of Spring Valley, N.Y., was pulled from the market earlier this summer when the company admitted to the FDA that it substituted the innovator product for its own to obtain approval to market the drug.  Dr. David Winter, vice president, external affairs at Sandoz Corp., East Hanover, N.J., subsidiary of Sandoz Ltd. of Switzerland, said the company wasn't aware that Bolar had submitted actual Mellaril in laboratory testing.  "I am extraordinarily disappointed," Dr. Winter said.  "We didn't have any knowledge that somebody had just recoated one of our products."  The FDA began investigating Bolar's version of Dyazide at the prompting of Rep. John Dingell, a Michigan Democrat and chairman of a congressional subcommittee investigating the FDA generic review process and the generic drug industry.  Earlier this week, the FDA said that it intends to withdraw its approval for Bolar to make its version of Dyazide because the agency doesn't consider the drug to be the therapeutic equivalent of Dyazide.  Bolar has maintained that its copy of Dyazide is safe and effective and that it plans to conduct another study "to show, beyond any shadow of a doubt, the equivalency of its drug to Dyazide."  Bolar had believed it had been cleared of substituting the SmithKline product for its own, based on a news release from the FDA.  The release included a sentence that said it hadn't found "evidence of fraud during the approval process."  However, FDA officials later confirmed that Bolar was still under investigation for possibly passing off the SmithKline drug as its own.  Bolar's Mr. Shulman said he interpreted the FDA's news release as indicating Bolar had been cleared.  And he contended that bringing up the 1982 incident now was an effort to "put a stigma" on the company.  Hement Shah, a Warren, N.J. drug analyst, said he interpreted the latest development as indicating that the FDA is trying to pressure Bolar to pull its generic Dyazide from the market.  Mr. Shah said Bolar's version of Mellaril accounts for less than 1% of Bolar's total sales and that "it never was a big drug for the company."  ---  Bruce Ingersoll in Washington contributed to this article.  U.S. currency gained as dollar bulls came out of the woodwork late in the day to build up fresh long positions and test key resistance at 145 yen and 1.9700 marks in extremely light activity.  Some attributed the late advance to short covering ahead of the Labor Day weekend, which will leave most trading rooms empty Monday.  Many traders plan to extend the weekend by taking the day off today, or leaving at midday.  Other dealers said they bought the dollar in anticipation of a strong rally following today's release of the U.S. employment report for August.  Although the report itself isn't expected to motivate dollar buying, dealers say many investors who are pro-dollar and expect a strong U.S. currency during September have been holding off on purchases until the jobs numbers appear.  In late New York trading, the dollar was quoted at 1.9668 marks and 145.00 yen, up from 1.9544 marks and 144.30 yen late Wednesday in New York.  Sterling was trading at $1.5683, down from $1.5780.  On the Commodity Exchange in New York, gold for current delivery dropped $1.90 to $359.90 an ounce, the lowest close since June 9.  Estimated volume was a moderate 2.6 million ounces.  Metromedia Co., Secaucus, N.J., said its long-distance telephone unit completed the purchase of two ITT Corp. telecommunications units.  Terms weren't released.  The sale takes New York-based ITT out of the telecommunications business, except for one joint-venture investment.  It has said it would make periodic divestitures of its businesses that don't fit its strategy to hold a "leadership position" in an industry.  ITT has remaining interests in nine businesses including hotels, financial services, industrial and defense products.  Metromedia said the acquisition of ITT Communications Services Inc. and ITT Chernow Communications Inc. will make its Metromedia Long Distance Inc. unit one of the five largest long-distance carriers.  ITT CSI provides private-line services and traditional and WATS long-distance service, while ITT Chernow provides call accounting and communication services for the hospitality industry.  The Chicago Mercantile Exchange suspended two members for two years and levied six-figure fines against them for their part in an alleged $1 million scheme to defraud customers the week of the October 1987 stock market crash.  Total fines and restitution ordered in the case now amount to $791,500.  Patrick J. Shannon, 33 years old and a broker in the Merc's Standard & Poor's 500 stock index futures pit, was fined $225,000, ordered to repay $44,500 allegedly stolen from customers, and suspended from membership for two years.  Mr. Shannon, who brokered orders for E.F. Hutton during the stock market crash, was accused by the Merc of fixing trades to funnel profits to Albert "Bud' Furman III.  Mr. Furman, 38 and a Merc local, or a person who trades for himself instead of customers, last January paid $252,500 in fines and restitution as partial settlement of the case.  Yesterday, the Merc said it ordered him to pay an additional $125,000 fine and repay $44,500, and suspended him for two years.  Two other targets, Peter Shannon, Patrick Shannon's brother, and Sidney L. Rabin, were each fined $50,000 and suspended for two months.  Both men were found guilty by the Merc of pre-arranged trading in receiving "alleged money transfer trades" on Black Monday, Oct. 19, 1987, from Patrick Shannon through Mr. Furman.  All four men settled the charges against them, neither admitting nor denying wrongdoing.  The U.S. Attorney here, as part of a wide-ranging probe of futures pits, is reviewing exchange disciplinary cases, including this one, according to a person familiar with the matter.  Royal Martin, Mr. Furman's lawyer, and James Koch, Mr. Rabin's lawyer, declined to comment.  Peter Shannon declined comment.  Patrick Shannon and his lawyer, Art Hahn, couldn't be reached for comment.  The biggest trade questioned in the Merc case -- an Oct. 22, 1987, trade that Mr. Furman made $900,000 on -- appears to have been dropped from the charges against Mr. Furman and Patrick Shannon.  That trade and others that week between the two men and another broker, John L. Oberman, netted Mr. Furman more than $1 million.  Mr. Oberman wasn't charged in the case.  A further financial penalty against the two men is that they can't lease out their exchange seats during the suspension, which will cost them thousands of dollars a month in lease payments.  And if they sold their seats, hoping to be readmitted to membership after their suspensions, the Merc would probably deny their application, according to the exchange's outside counsel Jerrold Salzman.  "Everybody understands that completely," Mr. Salzman said.  Last January, before the broader federal probe was disclosed, the case appeared headed toward a relatively smooth settlement.  After the exchange and the public learned of the federal probe, however, the Merc: brought additional charges against Mr. Furman and Mr. Shannon; moved the case to a special panel of the exchange board, the only body that can expel members; and let it be known that penalties would be tougher than initially thought.  Some involved in the case assumed after these developments that the two main targets would be expelled permanently.  As a practical matter, Mr. Salzman said, returning to the Merc after two years' suspension will be very difficult for the two traders.  Mr. Shannon has been a broker, and being found guilty by the Merc of cheating customers may keep brokerage firms from dealing with him in the future.  Mr. Furman, the local, will be out of the pits for two years and most traders grow rusty taking that much time off.  For locals, who try to buy and sell futures contracts quickly to profit from price movement, the sense of timing that comes from constant trading is crucial, Mr. Salzman noted.  "It could affect him."  New proposed guidelines -- not yet enacted -- for trading violation penalties at the Merc would require permanent expulsion for members found guilty of two major offenses.  Mr. Shannon was found guilty of three and Mr. Furman seven in all.  Although interpretations of the new guidelines aren't final, Mr. Salzman said the two violations would have to occur in separate incidents to force expulsion.  While Mr. Furman and Mr. Shannon were cited for traders through the week of the market crash, "in this case," Mr. Salzman said, "it would have been a single course of conduct."  He said the new guidelines are aimed at traders found guilty of a violation who then "do the same damn thing."  For smaller companies in deep trouble, the "turnaround consultant" is emerging as an increasingly important figure.  These consultants charge by the hour -- typically $100 to $200 or more for each person on the job.  A bill for sizing up the problems at a medium-sized company can run from $25,000 to $50,000.  Sometimes, for better or worse, they wind up running the company.  If your business is failing, should you hire such a person?  Unfortunately for business owners desperate for help, it's a question with no quick answer.  It's even difficult to check the credentials of the practitioners; the industry isn't regulated, so anybody can hang out a shingle.  "Virtually everybody who's been through a turnaround thinks he's an expert, so there's a wild proliferation of guys who don't belong here," says Marvin A. Davis, a partner with Grisanti, Galef & Goldress, a Los Angeles consulting firm that has specialized in the area for 40 years.  To begin with the worst, consultants sometimes just add to the agony.  William Ullrich says that when he stepped in to help save his brother's lumber business, he was dissatisfied with the consultant who had been hired.  The consultant never came up with a solid turnaround plan and the company eventually filed for protection under Chapter 11 of the U.S. Bankruptcy Code.  Even after the consultant arrived on the scene, "I think {the company} was operating on a panic-type, day-to-day basis," Mr. Ullrich says.  In hindsight, Mr. Ullrich says the company may have made a mistake in employing a consultant only part time.  "Another problem with these turnaround people is they've got about four other irons in the fire," he says.  "Maybe you need someone who will devote their full effort."  Mr. Ullrich now wonders whether anybody could have saved the concern.  In their successful moments, the turnaround specialists are something like emergency-room surgeons.  They work intensely, sometimes round-the-clock, trying to save a company from a costly -- and typically lethal -- bankruptcy proceeding.  They plot turnarounds.  Frequently referred by lenders, suppliers or attorneys, they offer expertise on business strategy often unavailable from a company's usual advisers.  And the best ones serve as dispassionate mediators between a company and its creditors, convincing outsiders that their interests will also be served by keeping the company out of court.  They are part of the consulting arms of big accounting firms, specialty boutiques or one-person or two-person shops.  Attracted by money -- the top earners can make several million dollars a year -- and dreams of glory, the trouble-shooters have flocked to what was once a quiet, unpopular consulting specialty.  Turnaround Management Association, a Cary, N.C.-based industry group that's only a year and a half old, says most of the 300 assorted consultants and crisis managers in its membership entered the trade within the past decade.  Demand for such intensive-care services to companies in trouble has mushroomed in the past decade.  The piling up of debt during the 1980s is one of the main reasons for the proliferation.  The betting among this type of consultant is that these and other problems will only intensify in the 1990s.  Consultants seem to be most helpful when the patient is a basically sound business, but its operations are running out of control.  That was the problem facing Roy C. Mullen, owner of Mullen Printing Co., a small Springfield, Mass., printing concern, seven years ago as he contemplated the prospect of making a Chapter 11 filing in bankruptcy court.  "I felt like crying," Mr. Mullen remembers.  "I thought about 30 years {in business} going up in smoke."  Then his banker suggested a possible rescuer for his company -- a consultant to troubled concerns named Gary Brooks, who is now a principal at Allomet Partners in New York.  Jumping at the chance, Mr. Mullen hired the man.  Mr. Brooks spent two months assessing the company's problems, put together an 85-page report, and told Mr. Mullen, "You have an excellent, top-notch business here -- an absolute gold mine -- but it's just running out of control."  Mr. Brooks said the company lacked an accounting system to track its sales levels, its manufacturing costs and its inventories, so it wasn't easy to tell whether it was making money or not.  Mr. Brooks helped Mr. Mullen set up such a system.  On the shop floor, the consultant also suggested Mr. Mullen improve his product flow by, among other things, placing his final-step bindery operation near the shipping door.  The company, which returned to profitability in 1986, had profit of about $50,000 on sales of $1.3 million last year, Mr. Mullen says.  Above all, a good consultant will put an end to the indecisiveness that often grips companies in crisis.  When Forshaw Industries Inc., a Charlotte, N.C.-based chemical distributor, starting posting losses three years ago, Tom Forshaw, who owns the firm with his brother, says he "couldn't figure out which way to turn, which problem to attack.  Some would think {I} was freezing up."  He hired a consultant, Tim Finley of the Finley Group in Charlotte, who pointed out that the company's purchase of a St. Louis-based insecticide distributor had left it with too much overhead.  So the company cut costs by consolidating some of its operations with the parent company's in Charlotte.  At the consultant's suggestion, Mr. Forshaw also changed his management team.  He hired a controller with experience in cash accounting to help monitor cash flow.  And after the consultant helped him figure out which of his managers seemed committed to tackling problems in their divisions, Mr. Forshaw fired those who weren't.  After taking these steps, the company started making money again within months.  For executives of troubled companies, experts in the field have a few words of advice.  First, different consultants specialize in different stages of financial trouble.  Many prefer entering a company when the prospect of a bankruptcy filing is a year or more away and chances for success are much higher.  Far fewer relish the stressful high-risk challenge of rescuing a company that's within weeks of a filing.  Secondly, consultants typically ask for their money upfront at a time when creditors frequently aren't being paid.  And some also insist on a performance bonus, or a piece of the company, as an incentive -- a practice, say some turnaround experts, that can cause the consultant to make recommendations that result in short-term gains for a company but problems in the long run.  Sadly for business owners in difficulty, the turnaround industry hasn't developed standards yet to help them judge a consultant's resume or performance.  "We are desperately groping for professional standards like lawyers and doctors have, but we aren't there yet," says Robert Seidemann, a director at the Turnaround Management Association who also heads up Price Waterhouse's turnaround practice.  He estimates it will be a year or two before TMA figures out which consultants it should exclude from a referral service it provides.  In 1986, Herb Lipson, chairman of Philadelphia-based Metrocorp, had a hold on one of magazine publishing's hottest tickets: Manhattan, inc.  Today, five years after its start, there are signs the slick monthly is cooling off.  Still recovering from the October 1987 stock-market crash, the magazine is struggling not only to recover lost advertising pages -- they peaked in 1986 at 912 pages -- but also to reassert itself in arguably the most competitive magazine market in the country, New York City, which is crowded with such magazines such as New York, Avenue, 7 Days, and New York Woman, all vying for retail, real-estate and financial advertising.  "I think the feeling among agency media people is that the magazine has stalled," says Michael Drexler, national media director at Bozell Inc. "New York is already cut up too much.  There are so many magazines competing for segments.  Manhattan, inc. has a preferred audience, but can they demonstrate they can make that grow?"  Publisher Lipson rejects the notion his magazine is slipping, and on the surface, at least, circulation figures back him up.  Manhattan, inc. was able to pass the 100,000 mark this year, an essential hurdle for any consumer magazine attempting to attract major advertisers.  "When you get over that 100,000 circulation hump, the ad community's perception of you improves considerably," said Paul Ducharme, director of print media at Grey Advertising.  But other ad executives wonder whether Manhattan, inc.'s charter to follow the lives of New York's movers and shakers isn't too narrow.  Editor Clay Felker and editorial director Peter Kaplan are stretching the boundaries of the magazine somewhat with the introduction in September of "Man, Inc.," a new monthly feature section celebrating what business people do when they aren't working.  The section takes a breezy tone more reminiscent of Gentlemen's Quarterly or Esquire than Manhattan, inc.'s traditional behind-the-scenes probings of the New York business world.  Mr. Felker, however, staunchly defends the innovation.  "We aren't a business magazine, we are a life-style magazine, and that's how we should be sold," he says.  Publisher Sandra Ourusoff is pure business about selling advertising, and has achieved some success with a 24-page travel section called "Power Trips" in the September issue and a 16-page section featuring yacht manufacturers snootily entitled "The Way You Wear Your Yacht."  The September issue pulled in 130 ad pages, well above the 85 pages in the September 1988 magazine.  But for the first six months of 1989, Manhattan, inc.'s ad pages dropped 25% from the same period in 1988.  Although circulation rose to 110,000 in the first half of this year, newsstand sales were off by 70%.  Moreover, while subscriptions rose 68%, the rise was partly due to costly subscription drives offering the magazine for as little as 50 a copy.  Promotion director Theodore Kruckel says a national subscription drive two years ago was an expensive flop and that current efforts are being directed closer to home.  The magazine now spends about $36 to get each new subscriber, he says, down from $60 in the past.  One way to build circulation cheaply would be to send the magazine for free to a targeted group of the demographically desirable -- so-called controlled circulation.  But Manhattan, inc. has no such plans.  The magazine has ended a two-year campaign of using "qualified circulation" -- sending copies free to top executives who request it.  About 5,000 copies were going out free to Fortune 500 company executives in a bid to convert them into paid readers.  Mr. Lipson says he doesn't have any interest in selling the magazine even though, according to industry sources, he has been offered as much as $20 million.  Media scuttlebutt aside, he also says he's solidly behind Mr. Felker, who replaced editor Jane Amsterdam in 1987.  Some early Felker touches such as business fiction weren't hot favorites of the owner, but Mr. Lipson says Mr. Felker "has started to click and he's clicking now."  As a business venture, though, Manhattan, inc. hasn't started to click.  Though Mr. Lipson once thought it would be profitable by now, it is losing money and is being carried on the backs of Metrocorp's successful city magazines, Philadelphia and Boston.  But Mr. Lipson is optimistic.  He vows Manhattan, inc. will be profitable in another two years.  ---  Ad Notes. . . .   NEW ACCOUNT: Coca-Cola Co., Atlanta, awarded its estimated $4 million Hispanic ad account to Sosa & Associates, San Antonio, Texas.  The account had previously been handled by Castor GS&B Advertising, New York.  The Paperwork Reduction Act is cutting back on a lot more than paperwork.  Critics charge it has enabled the White House's Office of Management and Budget to usurp the regulatory authority that Congress delegates to some 100 agencies.  More than bureaucratic turf is at stake.  Many of the regulations being blocked by OMB in the name of paperwork reduction are basic to protecting workers, consumers and the environment, critics of the Budget Office say.  As one of many examples, a regulation that would force employers to measure the exposure of workers to a toxic chemical known to cause liver dmage, and to have the workers checked if exposed, was rejected by OMB as requiring too much paperwork.  And now, the regulators have new hope in their battle with OMB, thanks to recently proposed legislation and a case pending before the Supreme Court.  At issue is whether OMB is exploiting its broad powers to review regulations as a way of stifling the agencies' efforts to impose regulations on business.  Right now, says David Vladeck, an attorney for Public Citizen, a Ralph Nader group, "OMB exercises cradle-to-grave control over the administrative process, and used its power repeatedly to cut back on health and safety regulations by weakening regulations, delaying their issuance and, in some cases, forbidding an agency to take action."  OMB officials respond that they have an important role to play in the regulatory process, taking a broad policy approach, making sense of conflicting regulations, finding the "least intrusive" solutions and, of course, trimming the paperwork load for business.  OMB is working down its regulations backlog, and Jay Plager, head of OMB's office of information and regulatory affairs, says that he and his boss, OMB Director Richard Darman, have set "a firm policy that (OMB) will not use delay as a weapon."  But advocacy groups, as well as many federal regulators, usually speaking privately, say that OMB actions have diluted, stalled or killed a long list of regulations.  For instance, they say, OMB held up an Environmental Protection Agency proposal to ban asbestos for five years, reasoning that future cancer deaths should be "discounted" and valued at as little as $22,094.93 today.  EPA announced the ban in July, but David Doniger, an attorney with the National Resources Defense Council, charges that "OMB is responsible for years of delay in action that would save thousands of American lives."  OMB has also blocked, in the name of paperwork reduction, an OSHA plan to require employers to measure their emissions of methylenedianiline, a chemical used in plastics and paints that has been shown to pose threats of cancer and liver damage, and to have workers examined for liver impairment from the chemical.  Among other regulations that critics say were stalled or blocked: OSHA rules to protect workers from dangerous dust in grain elevators, EPA efforts to curb factory air pollutants, and Food and Drug Administration attempts to require labeling of the relative absorbency of potentially deadly tampons and warnings of aspirin dangers for children with chicken pox or the flu.  Critics say OMB sabotages regulations by doing most of its work in secret, conferring with the regulated and raising almost endless questions about regulatory proposals.  While the public participates in agency rule making, it has little say in OMB's behind-the-scenes activity, they add.  OMB's Mr. Plager responds that since 1986 OMB has moved to open up the process, placing in a public docket regulatory agencies' initial proposals, OMB actions that order further consideration or suspend review, and final documents resulting from OMB review.  Contacts between OMB staff and private parties concerning a rule being reviewed are usually banned, he adds.  Nevertheless, Rep. John Conyers (D., Mich.), chairman of the House Government Operations Committee, is pushing changes to the Paperwork Act that would curb OMB's ability to undercut or delay regulations and require the agency to conduct much more of its review in public forums.  OMB, he says, is criticized for all too often acting "like a cold-blooded accountant with little regard for the value of human life."  Mr. Conyers is seeking to get OMB's fiscal 1990 appropriations held up until that legislative change is made.  Meanwhile, the Supreme Court this fall will hear a case that could have a heavy bearing on OMB's ability to use the paperwork law to review regulations.  It involves an OSHA regulation that requires employers to tell workers what toxic chemicals they may have been exposed to.  The rule has had a tortuous and tortured history since an OSHA advisory committee recommended such a standard in 1974.  After being issued in January 1981 under President Carter, the Reagan administration quickly withdrew it, OSHA drafted it again, OMB tried to block it in 1982, but it was issued in 1983.  In 1985 and again in 1987, with OMB trying to stop any expansion and unions suing, a federal court ordered OSHA to expand the standard beyond manufacturing, which OSHA finally did in August 1987.  Then, in a paperwork review, OMB rejected several provisions of the rule.  OSHA bowed, suspending the rule, and the unions went to court again.  A federal appeals court ordered the whole rule put into effect, saying, "OMB cannot in the guise of reducing paperwork substitute its judgment for that of any agency having substantive rulemaking responsibility."  The Reagan administration appealed to the Supreme Court.  Upholding the appeals court ruling "would essentially put us out of business," says OMB's Mr. Plager.  The Internal Revenue Service gave businesses two more months before they must comply with a new tax rule discouraging discrimination in employee benefits.  The IRS pushed back the compliance date of the rule, widely known as Section 89, to Dec. 1 from Oct. 1.  Section 89, a provision of the 1986 Tax Reform Act that originally was scheduled to take effect at the start of this year, taxes employee benefits if companies don't make them available to most of their rank-and-file workers.  It has aroused the ire of many businesses, which complained that the rule is costly and burdensome.  Additional breaks from the tax rule may be in store for employers, as several measures are moving through Congress that would either repeal or significantly revise it.  And just before lawmakers adjourned for their August recess, the House voted to deny the Treasury any funds to enforce Section 89 through the end of September 1990.  The Labor Department issued rules aimed at protecting workers who repair potentially dangerous powered equipment.  The new "lockout/tagout" standard was significantly stronger than a proposal made in May 1988 by the department's Occupational Safety and Health Administration, OSHA indicated.  The standard will generally require that employers install locks to ensure that machines being serviced cannot be turned on inadvertently, OSHA said.  Warning tags will be permitted when machines cannot be locked, or when an employer can show that tags will give equivalent protection.  OSHA also said that each repair or maintenance worker must lock or tag a machine to ensure his or her own protection.  About 90% of existing electrical equipment and two-thirds of energy-control valves can accept a lock, OSHA said.  After the standard takes effect Oct. 31, any new or overhauled equipment must accommodate a lockout device.  Last year's proposal would have given employers the option of locking or tagging, and would have allowed someone else, such as a foreman, to cinch the lock or tag the equipment for repair workers.  Some union officials questioned how firmly the final rules require locking and individual locking or tagging.  The United Auto Workers, which has pushed for 10 years for OSHA to require locking of the hazardous equipment, said the new rules seem to "fall short of the protection American workers need."  UAW President Owen Bieber said the rules appear to have "loopholes which permit employers to escape the basic principle of 'one worker, one lock, one key."'  But the standard was hailed by Sen. Howard Metzenbaum (D., Ohio), the chairman of the Senate labor subcommittee who has accused OSHA of 10 years of "shameful foot-dragging."  He called it "a big improvement over OSHA's initial proposal, which would not have saved lives," and said the rules will require safety locks "in the vast majority of cases."  The new standard can eliminate nearly 6% of all workplace deaths in places affected by the rule, Labor Secretary Elizabeth Dole said.  OSHA estimated that compliance with the rule will prevent about 120 deaths, and 28,000 serious and 32,000 minor injuries a year.  OSHA estimated the standard will cost the 631,000 affected workplaces, mostly in manufacturing and service industries, $214 million the first year and $135 million annually in later years.  It said the regulations will cover 39 million workers who could be exposed to hazards from unsecured equipment, with the greatest risk to three million people who actually service the equipment.  Packaging and wrapping equipment, printing presses and conveyors account for a high proportion of accidents caused by failure to lock or tag the equipment, OSHA said.  Under the standard, employers must use additional means to ensure safety when tags are used, the agency said.  Specific written instructions must usually be given for shutting down and isolating the equipment and for the locking or tagging; workers must be trained to follow those procedures; and annual inspections of energy-control procedures are required.  Niagara Mohawk Power Corp. directors, as expected, omitted the quarterly dividend usually paid Sept. 30 because of pressure on its earnings caused by problems at its Nine Mile Point 1 nuclear power plant.  The utility previously paid 30 cents a share June 30.  With the plant out of service, Niagara Mohawk has had to buy replacement power from other utilities.  Normally, such an expense would be borne by a utility's customers, but New York utility regulators haven't allowed Niagara Mohawk to pass along its replacement-power costs, which currently total $40 million.  Yesterday, however, the utility and state regulators agreed that Niagara Mohawk will be able to pass along to customers future replacement-power costs.  The utility agreed not to reinstate the dividend until Nine Mile 1 is operating again.  When that will happen depends on when the federal Nuclear Regulatory Commission will be satisfied that the plant is safe to operate.  Plant restart probably won't occur until December at the earliest, analysts say.  Also yesterday, Niagara Mohawk reported that profit for the first seven months of 1989 fell about 35% to $116.6 million, or 66 cents a share, from $178.1 million or $1.14 a share, the year earlier.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Niagara's shares rose 12.5 cents to $12.625.  UAL'S BOARD PLANS to meet today to consider a likely joint bid from United Air's pilots, management and British Airways.  The result could be a leveraged buy-out at more than $300 a share, or $6.75 billion.  The labor-management offer would give employees a stake of up to 70% in exchange for concessions and cash.  ---  Philips's Polygram is close to acquiring A&M Records for about $500 million, sources said.  The purchase would continue a trend of rapid consolidation in the record business.  ---  Cadbury agreed to buy P&G's Crush unit for $220 million.  The purchase would lift the British company's U.S. soft-drink market share to 4.7% from 3.6% and would end P&G's nine-year stint in the industry.  ---  Factory orders fell 1.7% in July to their lowest level in eight months.  The drop's extent surprised many analysts.  Factory shipments also declined in July, and inventories grew.  ---  Major retailers posted a 5% rise in August sales at stores open at least a year.  The increase modestly outpaced inflation.  Apparel merchants posted the biggest gains, while sellers of bigticket items fared poorly.  ---  Boeing won a $936 million order from Air Canada, the jet maker's second big order in just over a month.  ---  Eastern Air told creditors it will have $800 million less in cash at yearend than projected if its reorganization plan isn't modified, sources said.  ---  Times Mirror named its president to the additional posts of Los Angeles Times publisher and chief executive.  ---  Precious-metals futures prices fell to contract lows because of a strong dollar, lack of demand in cash markets, and reports of Soviet sales.  ---  Stocks and the dollar rose while bond prices slumped.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average closed at 2737.27, up 9.12.  But airline stocks sank on news that the U.S. may seek to limit industry buy-outs and takeovers. ---  Banking regulators are hammering out a compromise on new minimum capital levels.  It could force thrifts to raise billions of dollars more than required under the bailout law.  ---  Farm prices slipped 1.4% in August as soybeans took their steepest dive in five years.  Analysts blamed the plunge in part on the Board of Trade's Ferruzzi liquidation order.  ---  Goldsmith's bid for B.A.T will fail if the British government doesn't extend the timetable for the $21.1 billion offer, the financier said.  He cited regulatory delays in the U.S.  ---  The Chicago Merc suspended two prominent members for two years and fined them for their part in an alleged $1 million fraud scheme.  ---  Olivetti's pretax profit plunged 40% in the first half, the steepest drop yet in a 2 1/2-year earnings slide.  But the office-products firm aims for full-year results unchanged from 1988.  ---  Resorts International bondholders are seeking a formal role in any reorganization of the casino-hotel firm.  ---  Markets --  Stocks: Volume 143,420,000 shares.  Dow Jones industrials 2737.27, up 9.12; transportation 1509.42, off 20.10; utilities 217.30, up 0.25.  Bonds: Shearson Lehman Hutton Treasury index 3283.08, off 7.09.  Commodities: Dow Jones futures index 131.34, up 0.64; spot index 129.80, off 0.50.  Dollar: 145.00 yen, up 0.70; 1.9668 marks, up 0.0124.  Ing.  C. Olivetti & Co.'s pretax profit plunged 40% in the first half of this year, the steepest drop yet in a 2 1/2-year earnings slide.  Chairman Carlo De Benedetti nonetheless said he was optimistic that the company could fulfill his prediction earlier this year that results would be unchanged from those of 1988.  He told shareholders that the earnings drop was due to a continued squeeze on profit margins in the computer business and to a big increase in the cost of financing debt.  Shareholders were meeting here to approve a 1.2 trillion-lire ($856.5 million) bond-and-stock issue.  In the first six months, pretax profit was 102.6 billion lire, down from 171.3 billion lire in the 1988 period.  Net financing costs rose 76.8 billion lire as indebtedness jumped to 750 billion lire from 157 billion lire at the end of 1988.  Mr. De Benedetti was encouraged by the fact that operating profit grew 2.6% during the half to 156.4 billion lire from 152.5 billion a year earlier.  Revenue rose 8.7% to 3.938 trillion from 3.623 trillion.  Mr. De Benedetti said sales and new orders had picked up in the last few months, and if the trend continues, earnings for the full year should be unchanged from last year's 356.2 billion, while sales should grow about 13% to 9.5 trillion lire for the full year.  "If we can reach those goals, and I think we can," the Olivetti chief said, "we will increase our lead over other European information technology companies."  He emphasized that the office-equipment company was performing about as well as U.S. computer makers and better than European rivals such as Cie. des Machines Bull, Nixdorf AG and Norsk Data AS, all of which posted losses for the first half.  Analysts weren't so sure.  "That's an awful lot of making up to do," said George Verghese, European electronics analyst at Deutsche Bank Group in London, who had been expecting earnings of around 120 billion lire for the first half.  He said Olivetti's restructuring plan, announced last fall, had probably hurt the group's sales as well as its profits by distracting management's attention.  "There's a war going on" in the European information-technology market, Mr. Verghese said, "and unless you're paying 100% attention, you're probably losing sales."  Though he thinks Olivetti has all the right weapons to succeed over the long term in Europe, he said, "we'll have to see how they use them in the next 12 months."  Mr. De Benedetti said that "our profitability in the future will be influenced by how {computer} prices and margins are going in general, and by our ability to get products to market in time."  Olivetti has acknowledged that it was too slow in introducing new products in the past.  However, Vittorio Cassoni, Olivetti's managing director, said the company would introduce a high-end personal computer based on the Intel 486 microprocessor, a secretarial work station, and a low-end personal computer by the end of the year.  Sorg Inc. said that it will close its Kellow Brown plant and that all 135 employees who work there will be dismissed.  After the dismissals, the company will have 515 employees.  A Sorg spokesman said the Carson, Calif., plant, which mainly prints inserts and manuals for computer software, is being closed because the company "doesn't have the resources to build the business into a profitable enterprise."  The financial printing firm filed for protection from creditors last month under Chapter 11 of the U.S. Bankruptcy Code.  After months of negotiation, oil man Nelson Bunker Hunt and the Internal Revenue Service have tentatively agreed on a reorganization plan in the fallen billionaire's personal bankruptcy-law case.  If finalized, it could lead to an overall settlement of the complex year-old case, attorneys said.  Mr. Hunt had previously reached settlements with 1,900 smaller creditors, but those accords hinged on an agreement with the IRS -- his largest creditor and, by law, the one whose claims must be settled first.  The IRS says Mr. Hunt and his brother, William Herbert Hunt, who has also filed for protection under the federal Bankruptcy Code, owe a total of nearly $1 billion in back taxes.  Exact terms of the agreement weren't disclosed, but Grover Hartt III, an attorney in the Justice Department's tax division, said the proposed settlement resembles one suggested earlier by the IRS.  Under the earlier proposal, Nelson Bunker Hunt's remaining assets, believed to be worth about $250 million, would be placed in a liquidating trust with 80% of the proceeds going to the IRS and the remaining 20% to be divided up among other creditors.  Mr. Hunt would also agree to a $90 million nondischargeable debt to the IRS to be paid from future earnings and other income, said Mr. Hartt, who added that the agreement must still be approved by Justice Department officials in Washington, D.C.  But even if the IRS agreement is finalized, Mr. Hunt must gain the support of the other two major creditors in the case.  Manufacturers Hanover Trust Co. is seeking repayment of a $36 million loan to the Hunts.  Minpeco, S.A., a Peruvian minerals concern, won a $132 million judgment against the brothers last year in a case stemming from the Hunts alleged efforts to corner the silver market in 1979-80.  With penalties, legal fees and interest, Minpeco claims that judgment is now worth $250 million.  After entering the two bankruptcy-law cases as allies, the creditors have been battling lately over whose claims should be paid first.  Manufacturers Hanover has asked federal Judge Harold C. Abramson to give its claim priority.  Minpeco attorneys have threatened to sue if the banking concern tries to force its plan through the court.  "We don't have any agreement with Manufacturers Hanover at this point," says Minpeco attorney Thomas O. Gorman.  During a federal bankruptcy court hearing yesterday, Judge Abramson gave Nelson Bunker Hunt until Sept. 30 to finalize his agreement with the IRS. Otherwise, the judge indicated he would accept reorganization plans from other creditors.  "It's time to get about the business of getting a plan," he said.  Judge Abramson has already allowed competing plans in the case of William Herbert Hunt, who is at loggerheads with the IRS over the size of his nondischargeable debt.  The IRS has asked for $90 million.  Mr. Hunt has only agreed to $60 million and indicated that he would like to tie even that figure to the outcome of a 1982 tax case recently heard in Washington.  The IRS claims each brother owes $150 million for that tax year.  Although testimony has been concluded, a ruling isn't expected before early next year.  In opposing the IRS proposals for their client's bankruptcy-law case, William Herbert Hunt's attorneys argue that he was not included in a recently concluded 1980 tax case that resulted in a judgment of about $135 million against Nelson Bunker Hunt.  To date, they say, no judge has ruled that their client owes a dime in back taxes.  The cases are "drastically different," said attorney Stephen McCartin, who represents William Herbert Hunt.  Arizona Commerce Bank's Steven T. Darak is to resign as president and chief financial officer.  In an interview, the 41-year-old executive said he had come into the job "under difficult circumstances, and after a year, I had a chance to re-evaluate my plans and I took the opportunity."  He said he wasn't sure what he might pursue next.  The company expects to name a successor at its board meeting this month.  F. Lee Jacquette, chairman and chief executive officer, said in a statement that Mr. Darak's goals when he became president last September were to move the beleaguered bank away from its policy of expansion and to focus on cost-cutting measures.  "He made significant progress toward achieving the goals," Mr. Jacquette said.  "We are sorry to lose him."  Mr. Darak's departure is the latest in a shuffle of top managers at Arizona Commerce.  In July, Mr. Jacquette succeeded Ernest C. Garcia II, who resigned after less than a year at the bank.  In March of last year, Donald B. Anderson Jr. resigned as president and chief executive.  The posts were assumed by the company's chairman, Thomas C. Weir, who resigned all three slots four months later.  Bond prices slipped in lethargic trading ahead of today's potentially market-moving employment report.  The results of the report could strongly influence how investors shape their decisions.  In the Treasury market, the benchmark 30-year bond fell about 1/4 point, or $2.50 for each $1,000 face amount.  The issue's yield rose to 8.20% from 8.17% Wednesday.  Corporate bonds and mortgage-backed securities were also lower.  But municipal bonds outperformed other fixed-income securities and ended unchanged to 1/4 point firmer.  Activity was extremely quiet again, continuing a pattern that has lasted for nearly two weeks.  "It's been terribly boring," says Paul Suckow, director of fixed-income securities at Oppenheimer Management Corp. "People are just waiting," he said.  Bond traders said they have seen sporadic buying from regional dealers and municipalities, but very few large retail accounts such as mutual funds, insurance companies and other institutional investors.  Trading often slows just ahead of the monthly employment reports, which are notoriously difficult for investors and traders to predict.  But last month's labor figures are harder to forecast than usual because of labor strikes.  The Labor Department said earlier this week that strike activity, including that of communications workers, would reduce the growth of nonfarm payrolls by 108,000.  Also, many workers on Wall Street are on vacation and won't return until Tuesday.  Financial markets will be closed Monday in observance of Labor Day.  Economists surveyed by Dow Jones Capital Markets Reports forecast, on average, that nonfarm payrolls expanded 70,000 in August and that the unemployment rate increased 0.1 percentage point to 5.3%.  In July, nonfarm payrolls increased 169,000.  Equally important will be the July figures, which in recent months have been subject to sharp revisions.  For example, the growth in new jobs for June was revised last month to 250,000 from the initial estimate of 180,000.  An unexpectedly large revision this time could significantly alter investors' perceptions about the health of the economy and the future of interest rates.  Samuel D. Kahan, chief financial economist at Kleinwort Benson Government Securities Inc., said that the July revision, rather than the August estimate, will set the stage for how other economic numbers will be interpreted.  "If the July number is revised up sharply, people will tend to discount the August (jobs) number because they will assume that it understates the economy's strength," he said.  Two other reports due today -- the purchasing managers' survey and the index of leading indicators -- will also be scrutinized.  Economists estimate that the August purchasing managers' index fell to 45.5% from 46% in July and 48.8% in June.  A reading below 50% indicates that the manufacturing sector of the economy is generally contracting, while a reading above 50% suggests expansion.  The market ignored some positive news that, had it not been for today's employment report, might have had an impact on bond prices.  "The market is ignoring some constructive fundamental factors," said Paul Kasriel, a vice president and monetary economist at Northern Trust Co.  "The economic data we saw today was very constructive."  He was referring to statistics showing a 1.7% drop in July factory orders, a much larger decline than the 0.6% reduction predicted by economists polled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report.  A sharp rise in the value of the U.S. dollar, which often sends bonds soaring, was also dismissed.  The dollar was quoted late in New York at 145.00 yen and 1.9668 marks, up from 144.30 yen and 1.9544 marks late Wednesday in New York.  Treasury Securities  Prices fell in light trading.  The benchmark 30-year bond closed at about 99 1/8, compared with 99 11/32 Wednesday.  The latest 10-year notes were quoted at a closing price of about 98 6/32 to yield 8.25%, compared with 98 14/32 to yield 8.21% Wednesday.  Two-year notes were quoted at 99 21/32 to yield 8.37%, compared with 99 22/32 to yield 8.35%.  Short-term rates fell.  The discount rate on three-month Treasury bills was 7.90% for a bond-equivalent yield of 8.15%, while the rate on six-month Treasury bills was 7.79% to yield 8.20%.  The Treasury sold $4 billion of eight-day cash management bills yesterday at an average rate of 8.25%, for a bond-equivalent yield of 8.36%.  The Treasury received bids totaling $25.18 billion for the bills.  Noncompetitive bids weren't accepted.  Here are details of the auction:  Rates are determined by the difference between the purchase price and face value.  Thus, higher bidding narrows the investor's return while lower bidding widens it.  The percentage rates are calculated on a 360-day year, while the coupon equivalent yield is based on a 365-day year.  @ 8-Day Cash Management Bills  @ Applications ............... $25,180,000,000  @ Accepted bids ............... $4,010,600,000  @ Accepted at low price ....... 87%  @ Average price (Rate) ........ 99.817 (8.25%)  @ High price (Rate) ........... 99.818 (8.17%)  @ Low price (Rate) ............ 99.816 (8.30%)  @ Coupon equivalent ........... 8.36%  The bills are dated Sept.6 and mature Sept. 14.  Mortgage-Backed Securities  Despite the prospect of steady sales of mortgage securities from thrift institutions, some portfolio managers are turning more optimistic about the market.  Reflecting this development, mortgage securities have fared well this week, as active issues have held up better than intermediate Treasurys.  The trend continued yesterday as major mortgage issues fell 1/32 while intermediate Treasurys were off as much as 6/32.  Kevin Barry, a portfolio manager at 1838 Investment Advisors, a Philadelphia-based money manager, told Dow Jones Capital Markets Report that his firm raised the percentage of mortgage securities in its managed accounts to 20% from 5% in the late spring, and that the share could rise as high as 50% if mortgages cheapen more relative to Treasurys.  Mr. Barry said his firm has bought 15-year Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp. mortgage securities, Government National Mortgage Association 10% securities and certain short-dated real estate mortgage investment conduit securities during the past two months.  He bought the Freddie Mac 15-year issues because he thought the 15-year sector would be less affected by thrift liquidations than the much larger market for 30-year issues.  "It's more of an insurance company market than an S&L market," said Mr. Barry of the 15-year sector.  Insurance companies are active in the 15-year sector because they have a large need for intermediate-term assets.  Meanwhile, Ginnie Mae 9% securities for September delivery ended at 96 27/32, down 1/32 on the day; 9 1/2% securities at 98 30/32, off 1/32; and 10% securities at 101 1/32, also down 1/32.  Municipal Issues  Municipals outperformed their Treasury counterparts throughout the session, standing unchanged to 1/4 point firmer in late dealings.  Traders said the relative strength reflects, among other things, the paltry municipal issuance this week and optimism over the market's performance after Labor Day.  Municipals' relative strength was also visible in futures trading, where the December contract settled up 1/8.  The December Treasury bond futures contract ended the afternoon session down 5/32 for the day.  "There's been almost no new issuance this week and enough going-away interest in inventory that municipals have done fine" compared with U.S. securities, said one futures trader.  "In the past couple of weeks, it's been new issue volume that has been putting the most pressure on municipals," he added.  "If you take away the new issuance there's no need to hedge," which relieves pressure on municipal futures.  New Jersey Turnpike Authority 7.20% bonds due 2018 were at 97 3/4, up 1/8 on the day.  They yielded 7.37%, compared with 7.38% late Wednesday.  Meanwhile, a $292.8 million issue of Chicago-O'Hare International Airport revenue bonds sold by the municipality on behalf of American Airlines Inc. was withdrawn from the market recently.  The final pricing of the issue had been set Aug. 18 by underwriters led by Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co., and the bonds were trading on a when-issued basis in the secondary market.  Although the spokesman for the airline said the issue was being postponed "due to market conditions," analysts said the issue was derailed by the takeover rumors centering on American Airlines' parent company, AMR Corp.  "The concern is that in a leveraged buy-out the bonds are going to lose value," says one trader.  A money manager familiar with the issue said some investors complained to the underwriter that key convenants that protect shareholders against certain leveraged buy-outs were not included in the American Airlines bonds.  Corporate Issues  Prices ended 1/8 point lower in dull trading.  Meanwhile, First Boston Corp. will lead four other investment banks in providing the Tennessee Valley Authority with a proposal for the possible refinancing of $6.5 billion of debt it owes the government.  For First Boston and the other firms however, the deal remains to be sealed; the TVA hasn't yet decided if it will indeed return to the public markets after its 15-year hiatus.  The TVA for months now has been battling with the choice of whether it should proceed with the public market refinancing and risk losing its access to government funding.  The four other firms are Merrill Lynch Capital Markets, Morgan Stanley & Co., Salomon Brothers Inc. and Goldman, Sachs & Co.  If TVA goes ahead with the sale, the series of offerings would consist mainly of 30-year bonds that are callable in five years.  Foreign Bonds  The fear of higher interest rates pushed West German government bonds lower in moderate trading.  The West German economy is booming, and traders say they detect nervousness among investors that interest rates will rise to slow things down.  West Germany's 6 3/4% issue due June 1999 fell 0.05 to 99.50 to yield 6.82%, while the 6 3/4% issue due 1994 ended 0.15 point lower at 98.10 to yield 6.97%.  Elsewhere, British government bonds slipped on negative news about the economy and inflation.  Among other things, traders cited the labor agreement reached at British Telecom that called for a 9% wage increase.  "That reminded the markets of the persistent wage inflation pressures in the economy," one trader said.  Britain's benchmark 11 3/4% bond due 2003/2007 ended 13/32 lower at 114 7/8 to yield 9.72%, the highest since the beginning of August.  The 11 3/4% notes due 1991 fell 5/ 32 to 99 23/32 to yield 11.79%.  In Japan, the dollar's resilience and the prospect that yen short-term interest rates will stay firm kept buyers out of the Japanese government bond market.  Japan's benchmark 4.6% bond due 1998 ended at 97.02 to yield 5.090%, compared with a price of 97.22 to yield 5.055% Wednesday.  PANAMA NAMED new leaders, but Noriega was still in charge of the nation.  The Council of State picked a provisional president, Francisco Rodriguez, and a provisional vice president to fill a vacuum created by the cancellation of the presidential election May 7.  The new government is scheduled to take over today, when acting President Manuel Solis's constitutional mandate expires.  The appointments ensure Gen. Noriega's continuation as commander of the military and the country's de facto leader.  The council said that the national assembly will be replaced with 41 appointed legislators and that no new elections will be held until the U.S. lifts economic sanctions.  The U.S. said Argentina, Costa Rica and Jamaica plan to cut diplomatic ties with Panama, and Bush said diplomatic efforts to oust Noriega will continue.  ---  THE EPA ANNOUNCED steps to curb cancer-causing vapors from benzene.  The new rules involve one of the most widely used chemicals and would cost industry over $1 billion.  They would force a broad spectrum of businesses -- ranging from steel plants to service stations -- to cut benzene emissions that now pose cancer risks to people living nearby.  The U.S. has wrestled with the issue of benzene curbs for 15 years.  But it hasn't acted before because of foot-dragging and legal action, even though benzene is known to cause an incurable form of leukemia in humans.  The rules represent a new EPA policy, mandated by a 1987 court decision, under which the agency must pay more attention to health considerations.  ---  A powerful bomb wounded four people and damaged 12 buildings in Medellin, Colombia, as drug lords vowed to intensify their terror campaign.  Meanwhile, Israel disclosed that dependents had been ordered to leave Colombia, apparently for fear of retaliation for the alleged role of Israeli reserve officers in training drug assassins.  ---  Thousands of Moldavians protested a legislative compromise that substitutes Moldavian for Russian as the language of government and economic affairs but allows both languages to be used in everyday life.  The original bill made Moldavian the only official language.  Soviet leader Gorbachev had reportedly urged a compromise.  ---  Jim Bakker's trial was suspended and he was committed to an institution to determine his fitness to stand trial after a psychiatrist testified the TV evangelist was hallucinating and cowering in a fetal position in his lawyer's office.  Bakker is accused of swindling millions of dollars from followers.  He could get 120 years in jail if convicted.  ---  South African police waged running battles with anti-apartheid protesters in Johannesburg, firing shotguns into the air and lobbing tear gas at youths defying emergency laws to protest next week's racially segregated elections.  Dozens of leaders of the defiance campaign were arrested, including the head of the biggest union federation.  ---  Bush plans a new campaign to keep humanitarian aid flowing to Nicaragua's Contra rebels until next February's elections.  Under an accord reached in March, the aid could be cut off at the end of November.  Aides may also declassify CIA documents they say show increased Soviet bloc military aid to Managua.  ---  Libya ended a 15-year conflict with Chad by accepting the World Court as final arbiter on ownership of the 45,000-square-mile Aouzou Strip in the Sahara Desert.  The agreement was signed at a secret meeting in Algeria on the eve of celebrations in Tripoli marking the 20th anniversary of Col. Moammar Gadhafi's revolution.  ---  The FAA will start operating a $1 million bomb detector at New York's JFK airport today, but the machine won't spot the size bomb that destroyed Pan Am Flight 103 in December, Science magazine said.  To curb false alarms, Science said, the machine will be set to detect 2.5 pounds of explosives.  Experts say Flight 103 had one pound.  ---  A Moslem leader was quoted in a Beirut daily as saying Pope John Paul II should be kidnapped if he visits Lebanon's besieged Christians.  The abduction threat by a pro-Iranian Sunni Moslem leader was the most overt threat since the pope indicated Aug. 19 that he would like to visit Lebanon.  ---  Scientists have uncovered evidence that a mysterious form of hepatitis can be spread by heterosexual activity.  The finding, by the Centers for Disease Control in Atlanta, could complicate the fight against the chronic liver disease.  Most people who contract the non-A, non-B strain of the disease show no symptoms.  ---  Died: Morris "Moe" Dalitz, 89, Las Vegas developer and gambling pioneer, after a long illness.  Precious-metals futures prices in New York fell to life-of-contract lows -- silver for the fifth straight day -- because of a strong dollar, a lack of demand for bullion in cash markets and reports of Soviet sales.  December delivery gold declined $2.20 an ounce to $365.40.  December silver was off 4.5 cents an ounce to $5.165.  October platinum was down $5.70 an ounce to $473.50.  "Tuesday's rally is but a fond memory," said one analyst.  "Under present conditions, precious metals aren't able to withstand any kind of selling pressure."  Gold is nearing its low point of the past 12 months, set in June.  In London, dealers said a marked increase in Soviet sales is depressing gold's price.  "The Russians were very active during the past few weeks," a Swiss bullion dealer said.  The Soviets haven't only sold from production, he said, but also have "lent" gold to the market from their huge monetary reserves.  The Soviet Union is the second-largest producer in the world and this year's sales have risen about 25% to an annual rate of around 7.3 million ounces, estimated Jeffrey Nichols, managing director of APMA {Canada} Ltd., a Toronto-based precious metals consulting firm.  He figured that the Soviet's monetary gold reserves are 70 million to 80 million ounces and loans to the market effectively add to the supply of gold.  Moreover, the Bank of China is selling gold, too, said Edwin Arnold, metals analyst at Merrill Lynch Pierce Fenner & Smith in London.  China's sales could have reached around 3.5 million ounces since the June political crisis, Mr. Arnold said.  Both nations are selling gold because they are desperate for foreign exchange, dealers said.  A sharp increase in Soviet sales early February helped push gold downward through $400 in February.  The Soviet Union then reduced its offerings until the coal miners' strike a few weeks ago.  The Soviet government raised salaries and benefits to end the walkout.  The strike and settlement created such financial pressure on the nation that on some days gold sales ranged from 161,000 ounces to 320,000 ounces, Mr. Nichols of APMA {Canada} said.  "The Soviets have a reputation for savvy trading," Mr. Nichols said, "but sales were sloppy because gold was offered at any price."  Sales targets appear to be set weekly to correlate with the country's immediate hard currency needs, he said.  The Soviets have also been selling call options, which are promises to deliver gold in the future at preset prices, Mr. Nichols said.  Selling calls provides additional current income, he said.  Soviet gold offerings are soaring despite $3 billion in foreign bank borrowings in the first quarter, estimated the Bank for International Settlements.  But, besides intermittent crises such as coal strikes and ecological disasters, the Soviet Union still needs to sell gold and other commodities to finance higher grain and industrial imports, dealers said.  Pressure for economic reform will also lead to higher imports, which in turn must partly be financed by larger gold sales during coming years, a Swiss banker said.  Yet, instead of placing the gold on the free market, Mr. Nichols said, there could be direct Soviet transactions with foreign central banks that need the gold.  Considering the size of the sales, the performance of the gold price is encouraging, Mr. Arnold said.  Some London dealers are also hoping that jewelry fabricators will absorb more gold by increasing orders ahead of Christmas.  Others contend that fabricators have sufficient supplies.  Also, Asian demand, which was buoyant in the first half, is waning, pessimistic dealers said.  Gold-bullion imports by Japan, Taiwan, Hong Kong and Singapore fell to 261 tons in the second quarter of 1989 from 383 tons in the first quarter and 317 tons in the fourth quarter of 1988, estimated Commodities Research Unit, a London consulting firm.  In other commodity markets yesterday:  COPPER: Futures prices continued to recover from Tuesday's plunge.  The December contract ended with a gain of 3.35 cents a pound at $1.2895.  Prices sagged below previous closes through most of the day on news that Peruvian miners had ended their strike, but prices rebounded in late trading.  The Peruvian strike began on Aug. 14 and lasted 18 days.  A union official was reported to have admitted the walkout hadn't been a success.  One analyst observed that when all miners returned to work at the Toquepala mine earlier this week, it signaled the end of the nationwide strike, "so it was no great surprise."  However, he noted, "The strike may be ended for now but all the problems and dissent remain to be settled.  We'll be hearing from Peru again soon."  In British Columbia, there were no official announcements on the Highland Valley mine strike negotiations, one analyst said.  However, he noted, according to some terse comments by union leaders, both sides continue to be far apart and won't meet again until Tuesday.  It may be late September before agreement is reached, unless both parties change their stands.  "In a nutshell," the analyst said, "production problems still predominate."  Little output is expected the rest of this year from the Bougainville mine in Papua New Guinea, the Highland Valley strike is dragging on, and Chilean miners at the Salvador mine are expected to go on strike today.  "If it isn't one thing, it's another," the analyst said.  "That's been the pattern for some time."  ENERGY: Crude oil continued the rally that began Wednesday, although futures prices fell back after the October contract price reached but failed to break beyond $19 a barrel.  Spot prices of North Sea and Middle East crudes were up sharply 25 cents to 35 cents a barrel on European markets.  Also, several U.S. refiners increased the prices they pay in the field for West Texas Intermediate by 25 cents to $18 a barrel after Phillips Petroleum Co. raised its postings twice -- one 25-cent increase was effective Wednesday and the other yesterday -- to reach that level for the U.S. benchmark crude.  On the New York Mercantile Exchange, October West Texas Intermediate settled unchanged at $18.83 a barrel, but the November and December contracts were up eight cents and 11 cents a barrel, respectively.  Petroleum-product futures also kept a bullish tone as many traders sought to square positions before taking a four-day holiday over the Labor Day weekend.  Unleaded gasoline for September delivery, which expired at the closing, was down a fraction at 54.98 cents a gallon.  But the September heating oil contract, also expiring, was up 0.71 cent to settle at 53.82 cents a gallon.  Futures prices of gasoline and heating oil for October and November delivery increased 0.39 cent to 0.56 cent a gallon.  GRAINS AND SOYBEANS: Soybean and corn futures prices rose on trading-floor rumors that an early frost in September across parts of the Farm Belt might keep these crops from reaching full maturity.  The rumors spreading from trading pit to trading pit yesterday morning on the Chicago Board of Trade were unfounded, weather forecasters said, but they managed to move prices higher in pre-Labor Day weekend trading.  Soybean futures contracts for November delivery gained 9.75 cents to close at $5.875 a bushel, and December corn futures rose three cents to close at $2.3675 a bushel.  Harvey Freese, co-owner of Freese-Notis Weather Inc., Des Moines, Iowa, said, "We don't see an imminent frost."  He said frost typically descends on Midwestern growing regions in late September or in early October.  An exceedingly wet spring in much of Ohio and parts of Indiana delayed corn planting there and could result in some of this crop not reaching full maturity before the first frost, he said.  When a red light blinks on tonight in the dowdy television studio of MVS-Multivision, it will signal the start of a David-and-Goliath battle.  Little Multivision is mounting what may turn out to be the biggest challenge yet to Mexico's only other private television network, Televisa, widely considered the most powerful corporation in the country.  Multivision will offer eight channels to paying viewers in Mexico City and two channels to cable subscribers outside the capital.  Viewers will have access to items including the U.S.'s Cable News Network, pay-as-you-view movies and Multivision's own news broadcasts.  "The competitiveness that has come with the removal of barriers in the Mexican economy is finally arriving" in television, says Multivision's vice president, Joaquin Vargas Guajardo.  Of all the initiatives undertaken by the activist government of President Carlos Salinas de Gortari, granting air time to Multivision could be among the most important.  For almost 40 years, Televisa has had a near-monopoly on Mexican television, reaching from colonial-style mansions in the capital to dirt-floored huts in the countryside.  The television giant also has had great influence on political opinion -- and used it in favor of the ruling Institutional Revolutionary Party, or PRI.  But the economic decline that has sapped the PRI's popularity has taken the wind out of Televisa.  Its refusal to report widespread vote-counting irregularities that occurred in last year's presidential election may have been the last straw.  Angry crowds at political rallies began alternating chants of "Death to the PRI" with "Death to Televisa."  And with its coziness with Televisa reaching a stage of diminishing returns, the government has little to lose, analysts say, by experimenting with Multivision.  The new network's parent company, Telerey, whose interests include radio stations and television production facilities, began trying to acquire the television concession six years ago.  "Nothing really moved for us until Mr. Salinas arrived," says Mr. Vargas Guajardo.  But the upstart can't really hope to compete seriously with Televisa for several years.  The installation charge of more than $700 for Multivision's microwave receiver will exclude all but the well-heeled.  Televisa also has a lock on top talent.  "Maybe these people will show some soap operas from Venezuela," a Televisa spokesman says.  "In any case, I'm not very worried about them."  Some Televisa executives, however, aren't taking Multivision so lightly.  They see the government's concession to Multivision as just one manifestation of a worrisome erosion in Televisa's power.  For instance, a couple of weeks ago, the Mexican Communications Ministry rebuffed Televisa chief Emilio "The Tiger" Azcarraga Jr.'s effort to gain access to three new channels.  "The government hasn't been very nice to us lately," says a member of the Azcarraga clan.  And though Multivision's executives are well aware that two previous private television ventures have failed, they say the time is right for their project.  Advertisers put off by Televisa's prohibitive rates are lining up to buy air time, Multivision says.  And the high installation rates for its system will gradually decline, the company says, as more subscribers come aboard.  "This is a young country, and the youth is our target audience," says Pedro Ferriz, Multivision's 38-year-old anchorman, who gained a sizable following at Telerey's radio network.  The ebullient Mr. Ferriz could hardly be more of a contrast to the icy Televisa anchorman, Jacobo Zabludovsky.  Mr. Ferriz says he wants to promote greater audience participation through innovations such as phone-in polls.  But some say Mr. Ferriz won't do more than bring a change of style.  "You aren't going to see more open discussion of important national issues or more access for the political opposition," says political analyst Adolfo Aguilar Zinser, who sympathizes with the Mexican left.  Mr. Ferriz sighs at the mention of politics.  "Everyone wants to know our political line.  Well, we're nationalistic Mexicans.  We will try to promote what is good for Mexico."  As an example, he says: "Let's say it's five minutes before the broadcast and I find out there's going to be a devaluation of the peso tomorrow.  Well, I wouldn't go on the air with that.  That would be ugly."  But Mr. Ferriz isn't always so demure.  On a radio program last week, he unleashed a furious attack on leftist leader Cuauhtemoc Cardenas.  Mr. Ferriz told of making a weekend trip to Houston, where he said he bumped into Mr. Cardenas strolling through the expensive Galleria shopping mall.  That same day, back in Mr. Cardenas's home state of Michoacan, demonstrations were flaring after a disputed election for the local congress.  Mr. Ferriz asks: "How can he be spending a critical political weekend shopping at Neiman Marcus?  And carrying two big bags] This is the spokesman for the poor of Mexico?  I wouldn't be doing my job as a journalist if I didn't mention that."  Many analysts see the dollar remaining strong this month and expect the currency to trade higher through November before dropping back.  Most of the 10 analysts interviewed by the Dow Jones International News Service this week in London, Frankfurt, Tokyo and New York predicted interest-rate developments would be the engine driving the dollar.  In late New York trading yesterday, the dollar stood at 1.9668 marks and 145.00 yen.  A month ago, a similar survey had a decidedly bearish bent and predicted the dollar would be at 1.8652 marks and 138.14 yen at the end of August.  In Tokyo Friday, the U.S. currency opened for trading at 144.95 yen, up from Thursday's Tokyo close of 144.28 yen.  The average of the midrange estimates by the 10 analysts puts the dollar around 1.9660 marks and 146.00 yen at the end of September and at 1.9620 marks and 146.25 yen at the end of November.  The forecasts ranged from 1.8900 marks to 2.0500 marks and 135.00 yen to 157.00 yen in September, and 1.8700 marks to 2.2000 marks and 139.00 to 160.00 yen over the 90-day period.  Half of the analysts said the dollar would touch or move above 2.000 marks this month.  This comes after a season of volatile trading that saw the dollar peak at intraday highs of 2.0574 marks and 151.85 yen in mid-June and hit intraday lows of 1.8545 marks on July 10 and 135.53 yen on Aug. 2.  Francoise Soares-Kemp, a vice president at Credit Suisse in New York, is an unabashed dollar bull who said she sees the U.S. currency in a long-term uptrend.  She predicts the currency will top 2.000 marks by the end of September and continue its climb over the 90 days.  Kevin Logan, chief economist with the Swiss Bank Corp. in New York, agrees -- but only in the short-term.  He predicts pent-up dollar demand will drive the dollar to 2.000 marks in September, but sees the U.S. currency retreating as short-term U.S. interest rates drift lower.  He adds that tight monetary policies in both West Germany and Japan also will temper the dollar's strength.  Mr. Logan expects that hard-hitting central bank intervention this autumn will curb the market's appetite for a stronger dollar.  As the dollar hits higher levels, "the central banks will be back in force," Mr. Logan predicts.  Doug Madison, a corporate trader at Bank of America in Los Angeles, paints a similar picture.  "If the dollar starts climbing, the rise will be met with the same kind of aggressive intervention we saw last spring," he said.  Central bank intervention "is the best argument that can be made against the view we'll see a sustained upside move."  In Frankfurt, Ernst Pullman at Deutsche Girozentrale-Deutsche Kommunalbank predicts interest-rate differentials will spur a downward dollar move over the next three months, but not before the currency hits 2.000 marks.  He argues that West German Chancellor Helmut Kohl's political troubles and the scandals hurting Japan's ruling Liberal Democratic Party will favor the dollar in the short term.  But in a few months time, he says, easier U.S. interest rates and monetary tightening in West Germany will force the dollar below current levels.  Graham Beale, with the Hongkong & Shanghai Banking Corp. in New York, offers a contrary view of the effects of West German rate increase.  He suggests that any move in West German rates would be inflationary and probably seen as a sign of weakness in the West German government.  He predicts the positive effect of a rate increase on the mark would last only a matter of days before interest in the dollar resurfaced.  Tokyo analyst Noriyuki Mizukami, a senior manager at the treasury department of Sanwa Bank Ltd., offers a bullish forecast for the dollar for September and over the next three months.  "The attraction of investing in the U.S. is still very strong.  Investment trust fund managers tell me that the rate of return is still very good in the U.S," said Mr. Mizukami, who sees the dollar going as high as 160 yen by November.  "They don't feel it's necessary to hedge a large share of their dollar positions."  Projections for sterling were generally glum, with analysts forecasting a steep decline in the next 90 days.  The averages of the midrange forecasts for the pound are $1.5569 at the end of September and $1.5344 by Nov. 30.  The pound ended Thursday at $1.5683.  Tim Fox, a treasury economist with Midland Bank PLC in London, said there is potential for the pound to retreat significantly in the longer term, but in the short-term "there should be relative stability."  In London, S.G. Warburg & Co. economists said the U.K. "seems to be gliding" toward a slowdown, but if "the decline in consumer demand is greater than we expect, sterling could come off further."  Mr. Beale of Hongkong & Shanghai put it more bluntly: "If they don't raise rates, sterling will fall, and if they do raise rates, sterling will fall."  ---  This article was prepared by AP-Dow Jones reporters Larry Holyoke in Tokyo, John Hitchcock in London, Arjen Bongard in Bonn and Caitlin Randall in New York.  A federal grand jury indicted Glen G. Magnuson Jr., former general counsel of First City Bancorp of Texas, on three felony counts involving alleged embezzlement from the bank.  According to the indictment, Mr. Magnuson stole $18,484 from First City in a complicated scheme to pay off a personal debt to a former employer, Brown & Root, a unit of Halliburton Co, an oil-field service concern.  Mr. Magnuson allegedly prepared a false invoice from Brown & Root's legal representative, the Houston law firm of Butler & Binion, for the amount he owed.  The firm then transferred the proceeds to Brown & Root, the indictment alleged.  Brown & Root, an engineering and construction firm, wasn't named in the indictment, and couldn't be reached for comment.  Nor was Butler & Binion named.  An attorney from that firm declined to comment.  Mr. Magnuson, who was fired last month by First City for the alleged embezzlement, also declined to comment.  The charges include one count of bank fraud and two counts of making false entries on the books.  Each count carries a possible five year prison term and a $250,000 fine.  Times Mirror Co. named its president, David Laventhol, to the additional posts of publisher and chief executive officer of the Los Angeles Times.  In his new role, he will lead the flagship paper's fight against suburban rivals.  The 55-year-old Mr. Laventhol succeeds W. Thomas Johnson Jr.  After nine years as publisher of the Times, Mr. Johnson takes on the new post of chairman of the parent's newspaper management committee.  He remains a Times Mirror vice chairman.  Mr. Johnson, 47, would continue to be closely associated with the Times in another new position as chairman of the newspaper, Times Mirror said, although a spokesman said his main responsibilities now will be broadened to include such strategic matters at its newspaper group as dealing with company-wide marketing, acquisitions and newsprint supply.  Mr. Johnson said in a statement that Times Mirror Chairman Robert F. Erburu "asked me to assume broader responsibilities . . . a set of opportunities to grow and to contribute to Times Mirror in other important areas."  Newspaper-industry watchers, however, suggested that the moves seemed geared to inject the Times with the benefit of Mr. Laventhol's deeper editorial background and especially his experience with the recent dynamic growth of Times Mirror's Newsday in the New York City market.  Although the Los Angeles Times is one of the nation's most successful and largest newspapers, with a daily circulation of more than 1.1 million, it has been undergoing a period of self-analysis for years and has seemed especially concerned about its inability to derail such growing competitors as the Orange County Register and the suburban Los Angeles Daily News.  "It doesn't sound as though Tom Johnson's job is one of those glittering steps upward," said Ben H. Bagdikian, a journalism professor at the University of California at Berkeley and a veteran newspaper critic.  John Morton, a securities analyst at his own Washington-based firm, described Mr. Laventhol's experience at Newsday as "an arrow in your quiver that's hard to duplicate."  The analyst said he doubted there was "anything at the L.A. Times that has precipitated this.  It has been struggling, but so have all newspapers; it's a tough environment."  It was widely observed that the moves increase the chances that Mr. Laventhol will eventually succeed the 58-year-old Mr. Erburu as Times Mirror chief executive.  Mr. Johnson had been seen as competing with Mr. Laventhol for that position.  None of the Times Mirror executives returned phone calls seeking further comment.  Reporters in the Times newsroom here said they were stunned to hear the word yesterday afternoon and hadn't seen any previous indication that a change in publishers was in the works.  They noted, in contrast, the relatively public procedure during which Mr. Johnson picked Shelby Coffy III as editor of the Times early this year.  Top editors, however, appear to have been informed in advance of the latest change.  Mr. Johnson has acknowledged that there is a perception he has sometimes moved too slowly in meeting challenges facing the newspaper.  In early August, addressing reporters and editors in the Times Washington bureau, for example, he alluded to the strong competition the newspaper has faced from the robust Orange County Register.  "I think that Orange County has been a failure of mine and I should have done more sooner there," he said, according to a transcript of the meeting provided to The Wall Street Journal.  Mr. Johnson referred to "blood all over the floor" at the Times' Los Angeles headquarters because of a recent decision to free the editor and publisher of its Orange County edition from most control of Los Angeles-based executives.  He also spoke of the so-far unsuccessful effort to find the "right niche" for the advertising-poor Sunday Los Angeles Times Magazine.  However, in his talk to the bureau, Mr. Johnson was mostly upbeat about the Times, its accomplishments and its future.  He talked of a room full of prototypes of national, western and all-California editions of the Times -- which the paper for years has been reluctant to launch.  He spoke of the more than $630 million investment in new plants and printing equipment that allows the Times to become a full-color newspaper.  In what might sound, in retrospect, like a swan song, Mr. Johnson noted he was celebrating his 12th anniversary that day as a top Times executive.  "For me to serve as publisher of the Times," he said,"is just about the highest honor that could come my way -- almost like a Pulitzer Prize, a Medal of Honor, or election {as} Pope rolled into one."  He called it "an opportunity for which I have been extraordinarily grateful."  Reporters describe Mr. Johnson as very amiable, and many are on a first name basis with him.  Mr. Johnson's secretary said yesterday he was "wandering around the building" talking to staff members.  In other management changes at the parent, Jerome S. Rubin, group vice president of Times Mirror's professional information and book publishing operations, was named to the new post of chairman of professional information and book publishing, effective Jan. 1.  Times Mirror said Larry W. Peterson, president of the company's Matthew Bender & Co. book publishing unit, will be named to the additional post of group vice president of Times Mirror, with responsibility for overseeing the company's three job-training companies and its software research and development arm.  Patrick A. Clifford, president of the C.V. Mosby Co. and Richard D. Irwin Inc. units, will become a corporate vice president, with responsibility for the company's medical and health sciences, scientific and technical and college textbook publishing.  He will report to group vice president Edward E. Johnson.  Harley-Davidson Inc. said it agreed to sell its Parkway Distributors operation to closely held Stag Trailer Supply Inc. of Atlanta.  The Milwaukee-based maker of motorcycles and recreational vehicles didn't disclose specific terms of the all-cash transaction, which it expects to close by mid-October.  Parkway, a division of Harley's Holiday Rambler recreational-vehicle unit, distributes RV parts and accessories, as does Stag.  A spokeswoman declined to disclose Parkway's sales, but said the operation is profitable.  The company will record a gain from the sale, she added, but refused to elaborate.  Harley-Davidson said Parkway is "at a decisive point in its development where it must expand," and that the division "no longer fits with our strategic plan" under which the Holiday Rambler unit will focus on its "core businesses."  Northgate Exploration Ltd. said it exercised an option to acquire a 30% interest in the Colomac gold-mine project from Neptune Resources Corp. for 25 million Canadian dollars (US$21.2 million), raising its stake in the mine to 50%.  Northgate and Neptune, both Toronto-based gold mining concerns, said the transaction is subject to approval by Neptune's bankers.  They said the funds will go toward developing the C$155 million mine in Canada's Northwest Territories.  They said production is expected to begin in next year's second quarter and eventually is to reach 200,000 ounces of gold annually.  Northgate owns about 50% of Neptune.  National Heritage Inc., an affiliate of Southmark Corp., said it will proceed with plans to spin off its nursing-home management business despite Southmark's move to delay a shareholder vote on the plan.  At a meeting of National Heritage shareholders yesterday, Southmark marshalled enough votes to delay the meeting until Sept. 12.  National Heritage contended that the delay violated a court order and said it will go back to court to block the Sept. 12 meeting.  The wrangling was the latest over National Heritage's efforts to distance itself from Southmark, which is reorganizing under Chapter 11 of the U.S. Bankruptcy Code.  Southmark and another affiliate together hold a 62.5% stake in National Heritage.  Southmark opposes National Heritage's plans to spin off some of its assets because the plan, as structured, would dilute Southmark's stake.  Southmark had planned to propose a replacement of National Heritage's board yesterday, but its proxy materials didn't reach all shareholders before the meeting, prompting its request for a delay.  The court order forcing National Heritage to take its spinoff proposal to shareholders expired yesterday, clearing the way for National Heritage to proceed with its plans, according to general counsel Allen I. Hirsch.  Maxxam Inc.'s Kaiser Aluminum & Chemical Corp. unit said it completed the sale of its 20% interest in Boyne Smelters Ltd. in Australia to Austria Metall AG. Terms weren't disclosed.  The sale is part of a divestiture program by Kaiser Aluminum and its parent, KaiserTech, that is now substantially complete.  The asset sales have raised $452 million in the first eight months of this year, the company said.  The proceeds, about $369 million, were mainly used to reduce Kaiser Aluminum's consolidated debt from about $606 million at Dec. 31, 1988.  Kaiser Aluminum said it and KaiserTech are in the process of refinancing substantially all of their separate debts of $220 million and $925 million, respectively, into a package of about $750 million of Kaiser Aluminum bank financing and about $400 million of Kaiser Aluminum subordinated debt securities.  Maxxam said it has entered into commitment letters with BankAmerica Corp.'s Bank of America and certain other banks for the refinancing, expected to be completed this fall.  Maxxam is a Los Angeles-based holding company with interests in forest products operations, aluminum production, real estate management and development.  Atlantic Financial Federal, Bala Cynwyd, Pa., said it is adding $41 million to loan-loss reserves.  The additional reserves will hurt earnings in the fiscal fourth quarter, ending Sept. 30, the company said.  In the fiscal 1988 fourth quarter, the thrift reported net income of about $1.5 million, all of which was used to pay preferred dividends.  Of the total new reserves, $15 million has been reserved for the the company's commercial-real-estate and corporate-banking loan portfolios.  The remaining $26 million was added to general reserves, of which $19 million is unassigned and undergoing further review.  Gap Inc., a San Francisco-based retailer, said sales for the four weeks ended last Saturday rose 25% to $119 million from $95 million a year earlier.  Sales at stores open more than a year increased 15%.  Gap now operates 950 stores, compared with 871 a year earlier.  For the 30 weeks ended last Saturday, Gap said, sales rose 26% to $755 million from $601 million a year earlier.  Comparable-store sales increased 16%.  Banca Nazionale del Lavoro, Italy's largest state-owned bank, said it will restructure its operations in North America following a financial scandal at its Atlanta branch.  Although bank officials declined to give details, they said steps will be taken to "strengthen the structure of the North American area."  Banca Nazionale earlier disclosed that its Atlanta branch had been involved in a financial scandal regarding some 2,500 transactions for letters of credit for exports to Iraq.  The total value of the transactions hasn't been determined, the bank said.  Moreover, the question of who will bear the brunt of any losses is still unclear.  The U.S. Commodity Credit Corp., the lending arm of the Agriculture Department that guaranteed the bulk of the letters of credit, has said it isn't liable for losses resulting from fraud.  Stock prices rose, pushed by a hunt for value in industrial shares and a late round of purchases by investment funds that track the overall market.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average rose 9.12 to 2737.27.  Broader averages gained less.  The Standard & Poor's 500-stock index rose 0.80 to 351.45, and the New York Stock Exchange composite index gained 0.36 to 195.27.  Big Board trading volume contracted to 143,420,000 shares from 174,350,000 Wednesday.  Big buying orders at the close were attributed to so-called index funds, which measure their investment returns on a monthly basis against a benchmark such as the S&P 500 index and typically adjust their portfolios at the end of each month.  Though stocks moved in narrow ranges for most of the session, traders saw pockets of investor activity such as a stunning plunge in airline stocks.  An article in yesterday's Wall Street Journal said the Department of Transportation may soon curtail leveraged buy-outs and foreign investment in the airline industry.  Speculators dumped shares on the news.  AMR, the parent of American Airlines, tumbled 5 to 88 on 3.7 million shares, more than five times its average daily volume.  Delta Air Lines went down 4 1/8 to 79 7/8, and Southwest Airlines tumbled 1 3/8 to 28 7/8.  UAL, parent of United Airlines, after a swift morning dive, recovered to close down only 1/4 at 279 3/4.  "The Department of Transportation is trying to reincarnate the idea that airlines are natural resources that shouldn't be loaded up with debt and passed on later in the form of higher fares," said Morten S. Beyer, chairman of Avmark Inc., a Washington-based aviation consultant.  "But unless they (the Transportation Department) put their money where their mouth is, the threat will be tossed out tomorrow morning with the coffee grounds."  The Dow Jones Transportation Average fell 20.10 to 1509.42, snapping a five-session string of record highs.  Elsewhere, traders said investors appeared to be doubling their bets on cyclical stocks, which rise and fall with economic activity.  Today's trio of economic reports -- leading indicators, employment and purchasing managers' survey -- is expected to confirm expectations of sustained economic growth and stable inflation.  Among cyclical stocks in the Dow Jones Industrial Average, Union Carbide rose 1 3/8 to 31 1/8, partly on the buy recommendation of Mabon Nugent analyst Robert Reitzes.  The stock has recently captured the attention of investors who specialize in undervalued issues.  Carbide's ratio of stock price to per-share earnings is about 5, compared with roughly 13 for the S&P 500.  General Motors gained 1/4 to 49 as 2.5 million shares were traded.  Other strong blue-chips included United Technologies, which went up 1 1/8 to 55 3/4; Texaco, up 3/4 to 50 5/8; Boeing, up 1/2 to 54 3/4; and Allied-Signal, up 1/2 to 40 1/8.  On the other hand, Coca-Cola fell 1/8 to 66 1/2 after a disappointing earnings forecast from Coca-Cola Enterprises, in which it holds a 48% stake.  Coca-Cola Enterprises, which said 1989 earnings will be well below analysts' expectations and the year-earlier level, lost 3/4 to 16 3/4 on 1.5 million shares.  PepsiCo slid 1 1/4 to 59 amid indications that higher chicken prices will hurt sales at Kentucky Fried Chicken, owned by the company's KFC unit.  Prudential-Bache Securities analyst Leslie Steppel said the average Kentucky Fried unit expects sales to fall 4% to 5% because of rising prices.  Reebok International climbed 1 3/8 to 16 as 2.2 million shares changed hands.  Kidder Peabody raised its rating on the stock and its 1989 and 1990 earnings estimates, citing improvement in the athletic-footwear market.  Gap, which reported that August sales went up 25% from a year earlier, gained 1 3/8 to 52 1/4.  Other retailers were mixed as major chains reported moderate August sales gains.  Oryx Energy jumped 1 7/8 to 39 5/8.  Salomon Brothers issued a buy recommendation and raised its estimate of the company's net asset value by $10 a share to $51.  Hercules rose 1/4 to 51 1/4.  Merrill Lynch raised its short-term and long-term ratings on the stock and said the company's management may have decided to dispose of its Simmons defense electronics unit.  On the takeover front, Upjohn saw the end of a rally driven by rumors that a bid was coming from a foreign concern.  The stock, which gained a total of 3 3/4 over the two previous sessions, fell 2 to 39 1/8 on 2.4 million shares.  First Interstate Bancorp jumped 2 5/8 to 69 5/8.  Speculation that Wells Fargo might be interested in buying the company fueled the rise, traders said.  Wells Fargo said it has looked at several California banks as possible takeover targets but wouldn't be more specific.  The American Stock Exchange Index rose 0.61 to 382.19.  Volume totaled 13,170,000 shares, compared with 14,610,000 Wednesday.  There were 313 issues advancing, 243 declining and 291 unchanged.  Bolar Pharmaceutical lost 1 1/8 to 20 5/8.  Food and Drug Administration Commissioner Frank Young said the agency hasn't yet exonerated the company, which was accused of substituting a brand-name drug, Dyazide, in laboratory tests to gain approval for its generic version.  B.A.T Industries fell 1/4 to 13 1/8.  Sir James Goldsmith, part of an investor group seeking to acquire the company, said the bid is likely to fail unless British regulators extend the deadline for completing the takeover.  Graphic Technology rose 1 7/8 to 17 3/8.  The company said it agreed in principle to an $18.50-a-share takeover proposal from a bidder identified only as a major foreign corporation.  Elxsi Corp. said it sold a 20% stake in the company to a group of investors for $3 million.  The agreement, subject to certain conditions, is expected to be completed by Sept. 21.  The investors, Milley & Co. and the Airlie Group L.P. of Greenwich, Conn., will also lend Elxsi as much as $7 million, when it meets certain other conditions, the company said.  Elxsi, a maker of minisupercomputers has been plagued by losses.  Last month, the company fired half its staff and closed its San Jose manufacturing facilities to concentrate on its computer-maintenance business.  Great American Management & Investment Inc. said it and Jepson Corp. have reached an agreement with Jepson stockholders who sued to block the acquisition of Jepson by Great American.  Great American, a Chicago-based financial-services concern, said that although it believes the suit was without merit, a settlement was preferable to drawn-out litigation which would further delay completion of its tender offer.  Great American also said it extended its $12-a-share, or $222 million, offer for Jepson to Sept. 11 from Aug. 30.  So far, it said, about 17.6 million shares, or 95%, of Jepson's shares have been tendered.  Jepson said the settlement, which is subject to certain conditions, provides for the dissemination of additional information to Jepson holders.  Also, the defendants agreed not to dispute the payment of the plantiffs' legal fees and expenses.  Jepson is a Chicago-based holding company with interests in consumer, commercial and industrial products.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, Jepson closed at $11.875, unchanged.  When your average company announces that annual earnings will fall sharply, investors can't bail out fast enough.  But they didn't pound Coca-Cola Enterprises shares yesterday as hard as they have some other companies of late.  Coca-Cola Enterprises, the giant soft-drink bottler that is 49%-owned by Coca-Cola, a Wall Street darling, announced late Wednesday that its 1989 earnings could tumble as much as 37%.  Despite a turnaround in soft-drink pricing that was supposed to be beneficial, the company said its results would be hurt by lower-than-expected soft-drink volume and higher-than-expected marketing costs.  The news clearly upset some analysts who started firing off sell recommendations.  Prudential-Bache's George Thompson, for example, cut his recommendation from aggressive buy to sell short-term, and to hold if an investor's time frame is more than six months.  But when investors got their chance to react to this latest -- and perhaps worst -- in a long string of disappointments, they pushed Coca-Cola Enterprises' stock down just 3/4 to close at 16 3/4 yesterday.  That 4% drop isn't an insignificant decline, but the stock still closed well above its 12 5/8 low of the past year.  "A lot of the optimists were washed out of this stock a long time ago," says Jeffrey Diermeier, First Chicago Investment Advisors.  He's upbeat about Coca-Cola Enterprises' long-term prospects.  The stock reacted mildly, too, because the pricing outlook in the soft-drink industry, a consistent downer for the past couple of years, is getting brighter.  Coca-Cola and PepsiCo bottlers had been locked in a price-slashing war designed to steal market share away from each other.  Volumes grew as consumers lapped up the deals, but discounted prices squeezed the bottlers' profit margins.  That price battle, according to Coca-Cola Enterprises, has been the reason for its uneven and disappointing profit record since it went public three years ago.  Coca-Cola Enterprises' results are extremely price-sensitive: A 1% annual price swing can add, or subtract, as the case may be, 15 cents a share to its bottom line.  This year, new cost pressures -- particularly from rising packaging and sweetener expenses -- prompted Pepsi and Coke bottlers to push through price increases.  Industry executives assumed that when prices came up, so too would Coca-Cola Enterprises' earnings.  So what happened?  In short, Coca-Cola Enterprises, whose operations account for a hefty 43% of Coca-Cola's domestic bottling business, misjudged consumer resistance to soft drinks sold at non-promotional prices.  In July and August, Coca-Cola Enterprises increased its soft-drink prices 2% to 3% on average -- a move that hurt volume growth.  Coca-Cola Enterprises would say only that volume in those two months was less than expected.  Analysts estimate that third-quarter volume will be flat or up slightly.  The results compare, however, with a strong year-earlier third quarter.  Although the Street generally views Coca-Cola Enterprises' pricing posture as positive in the long term, some people are critical of the way it was carried out.  Rather than boosting prices in the slower first quarter, Coca-Cola Enterprises pushed through the price increases in the summertime -- exposing its peak selling season to a sales slowdown as consumers balked.  "Company executives get paid to anticipate these things," says PaineWebber analyst Emanuel Goldman.  "There should have been more price movement earlier in the year."  In the bottling business, adds analyst Lee Wilder of Robinson-Humphrey, "small misjudgments have huge impacts."  Coca-Cola Enterprises declined to comment.  Because of marketing and promotional spending designed to build volume, Coca-Cola Enterprises now says 1989 per-share net income will be 40 to 45 cents a share, down from last year's operating earnings of 71 cents and from analysts' projections of about 65 cents.  Some analysts think the stock could sit in a rut, near its current price, for several months.  "It's very unlikely you'll see any further disappointment," says Mr. Thompson at Prudential-Bache, "but they're not likely to surprise you on the upside."  The company, which Coca-Cola created by bundling up several of its giant bottlers and selling a 51% stake to the public, is in the awkward position of having to disclose results every quarter.  By contrast, results of PepsiCo's company-owned bottlers are buried in the parent company's numbers.  Higher soft-drink prices are expected to stick, many in the industry say, and eventually benefit Coca-Cola Enterprises.  And that will help Coca-Cola Enterprises' institutional shareholders, such as Daniel Breen & Co.  "It's incumbent on both {Pepsi and Coca-Cola bottlers} to improve pricing," says Daniel Breen, president.  "I would have to say there's light at the end of the tunnel."  @ ---  @ Coca-Cola Enterprises  @ (NYSE; Symbol: CCE)  @ Business: Soft drink bottler  @ Year ended Dec. 31, 1988:  @ Revenue: $3.87 billion  @ Net income: $152.6 million*; or $1.03 a share  @ Second quarter, June 30, 1989:  @ Per-share earnings: 26 cents vs. 28 cents  @ Average daily trading volume:  @ 180,052 shares  @ Common shares outstanding: 130 million  *Includes $103.8 million pre-tax gain from sale of bottling operation, and a $27 million pre-tax charge related to restructuring costs.  An arbitrator assessed damages of $10.5 million against baseball's team owners for their conspiracy to restrict the free-agent market for players after the 1985 season.  The long-awaited ruling raised as many questions as it answered.  It wasn't immediately clear, for instance, whether the award was stiff enough to deter future attempts by owners to prevent players from auctioning themselves to the highest bidder in a free and open market.  "I hope so," said Donald Fehr, head of the players union.  "But in the next round of bargaining {for a new labor agreement}, it's a good bet that players will ask for specific protection against collusion."  Mr. Fehr noted that the damages awarded by arbitrator Thomas Roberts could grow substantially in future hearings.  Mr. Roberts assessed damages only for loss of salary, Mr. Fehr said.  Still to be determined are whether players will collect more for the presumed loss of signing bonuses and other incentives, or for a player's lost opportunity to become a free agent, he added.  Attorney's fees and interest also haven't been added in.  While the arbitrator didn't give the union all that it asked for, Mr. Fehr insisted that this was a "substantial" award that vindicated the union's position.  He anticipates even larger damages in the separate collusion case filed on behalf of free agents after the 1986 season.  In that year, far more big-name players were eligible for free agency than in the post-1985 bidding.  According to someone familiar with the filings in the arbitration cases, the union has asked for as much as $100 million in damages in the 1986 case.  In the 1985 case, the union asked for as much as $25.5 million.  Barry Rona, executive director of the owners' Player Relations Council, wouldn't comment on the substance of the ruling, but noted that the owners are "sensitive to the fact that this is an issue we will have to address" in future collective-bargaining talks.  Mr. Rona said owners will seek a "new baseball partnership based on a system of player compensation that is fair for all involved and in the inherent long-term interests of the game."  Television preferences of black Americans, who watch more TV than whites, continue to have a strong impact on the success of individual shows, according to the latest annual study by advertising firm BBDO Worldwide.  Strong black viewership of NBC's "Hunter" and "In the Heat of the Night" pulled both police dramas into the top 20 for the 1988-1989 season that ended last April.  The programs, tied for 16th place overall, ranked 23rd and 26th respectively among non-black households, according to the study, which is based on a special tabulation of Nielsen ratings.  Blacks, on the other hand, ranked the shows ninth and sixth, respectively.  The study also found that "Wiseguy," a CBS entry that does not feature a black character, may owe its continued run on TV to black support.  The show ranked 19th among the black households, but 78th among non-blacks.  The result was a total ranking of 58th, with a rating of 12.0, roughly the minimum that industry officials say is needed to stay on the air.  "If you look at the shows they cut, there's always a number, say about 12, that says a show is safe," said Doug Alligood, the study's author.  "If you didn't have that black audience adding the one or two {rating} points, that show {"Wiseguy"} could be off the air."  The new study by the unit of Omnicom Group found that black households widened their lead in prime-time viewership.  The average prime-time show had a rating of 16.8 in black households, compared with a national rating of 13.  The rating represents the percentage of households tuned in to a show.  One black rating point equals about 96,000 households; one national rating point equals about 886,000 households.  BBDO has conducted its study each year since 1985.  Fourteen of the top 20 shows with black viewers were also among the most popular with non-blacks, but the rank order was significantly different.  For example, "Roseanne," the No. 2 show nationally, tied for 14th in black homes.  "All people talked about last year was the success of 'Roseanne,' but that was not the case across the board," said Mr. Alligood, vice president for special markets at BBDO.  "Had that show had the same appeal to blacks as non-blacks, it would have beaten 'Cosby' easily.  The black audience in effect detracted from the rating of 'Roseanne.'"  David Poltrack, vice president for research at CBS, said the network was "definitely aware of the importance of the black audience, not only on program-by-program, but in particular time periods."  Mr. Poltrack conceded that his network and ABC have not been able to match the success of NBC in airing "crossover" hits -- shows that get a good non-black audience but have particular appeal to blacks.  Mr. Poltrack said CBS hopes a new mystery show "Snoops," about a black husband-and-wife team, will improve the network's fortunes.  Mr. Alligood, who last year accurately predicted nine of this year's top 10 shows with blacks, predicted that "Snoops" will do well but probably won't break the black top 20.  Help-wanted advertising rose a bit in July from June, but hiring is slowing down, the Conference Board said in its monthly study of the employment indicator.  The help-wanted advertising index, compiled by the nonprofit, industry-supported group, rose three points to 149 in July after declining for the three previous months.  The seasonally adjusted index, which is based on a measurement of advertising volume in 51 major U.S. newspapers, uses 1967 as a base of 100.  "There is no question any longer about the cooling off in labor market conditions," said Kenneth Goldstein, a Conference Board economist.  "Don't be fooled by the modest rise in national help-wanted advertising volume in July.  Total volume was still lower than it was two months earlier and considerably below where it was a year ago."  The index stood at 152 in May and at 160 in July 1988.  Its highest level this year was in April when it was 159.  In the July survey, 63% of the newspapers had rising ad volume, compared with 22% in June and May.  During that three-month period, according to the Bureau of Labor Statistics, the U.S. unemployment rate was about 5.2%.  The West South Central region, consisting of Dallas, New Orleans, Tulsa and San Antonio, recovered from an earlier decline and posted a 9% rise in help-wanted ads in July.  The West North Central and the Pacific regions, which had declines of 5.7% and 3.3%, respectively, in the latest survey, are just beginning to feel a softening of the labor market, the Conference Board said.  The West North Central region includes Kansas City, Minneapolis and Omaha.  Advertising in New England and in the Middle Atlantic cities of New York, Albany, Philadelphia and Pittsburgh fell 3.7% and 4.5%.  Ads in the East North Central region, which includes Chicago, Cincinnati, Milwaukee and Detroit, fell 0.8%, while at papers in the South Atlantic cities of Atlanta, Baltimore, Miami and Jacksonville, advertising rose 2.3%.  Japan's trade balance in the first 20 days of August was in surplus by $1.8 billion, down from a $2.86 billion surplus a year earlier, the Finance Ministry said.  Exports rose 0.9% to $13.02 billion from $12.9 billion a year earlier.  Imports rose 11.7% to $11.22 billion from $10.04 billion.  The ministry provides a full breakdown and explanations only in the full monthly report.  As has been the case in recent trade reports, it was increasing imports that took a slice out of the surplus.  Italy's consumer price index rose 0.2% in August from July and was up 6.7% from a year earlier, the state statistical institute Istat reported.  The institute said the index, with 1985 as the base year, registered 124.6 in August, compared with 124.4 in April and 116.8 in August 1988.  The monthly increase in August was unchanged from the rise in July, but on a year-to-year basis, inflation eased from the 7% rate registered in July.  The drop in inflation was slightly larger than had been expected on the basis of preliminary statistics released last week by a number of large cities.  On the basis of the municipal statistics, economists had expected that national inflation would be 6.8%.  This sultry Gulf Coast tourist and fishing town of 46,000 people looks as if it could use some help.  Biloxi has its share of decrepit streets, boarded store fronts and run-down housing.  In the West End Homes public housing project, Sidney Reed grabs a broom and sweeps a pile of rodent dung from a corner between the stove and sink.  In the refrigerator, dozens of small roaches lie dead.  In fact, the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development has come to Biloxi's rescue.  But it hasn't kept the rats and the roaches out of Biloxi's housing projects.  HUD has helped with money the city used to buy a restaurant and engineer a marina, among other things.  Such amenities are part of a $20-million-to-$40-million waterfront development project that has become a minor monument to hanky-panky at HUD.  By using HUD money to underwrite some of the project's initial costs, local and federal officials have distorted the department's mandate to foster low-income housing beyond easy recognition -- and perhaps also beyond the limits of the law.  The billions of dollars that should have reached the poor during the Reagan years at HUD, but that went instead to politically motivated purposes, represent the heavy price paid by the poor as a result of the influence-peddling and skewed priorities at HUD.  In the waterfront-project scandal that deprived the poor of this struggling city, the cast of characters includes Deborah Gore Dean, the glamorous, ambitious former HUD official at the center of the investigations under way in Washington.  According to persons familiar with aspects of the Biloxi project, Ms. Dean was called about the waterfront grant by the White House when she was executive assistant to former HUD Secretary Samuel Pierce.  Ms. Dean, who testified before a federal grand jury, said the project got special attention because of the White House interest, according to the sources.  Ms. Dean stated that she often received phone calls from the White House or from members of Congress concerning applicants seeking HUD funds, the sources add.  For example, Sen. Trent Lott, a Mississippi Republican, was a strong supporter of the Biloxi project, and his office called Ms. Dean to let her know of his support, according to the sources.  The characters also include Biloxi's former mayor, Gerald Blessey, and Reba Capers, former executive director of the Greater Biloxi Economic Development Foundation; both are awaiting a jury verdict in federal court here, where they stood trial for illegally using federal funds for the project.  Dubois Gilliam, a former HUD official in Washington, also has been indicted.  Mr. Gilliam allegedly had a financial interest in the project while he was steering federal money into it.  All deny wrongdoing.  Former Mayor Blessey began pushing the project in December 1983.  Biloxi's economy hadn't fully rebounded, and still hasn't, from Hurricane Camille, which ravaged the Point Cadet waterfront 20 years ago.  Development there was supposed to generate 1,400 jobs at a hotel, an assortment of specialty shops and eating places called a "festival marketplace," an amusement park and the marina.  Connie Payton, president of Biloxi's tenants association, says she doubts that the poor would get the jobs on Biloxi's fancy new waterfront.  "I don't think it would benefit anyone," she says.  "I just think their priorities are all wrong."  The city had the power to apply for, obtain and disburse HUD funds to projects directly benefiting the needy.  But in a series of 4-to-3 votes over the past five years, the city council allocated to waterfront development most of the community-development grant that the city automatically got from HUD each year.  Councilman Bill Stallworth, who represents Biloxi's poorest ward, sums up the views of development supporters.  "With jobs and money," he says, "people can solve the problem of poor housing."  Opponents argued for using federal money to help the poor more directly.  They say the money could have been gone to expand health programs for the old, shelters for the homeless and recreation facilities.  "There were a lot of programs that could have been started here that never were started here," says Dianne Harenski, one of three council members who consistently opposed the waterfront project.  She was recently defeated for re-election.  Although the promoters of Point Cadet cited its economic-development benefits for the city, there were poor commercial areas that could just as easily have been served with the same HUD funds.  At Main and Division streets, in a neighborhood where many of the poor live, a drug market flourishes at night.  Along Main Street, south of Division, a row of stores has been vacant for years -- a shooting gallery for drugs until the buildings were recently boarded up.  The former mayor did support a plan to rehabilitate and reopen the properties as apartments, professional offices and retail establishments, but the proposal fizzled.  As HUD money flowed to the waterfront, "we have not gotten one penny," says Roy Irons, who owns the inner-city property.  The Rev. James Black, who runs a community-services program a block from the intersection, says city officials used statistics to document the impoverishment of the community to obtain federal funds -- only to divert the money to projects that didn't benefit the poor.  "They violated the trust of minority and poor communities," he says.  Improved public housing was another demand.  In a complaint to HUD Inspector General Paul Adams, a tenants' association representing Biloxi's public-housing residents said "gross neglect" by the Biloxi Housing Authority allowed "bats, rats, roaches, termites, fire ants and snakes to endanger the health and safety of the occupants."  The Housing Authority's new management say its predecessors don't appear to have requested federal money to improve the situation.  Biloxi did aggressively pursue federal money for the waterfront.  In December 1986, the city got a $500,000 grant from HUD Secretary Pierce's special discretionary fund to further the development of a Point Cadet hotel.  To help get the grant, the city retained two former HUD officials as consultants, Michael Karem of Washington, D.C., and Karen Ball of Columbus, Ohio.  According to an audit by the HUD inspector general this year, the city used nearly two-thirds of the money for expenses that the department hadn't authorized.  The indictment against former Mayor Blessey and Ms. Capers asserts they spent $160,000 to defray some costs of a bond sale related to Point Cadet development rather than for the improvements contemplated by the city's grant application.  City officials defend the spending.  They say they submitted an amendment to their application that would have allowed it, and assumed that HUD had approved it.  The indictment against Mr. Gilliam, a former HUD deputy assistant secretary for program policy development and evaluation, asserts that he used his position to help Biloxi get a $2.8 million urban development grant, the $500,000 grant and a federal loan.  The indictment contends that he would have profited from a financial interest in the project's festival marketplace.  His trial hasn't been scheduled.  In a separate case in May, he pleaded guilty in federal court in the Virgin Islands to taking $8,100 in illegal gratuities from an official of a St. Thomas housing development corporation; the corporation had received a $600,000 HUD grant.  Charles Adams, Mr. Gilliam's nephew, was indicted in October for allegedly lying to a grand jury investigating Point Cadet.  Mr. Adams was an executive in the Arlington County, Va., office of Northwest Investment Inc., which planned to develop Point Cadet's festival marketplace.  His lawyer says Mr. Adams has pleaded innocent.  HUD auditors also found irregularities in Biloxi's use of more than $4.3 million in community-development grants.  They reported that city officials improperly paid $248,000 from the grants for marina engineering fees that the Biloxi Port Commission, an agency not authorized to receive such grants, should have paid.  The city, however, says the engineering work was done for Point Cadet Development Corp., which was eligible for HUD money.  The audit found that city officials used $680,287 in grant money in May 1986 to buy The Factory Restaurant.  The richly decorated restaurant, next to the marina, caters to boaters and tourists.  "The only beneficiaries were the owners, who received cash and debt relief from the transaction and retained control of the restaurant through a lease-back arrangement for at least 30 years," HUD's audit report said.  It also said the restaurant operators weren't required to pay for 2 1/2 years.  The city has responded that, in general, the conclusions of the audit report are "erroneous and defamatory."  As for The Factory, the city says, it was necessary to buy it to obtain public parking space and waterfront access and to allow the city "to control the facade and aesthetics for the entire project."  The criminal prosecution and other legal tangles have left the future of much of the Point Cadet project in doubt.  "It's dead in the water right now," says Robert Landry, former executive director of the Point Cadet Development Corp., who was cited as an unindicted co-conspirator in the federal case.  HUD money continues to flow, however.  At least until 1994, HUD grants will go to repay a HUD loan the city took to acquire property for the development.  Down at the marina, the waterfront development still seems like a good idea to Richard Oliver, a Baton Rouge contractor who is preparing to brush the algae from his sloop.  "Being a Republican, I like to see people work rather than just giving them housing that they probably would not take care of anyway."  Annie Powell disagrees.  She lives in a Bayou Auguste public-housing unit that she complains hasn't been painted in 16 years.  "They should fix up everybody in the projects (first)," she says.  "It's a shame we have to come home into this environment.  It's hard."  Moody's Investors Service Inc. said it's carefully monitoring the Justice Department's investigation of Rockwell International Corp.'s Rocky Flats nuclear-weapons plant to determine if the inquiry could have a financial impact on the company.  The New York securities-rating concern said its "main concern is whether Rockwell will be fully indemnified by the" Department of Energy "if there are penalties assessed against the company."  The agency owns Rocky Flats, a sprawling complex 16 miles outside of Denver.  But Sam Iacobellis, Rockwell's chief operating officer, said in an interview yesterday that there's no question that the company is covered.  He explained that under its contract with DOE, the government picks up all costs "including fines and penalties relating to environmental and safety matters, regardless if they result from contractor negligence."  In fact, it's just this sort of language that has angered Washington lawmakers, who have unsuccessfully tried to make the contractors pay civil and criminal penalties.  Two years ago, for instance, Rep. Philip Sharp (D., Ind.) proposed instituting harsh sanctions against DOE weapons-plant contractors for safety violations.  Rockwell, in a May 1987 letter to the congressman, responded that it would "oppose any limitation on indemnity coverage."  The company said it would "find particularly objectionable any provision which would hold Rockwell liable for loss or damage to government property at a facility such as Rocky Flats."  It said the DOE can "stress nuclear safety issues in its periodic evaluations of contractor performance."  In a recent filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, Rockwell noted that it believes the current investigation "will be resolved without material financial impact on the company."  Nonetheless, Moody's maintained that "an assessment of the magnitude of the risk only can be made as the investigation process progresses."  Mr. Iacobellis has said repeatedly that Rockwell hasn't knowingly committed any wrongdoing at Rocky Flats, which assembles the plutonium triggers to detonate the nation's nuclear arsenal.  Rocky Flats was raided in June by federal law-enforcement agents, who alleged that Rockwell violated anti-pollution statutes.  Earlier this month, a federal grand jury began examining evidence in the case, which this week was the subject of a front-page article in this newspaper.  Moody's noted that, in the wake of the investigation, the DOE has delayed paying Rockwell a management fee at Rocky Flats, though the department is still reimbursing the company for all costs incurred in operating the facility.  The government wants to renew a nuclear cooperation treaty with West Germany but will refuse to sign a world treaty barring the use of nuclear energy for war purposes, officials said.  Paulo Tarso Flecha de Lima, vice minister of foreign relations, said Brazil was "firmly disposed" to use nuclear technology exclusively for peaceful purposes, but he rejected the 1967 Nuclear Non-Proliferation Treaty because it "had various essential defects."  "That treaty creates a group of countries with privileges and another group with restrictions," the vice minister told reporters.  Earlier this week, Brazil and West Germany held a two-day review of their scientific and technological cooperation.  The main topic was a 1975 bilateral nuclear agreement that gives Brazil "fuel-cycle" technology -- a key step toward building an atomic bomb.  Mr. Flecha de Lima met with German Science and Technology Minister Gerhard Ziller.  The Brazilian vice minister said both countries intend to renew the accord.  November is the deadline for nonrenewal.  Urban reformers across the country have been trying for years to clean up City Hall.  The town of Lake Ozark, Mo., finished the job in just three days.  Lake Ozark, a tourist hamlet about 150 miles west of St. Louis, sprang up in the early 1930s when Lake of the Ozarks was formed behind a dam.  The town and its 600 inhabitants lived and grew peacefully along the lake shore, never giving thought to the need for a formal building code.  But earlier this year, witnessing the development of fancy, nearby resorts, Lake Ozark began to fret that some of its own buildings may not be quite up to snuff.  Not wanting the town's image to pale, the six-member town council took action.  That's when the Dangerous Building Ordinance was born.  And the first building to be declared unfit for human habitation?  City Hall.  Lake Ozark's City Hall occupies the main floor of a rented store-front building along the town's tourist strip.  The problem, says Rick Eckert, city administrator, was the building's unused basement, coupled with the profusion of wildlife in the surrounding hills.  In what Mr. Eckert describes as "the natural progression of things" -- furry four-footed things in this case -- the basement became infested with mice and squirrels, which in turn were infested with fleas.  "We asked (the inspector) to be impartial and fair," sighs Mr. Eckert, who concedes that municipal employees had recently noticed a flea or two on the premises.  Even so, he says, the order on Monday to close up shop was a shocker.  The official was forced to work out of the police station for two days; other employees got time off.  "It came out of the clear blue," says part-time Mayor Rick Moss, who also works at a local marina.  Tom Harmon, Lake Ozark's intrepid building inspector -- who himself operates out of City Hall-couldn't be reached for comment.  What might have been a publicity disaster for a tourist town has redounded to Lake Ozark's favor, insists Mr. Eckert, who moved back into his office yesterday, on the heels of the exterminator.  "You'd think we'd get a lot of negative feedback," he says, "but people are glad to see we're trying to do our part to help the image of the area."  Anne Mollegen Smith, who has held top editorial positions at Working Woman, Redbook and Glamour magazines, was named editor-in-chief of McCall's magazine.  The announcement was made by William T. Kerr, president of New York Times Co. Magazine group, which publishes McCall's.  Ms. Smith, 48 years old, previously worked for Working Woman where she served as editor in chief since 1984 and directed a major redesign of the magazine.  Since 1988, she also oversaw Working Mother magazine as group editorial director for the Working Woman McCall's Group.  Prior to that, Ms. Smith served as executive editor of Glamour in 1983 and worked for Redbook for 15 years as fiction editor, managing editor and, from 1981 to 1983, the editor in chief.  Previously, Ms. Smith was an assistant editor for Ladies Home Journal.  New York Times Co. acquired McCall's from Working Woman McCall's Group July 27.  McCall's, founded in 1876, is published monthly and has a circulation of 5.1 million copies.  UAL Corp.'s board scheduled a meeting for today to consider a likely joint bid from the United Airlines pilot union along with UAL management led by Chairman Stephen Wolf and British Airways PLC.  There were indications that the four-week battle for the nation's second-largest airline may have reached a turning point that could result in a leveraged buy-out at upwards of $300 a share, or $6.75 billion.  Some 30 pilot union leaders and a host of advisers were meeting for the third day in a row in New York, trying to wrap up the bid under pressure of a deadline set by Los Angeles investor Marvin Davis.  In anouncing a financing plan for his $6.19 billion, $275-a-share bid a week ago, Mr. Davis asked the board for a decision by the close of business yesterday.  Several people familiar with the situation said that if the pilots can reach agreement, the UAL board is likely to prefer the labor-management bid over the Davis proposal.  By one account, the bid would give management a 10% stake, British Air 20%, and employees 70%, assuming all four labor groups participate.  The employees would trade cash and contract concessions for their stake in an Employee Stock Ownership Plan.  However, others cautioned that those percentages might not hold up exactly, depending on the pilot talks.  It wasn't clear how the ownership would stack up if United machinists, who have already expressed "significant doubts" about any bid, balk at participating.  Some said there might be more than one proposal to reflect that.  The British Air board is scheduled to meet during London business hours today to approve the offer before the UAL board meets.  In addition to an equity stake, British Air could also receive new United debt securities in return for its investment.  British Air is seeking the link with United not only to preserve an existing marketing agreement between the two carriers, but also to become part of a global airline linking its own routes in Europe, Africa and the Far East to United's North American and trans-Pacific routes.  The UAL board could declare the labor-management group the winner if its bid tops that of Mr. Davis by a wide margin.  Takeover stock traders said they heard rumors the bid could exceed $300 a share, or $6.75 billion.  UAL declined to comment.  If the bids are too close, the UAL board could also simply put the company up for sale to the highest bidder in an auction process that would give all bidders access to the same company data as well as key members of labor and management.  Mr. Davis has said he might raise his bid after examining UAL data.  The pilots were said to be prepared to contribute at least $300 million in annual wage concessions, and were examining the possibility of using equity from a pilot pension fund to purchase a special issue of UAL preferred stock.  Such a move would have to be put to a pilot vote.  The pilot union said previously that it was willing to participate in a bid even without the other labor groups, which also include flight attendants and non-contract employees.  However, without the other groups, the best the pilots could hope to get is a 25% to 40% stake, an official close to the union said.  In recent public statements, Mr. Davis tried to compare his offer favorably with the labor-management deal by saying his bid "doesn't include seeking labor concessions from any groups."  Anticipating a break between the machinists union and the UAL pilots, Mr. Davis has been trying in the past few days to persuade the machinists to support his offer.  If the board okays a labor-management bid, it could intensify a debate about airline buy-outs when Congress returns to Washington next week.  Yesterday, stocks of several airline takeover candidates nose-dived after a federal regulator quoted in The Wall Street Journal warned that the government may rein in airline buy-outs that feature too much leverage or excessive foreign-airline influence.  Hardest-hit by the warning was American Airlines parent AMR Corp.  After a delayed opening, it tumbled $5 to $88 a share in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange on heavy volume of 3.7 million shares.  Shares of Delta Air Lines fell $4.125 to $79.875 a share, and Texas Air Corp., which is trying to sell its Continental Airlines unit, fell $1.125 to $20.50.  The damage to UAL was minor by comparison; it rebounded to close down only 25 cents at $279.75 as word of the board meeting spread.  If the labor-management bid does come together, it will represent a triumph of behind-the-scenes orchestration by Mr. Wolf.  The UAL chairman seems to have turned the pressure of the Davis bid to his advantage in reaching long-sought cost-cutting agreements with United pilots despite a history of stormy relations in his two years at United.  It will also represent the chance for even greater compensation for Mr. Wolf, whose gains on stock options at the current price levels already approach $50 million.  He stands to receive the largest share of the 10% management stake.  It doesn't appear that the transaction will require equity from the Morgan Stanley & Co. leveraged buy-out fund, which initially expressed interest in teaming up with British Air in a bid.  Foreign companies can't legally buy more than 25% of any U.S. airline, and Morgan Stanley, which is advising British Air, could have helped contribute extra equity.  The battle over the assets of Resorts International Inc. began in earnest as a major group of bondholders sent a letter to company Chairman Merv Griffin seeking a formal role for them in any proposed reorganization.  The letter was sent late yesterday by holders of about $500 million of the company's $925 million debt outstanding.  It contained five "recommendations," which, taken together, would put the group in the position of a de facto creditors committee.  Such a committee, similar to those appointed in bankruptcies, would have standing to participate in a restructuring.  In a veiled threat, the letter said that if the recommendations are not met, relations between bondholders and the company will became "more adversarial and less predictable," according to people who have read the letter.  Resorts touched off the dispute early this week when it declared a moratorium on debt payments and said it would present a recapitalization plan at a Sept. 19 bondholders meeting.  The company is expected to propose an exchange offer in which bondholders would relinquish or defer interest payments in return for equity in the company.  Mr. Griffin bought the casino-hotel company from developer Donald Trump last year for $365 million in a leveraged buyout.  Since then, the company's operations have worsened and its bonds have plummeted to as little as 28% of their face value.  The company owns a hotel-casino and real estate in both Atlantic City, N.J., and the Bahamas.  Of the $925 million in debt, $600 million consists of unsecured bonds sold before Mr. Griffin bought the company.  The rest is secured by company assets and was sold last year by Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. to help Mr. Griffin acquire Resorts.  Salomon Bros. has since replaced Drexel as the company's investment bank.  The holders of the senior secured debt presumably expect to get preferential treatment over the unsecured debtholders.  So far, however, the company has said neither class will receive interest payments, even though Resorts has access to about $100 million in cash.  Most analysts expect the two classes of bondholders, which includes some of the same owners, to split off eventually because they have different interests.  In the meantime, both classes are being represented by Duncan Darrow of the law firm of Anderson Kill Olick & Oshinsky.  In the letter sent yesterday, which was signed by Mr. Darrow, the group proposed that the company publicly endorse it as the representative of the holders before the Sept. 19 meeting.  The group also urged that the company lay out a specific restructuring proposal at the meeting, and that the company meet with the group before the meeting.  Finally, the group recommended that Resorts agree to pay the group's legal fees.  An attorney for Resorts, Thomas Gallagher of Gibson Dunn & Crutcher, didn't respond directly to the bondholder group's suggestions.  "The company has already announced that it will discuss the proposed recapitalization plan at the Sept. 19 meeting," he said "Any information to be provided by the company to bondholders will be given generally to all of its bondholders."  No litigation was threatened in the letter, nor was there mention that the bondholders could force the company into bankruptcy proceedings after the 30-day grace period for nonpayment of interest expires Sept. 30, according to people who have seen the letter.  Valley National Corp.'s jump on heavy volume helped the Nasdaq Composite end August on an uptick and post another new high.  The Nasdaq Financial Index, which includes Valley National, gained 2.59 to 466.92.  Its counterpart, the Nasdaq 100 Index of non-financial stocks, improved 1.21 to 444.01.  The gains by the OTC market's biggest issues were responsible for the Nasdaq Composite Index's 1.06-point advance to 469.33.  After shattering a two-year-old mark of 455.26, the index established nine more record closing levels during August.  The rise came on skimpy volume, however.  Only 117.8 million shares changed hands.  Of the 4,378 issues traded, 1,027 advanced and 827 declined.  News of a $140 million asset sale by Valley National pushed the bank issue to the top of the over-the-counter market's most active list.  Valley National rose 1 1/4 to 30 1/4 on 1.3 million shares.  Dow Jones Professional Investor Report said a spokesman for the troubled Phoenix, Ariz.-based company confirmed that Valley National plans to sell and lease back 80 branches and dispose of five parcels of real estate in a single package valued at about $140 million.  The spokesman said Goldman Sachs expects to offer the package for public sale next Tuesday.  He said the company's earnings won't be affected by the asset sale, which he suggested will be pitched to pension funds.  Despite the series of August advances, traders said individual investors remain cautious about the OTC market.  William Sulya, head of OTC trading at A.G. Edwards & Sons in St. Louis, said individual investors were net sellers yesterday.  "Everybody wonders when the market's going to turn around and fall out of bed," Mr. Sulya said.  Robert O'Toole Sr., manager of institutional OTC trading at Shearson Lehman Hutton, agreed.  "I see the institutions buying," he said.  "But the little fellow is selling out, and you can't blame him."  Mr. O'Toole said many retail investors have grown cautious now that the Dow Jones Industrial Average also has surpassed its former all-time high.  But though individual investors continue to be leery of investing directly, many are involved in the stock market indirectly through mutual funds.  Traders say that the individuals who are still active, direct investors, are trading larger amounts of shares.  So, while overall retail trading volume has declined, Mr. Sulya said, the average size of a trade by an individual investor now is between 1,500 and 2,500 shares, which is higher than it was two years ago.  "Now it's just the bigger boys that really want to get involved," he said.  Sensormatic Electronics jumped 1 1/4 to 12 7/8 on 512,000 shares after a group led by Sid and Lee Bass said it is seeking clearance under the Hart-Scott-Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act of 1976 to increase its total investment in Sensormatic "to above $15 million and to continue to acquire additional shares up to 14.9%" of the common shares outstanding.  According to a Securities and Exchange Commission filing, Sid and Lee Bass currently hold a 7.8% stake, or about 2.1 million shares, in the maker of electronic surveillance systems.  Computer Products made the most-active list and rose 1/2 to 3.  Raymond James recommended that investors buy the stock, saying that the company will make money this year for the first time in four years, the Professional Investor Report said.  LIN Broadcasting dropped 1 to 106.  McCaw Cellular extended its $110-a-share tender offer for LIN until Sept. 22.  Meanwhile, McCaw awaits SEC approval to buy LIN's shares and LIN searches for alternatives.  Analysts said requisite regulatory approvals for McCaw's bid may take some time, but should be forthcoming before the end of the year.  In the meantime, LIN might proceed with the spinoff of its broadcast operations and could recapitalize the remaining cellular side of the business to make it more appealing to shareholders, the analysts said.  LIN's shares have bounced up and down in recent days as some investors take profits, while others play the takeover waiting game and hope for a surprise.  Some expect the two estranged parties to reconvene their earlier negotiations to reach a deal.  McCaw slid 3/8 to 37 3/4.  Cadbury Schweppes' American depositary receipts added 1/4 to 65 1/2 after agreeing to buy "Orange Crush" and "Hires Root Beer" as well as other soft-drink brands from Procter & Gamble for $220 million.  Many analysts had speculated that A&W Brands, another OTC stock, might buy the Orange Crush brand.  A&W Brands lost 1/2 to 28.  Powell Industries added 9/16 to 3 15/16.  The company agreed to sell certain assets of its Powell Process Systems unit to M&I Electric Industries and senior managers of Powell Process.  Archive rebounded and closed up 1/4 to 11 1/2, after dropping 3/8 Wednesday amid rumors that the company would report a one-time charge in its fiscal fourth quarter.  The company denied the rumors and said that not only will it not have a charge, but fourth-quarter earnings should be "on line" with the 31 cents a share reported in the third quarter, ended June 30.  The company earned 24 cents a share in the year-ago fourth quarter.  Banks and thrifts in Boston have contributed to housing and mortgage credit discrimination in black neighborhoods, according to a report by the Federal Reserve Bank of Boston.  The number of mortgage loans issued in black neighborhoods is disproportionately lower than in white neighborhoods when compared with the amount of potentially mortgageable properties in both areas, the report concluded.  "This unfortunate pattern persists even after taking into account economic and non-racial characteristics that could be responsible for differences between these neighborhoods," the report said.  "These other characteristics, including lower incomes, less wealth, lower-valued housing units and less housing development in black neighborhoods, simply do not explain the persistent pattern by race," the report added.  The report stopped short of identifying the problem as redlining, a practice by which lenders systematically discriminate against minority neighborhoods.  Redlining has been found in a number of U.S. cities.  "It's {the report} suggesting that there may be other factors, like insufficient outreach to minority neighborhoods, that contribute to this," said Herb Wass, a spokesman for the Federal Reserve Bank.  "There just isn't sufficient data to find out if it's all the lenders' fault," he added.  Gov. Michael S. Dukakis ordered state officials to review the report and "use every means at our disposal to ensure that every citizen has the opportunity to won a home regardless of race or national origin."  N.V. Philips's Polygram unit is close to acquiring closely held A&M Records for about $500 million, according to industry executives.  The transaction, which would not include the real estate or publishing interests of the company, would continue a trend of consolidation and acquisitions at high prices in the record business.  A&M's annual sales have been estimated at $200 million to $300 million.  A&M executives wouldn't comment, and Polygram officials couldn't be reached.  In the past few months, Chrysalis, Island and Motown Records have all been snapped up by bigger companies.  Market share in the music business now virtually belongs to Time-Warner Inc.'s Warner records division, CBS Records, a unit of Sony Corp.; RCA, a unit of Bertelsmann AG; MCA Inc.'s record division; Thorn-EMI PLC; and Polygram.  Polygram itself recently paid more than $300 million for Island Records.  The largest independent with a significant market share is David Geffen's Geffen Records, which distributes through Warner Records and will be tied to them for at least another year.  Mr. Geffen has indicated it is not for sale.  U.K.-based Virgin Records, also not part of one of the major conglomerates, is said to be taking on investors.  A&M Records, which had been rumored to be on the block for some time, has less than a 2% chart share so far this year, according to Billboard magazine, though this is expected to improve as its hottest artist, Janet Jackson, releases a new album.  A&M is considered a "boutique label" -- albeit a large one -- because it lacks a manufacturing and distribution arm.  Polygram distributes A&M's records in Europe; RCA Records is its U.S. distributor.  Sources pointed out that the acquisition would improve Philips position against its major European competitor, Bertelsmann.  One source said Walt Disney Co. had expressed interest in A&M.  Disney has been rumored to covet a music operation to compete with rivals MCA and Time-Warner, and to fill an obvious gap in its entertainment empire.  But others say Disney wouldn't want a company without its own distribution, where margins can be lower.  They also said the Polygram bid was too far along for A&M to be considering other bidders.  Despite its slow year on the charts, A&M has a rich history and a valuable catalogue.  Founded in a garage in 1962 by trumpet player Herb Alpert and partner Jerry Moss, it was successful with Mr. Alpert's own band, the Tijuana Brass, as well as the Carpenters, Carole King, Peter Frampton and the Police.  The company owns a studio lot in Hollywood that includes Charlie Chaplin's old studio.  If recent acquisitions of record labels are any indication, A&M could be expected to stay relatively intact, with its chairman, Mr. Moss, and president, Gil Friesen, likely to stay on after the transaction.  A&M currently has more than 300 employees.  William T. Comer, 53 years old, was named a vice president of this pharmaceuticals and consumer and health-care products company.  A 28-year veteran of Bristol-Myers, Mr. Comer most recently was executive vice president for the Science and Technology group.  This banking company's British corporate finance operations in London named Richard Heley, 40 years old, previously head of corporate finance at Barclays de Zoete Wedd, to manage all finance activities affecting big corporate clients in Britain.  He will report to Jeff Grandy, head of European corporate finance.  Hans W. Becherer, president, was named to the additional post of chief executive officer.  Mr. Becherer, 54 years old, succeeds in his new post 64-year-old Robert A. Hanson, who remains chairman of the farm-equipment maker.  Mr. Hanson, who has spent 39 years with the company, called the management change "reflective of the commitment by Deere's board of directors to an orderly and effective management succession plan."  As part of the realignment, Mr. Becherer dropped the title of chief operating officer he had formerly held along with the presidency; the post wasn't filled.  Fruzsina M. Harsanyi, 47 years old, and Fred R. Jones, 41, were named vice presidents of this provider of power-generation systems and services.  Ms. Harsanyi remains responsible for government relations and Mr. Jones remains treasurer with expanded responsibilities in the tax area.  Kevin J. Pilon, 39, previously director, corporate and investor relations, was elected vice president, corporate and investor relations, succeeding William J. Connolly, 59, who was named to the new post of vice president, marketing and operations support.  Robert P. Luciano, chairman and chief executive officer of Schering-Plough Corp., was elected a director of this food, consumer products, packaging and industrial products company.  The board expands to 11 members.  Your Aug. 9 page-one article on the Koch family plays a little loose with definitions when describing the Libertarian Party as "anti-government."  The Internal Revenue Service's description is more enlightening: ". . . a political philosophy, the basic premise of which is that each individual should be free to do as he or she please, so long as he or she does not harm others.  In the Libertarian view, societies and governments infringe on individual liberties whenever they tax wealth, create penalties for victimless crimes or otherwise attempt to control or regulate individual conduct which harms or benefits no one except the individual who engaged in it."  If Libertarians can be deemed anti-government, then surely, Republicans and Democrats can be considered anti-liberty.  William J. Hickman  Granville, Ohio  Your Aug. 10 Business Bulletin refers to Hollywood director Steven Spielberg as a "Former Eagle Scout."  There is no such thing.  It is like calling someone a "former genius."  Once the distinction is earned, it lasts forever.  A.J. Lurie  Retired Scoutmaster  New York  Arthur Schlesinger Jr. in his July 10 article "One Gain for Freedom, One Loss" has mistakenly taken the Southeastern Center for Contemporary Art (SECCA) to task for including Andres Serrano's photograph "Piss Christ" in the seventh annual traveling exhibit, "Awards in the Visual Arts."  In fact, SECCA did not show "abysmal aesthetic and political judgment," as he claims, for its mandate is to administer this national competition, not to pick the award-winning artists.  A completely independent panel makes the selection, one composed of art critics, art historians, artists, museum directors and curators.  Moreover, in selecting the works for the traveling show, SECCA defers to the judgment of that panel by including as many of the works reviewed by the independent jurors as are available for exhibit.  In the case of "Piss Christ," the jurors saw a slide of it and were cognizant of its title.  It being available for exhibit, inclusion followed automatically.  Irwin Kremen  Department of Psychology  Duke University  Durham.  N.C.  Your Aug. 7 page-one article "The Anti-Abortionists Agree on One Thing But Not Much Else" is one of the strangest.  Just as with any organization, what is important is what the members agree on, not what they disagree on.  And the "what" is: All human life is sacred and a gift of God.  All human life is to be nurtured and protected from conception to death.  Abortion is a very serious matter and should only be done in limited circumstances.  If all people can accept these simple beliefs and live by them, wouldn't the world be a better place.  Charles B. Neubecker  Dallas  ---  I agree with your page-one observations on the strange alliances made in the name of the anti-abortion issue.  If you mean to imply that it does not make equally strange alliances in the name of pro-choice, I disagree.  To combine homosexuals with women seeking to terminate a pregnancy, for example, requires that they concentrate their attention on perhaps the only thing they have in common -- a desire for legal support for choices they have already made, no matter how different these choices are.  Dr. James H. Moran  Spicewood, Texas  ---  Your writer opines that pro-lifers are drawn from so many diverse groups that the movement has no political future.  As he acknowledges, this powerless cause is supported by Kentucky's governor and by both houses of its legislature.  May we expect similar coverage of the civil-rights movement, say in New York or California?  Your writer might conclude that a movement supported by Republicans, black Moslems and socialists lacks sufficient coherence to be a political force despite its apparent support in those states' governments.  James J. Mason  Tacoma, Wash.  ---  Your article presented a fairly balanced treatment showing that this movement attracts some well-intentioned, though misguided, adherents in addition to the more commonly encountered right-wing extremists who garner most of the headlines.  I must, however, point out the fallacy of accepting any ideologue's self-professed label at face value.  It would have been more accurate for you to refer to "Ms.  Myers, who calls herself a feminist," instead of prefixing this term to her name as if she had earned an admirable credential.  Feminism is all about expanding the choices available to women.  Ms. Myers and the self-styled "Feminists for Life" may call themselves anything they like.  But -- despite their expressed sympathy for some feminist causes -- until they treat themselves and other women as rational human beings capable of deciding their own fate, rather than as incubators, feminists they will not be.  No true feminist would ever seek to impose her religious views on another woman anymore than she would try to force another woman either to have an unwanted abortion or go through an unwanted pregnancy.  Bonnie Nelle Duncan  Rockville, Md.  ---  If uneasy pro-lifers want to associate themselves with people who bomb abortion clinics, with people who do not believe in birth control, with those who blockade abortion clinics, and who believe sexuality is only for procreation, so be it.  As the more than 70% (and growing) of choice supporters learn about these tactics and beliefs, the larger this mainstream will become.  Katherine W. DuBois  Des Moines, Iowa  ---  The pro-life, anti-abortion movement has attracted persons of diverse political background and of varying opinions on other issues.  This is one of the strengths of this movement -- that the enormity of 16 years of child-killing has caused revulsion in a broad spectrum of the American population.  The same phenomenon was true of the anti-slavery movement.  Indeed, the same thing has characterized the makeup of the Republican and Democratic parties for generations.  What's so bad about the convergence of millions of people from varying backgrounds united against the slaughter of innocent infants?  Robert A. Ryan  Cincinnati  I have too great a respect for Singapore's ambassador, Tommy Koh, to accept that the June 27 letter was written by him.  The style betrays another's authorship.  My letter dealt essentially with the professed rationale for abolition of appeals to the Privy Council, but the June 27 letter sidestepped the thrust with a typical Singapore government response.  Knowing my prime minister had fought desperately to preserve this right of appeal to the Privy Council in days gone by, I did no more than to paraphrase him, whose fervent hope then, which coincided with my own, was that "faith in the judicial system will never diminish so long as we allow a review of the judicial processes that takes place here in some other tribunal where obviously undue influence cannot be brought to bear.  As long as governments are wise enough to leave alone the rights of appeal to some superior body outside Singapore, then there must be a higher degree of confidence in the integrity of our judicial process.  This is most important. . . ."   The intervening years have not changed the validity of the annunciation.  Ambassador Koh's ghost writer should question Prime Minister Lee Kuan Yew.  Or Prof.  S. Jayakumar, minister for home affairs, who, as late as 1986, arrogantly dismissed opposition member of parliament J.B. Jeyaretnam with these haunting words: "How many countries are there in the world that he {Jeyaretnam} can refer to where there are appeals to the Privy Council in criminal and civil cases . . . other than Singapore?  That is the litmus test of our judicial system's independence."  Yes, it is; but what has happened now?  Does not this political somersault show the minister speaking with a forked tongue, just because the Privy Council delivered a judgment unfavorable to the Singapore government?  Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher recently received two stinging rebukes from the House of Lords in the "Spycatcher" and the "Inside Intelligence" appeals by the British government.  There are no plans, as far as I know, to abolish appeals to the House of Lords.  I readily agreed to a waiver of confidentiality of professional communications to expose the false and wicked accusation against my two lawyers of criminal complicity in a non-existent crime.  It is not right that innocent persons should unjustly be made to suffer the horrible anguish of such falsehood orchestrated by a malevolent government.  Like my two lawyers, Asia Watch and other human-rights organizations have been gravely maligned by the accusation that they were "accomplices in fabricating evidence to mislead a Singapore court."  In Singapore, it has become more and more the government's practice and procedure to charge a person with a criminal offence, arrest him, and then look for evidence.  Francis T. Seow  New Haven, Conn.  STANLEY WORKS said directors boosted the quarterly dividend 12.5% to 27 cents a share from 24 cents, payable Sept. 29 to stock of record Sept. 11.  The New Britain, Conn., maker of tools and hardware has had "improved profit performance," said Richard H. Ayers, chairman and chief executive officer.  Stanley Works at Aug. 5 had 44.3 million shares outstanding.  OFFICE PRODUCTS OF AMERICA Inc., San Antonio, Texas, said it is offering 1.6 million units, consisting of 4.8 million Class A common shares and 4.8 million redeemable Class A warrants, for $5 a unit.  Each unit will consist of three common shares and three warrants.  Proceeds will be used to finance initial operations and to open four warehouse-type retail office supply stores in New England and the Middle and South Atlantic states.  D.H. Blair & Co. is underwriter for the transaction.  KIRBY EXPLORATION Co. of Houston proposed an offering of $50 million of convertible subordinated debentures, via PaineWebber Inc. Proceeds will be used to repay debt from a recent acquisition and for general corporate purposes.  Kirby is a diversified marine transportation concern.  Skill Game  Our new MBAs are great numbers crunchers,  A trend that some are regretting,  But they need these quantitative abilities  To manage the salaries they're getting.  -- Edward F. Dempsey.  ---  Hammer and Pickle?  Classless societies are those in which  Brown-baggers, as they munch,  Are not looked down upon by those  Who eat a power lunch.  -- Richard F. Barrett.  It was somehow characteristic of Joe Alsop that even in the years when he was the most influential columnist in America, he still gave the impression of being a man not tied to one particular time or place.  In a profession obsessed with the here and now, he worried about the welfare of future generations and in a city where people are obsessed with careers, he sought out and maintained generations of loyal friends.  The owlish figure with the horn rimmed glasses who punctuated his discourses on politics and art with an "eh?" that demanded automatic assent, chain-smoked Benson & Hedges and roared with laughter at his own jokes is gone now but so indelible was the mark of his personality that I believe Joe Alsop will actually have political and personal influence in Washington for many years to come.  I first met Joe in 1967 while still a college student.  He had written to me about an article I had published in the New Republic about slum conditions on Chicago's West Side.  I became a regular visitor to Joe's house on Dumbarton Avenue in Georgetown and I think I'll always recall an afternoon in the summer of 1968 when the ghetto rioting which had ravaged Washington and Chicago spread to other cities and seemed about to engulf every black community in the country.  I stopped by to visit Joe and found him deep in thought, obviously upset by what was happening in the ghettos of the country.  "David, dear boy," he said, "I haven't felt this blue since the fall of France."  I was to meet Joe many times over the next 20 years but one thing never changed: Joe's purely personal feeling of responsibility for the welfare of his country.  We were to discuss many things together: the role of the military in the Soviet Union; the book of the Lord Shang, an ancient Chinese political thinker who was, according to Joe, "history's first Stalinist," the decline of the "WASP ascendency" and the perfidy of "tweedy, pipe smoking" American academics but all of our conversations boiled down to one thing -- Joe cared deeply about the future of the United States and had no sympathy for any force, idea or individual that might threaten it.  In some respects, Joe did not fit into American journalism at all.  He was too personally involved in the positions that he advocated.  Yet he adorned the journalistic profession because he saw journalism as a way to protect the country he cared about as deeply as he cared about his family and friends.  Joe had a deep knowledge of history and a firm conviction that to understand the present one must study the past.  He liked to shock his many friends and guests with his blunt, all too accurate affirmations of historical reality.  Joe often said that there has always been war and there will always be war.  He had a habit of challenging his younger friends to name a single occasion when negotiations actually accomplished something positive, as opposed merely to registering the result that had already been achieved on the field of battle.  Joe was ready to behave like "an old monster," as he put it, because he wanted to make a specific point.  One of Joe's favorite texts was the Melian dialogue in Thucydides' history of the Peloponnesian War in which the Athenians informed the hapless Melians that "the strong do what they can and the weak suffer what they must."  Joe did not like bellicosity but he never wanted to see the U.S. in the position of the Melians.  Members of the postwar generation probably remember Joe best for his defense of the war in Vietnam at a time when the rest of American journalism was opposed to it.  In fact, however, Joe had a long history of taking solitary stands even before the Vietnam war deeply divided the country.  He had warned of the danger of an invasion of South Korea.  But when the truth of his warnings was borne out in 1950, he was magnanimous to his former intellectual adversaries and vigorously opposed the attempts of Sen. Joseph McCarthy to impugn the loyalty of those caught unawares.  Joe knew that the test of a policy is not what is popular at the moment and much of what Joe said about the Vietnam War -- like his description of the 1968 Tet offensive as an American military victory -- is fully accepted today.  The image of Joe Alsop, who warned Americans not to believe "six impossible things before breakfast," will now fade into memory.  But the record of his life, contained in books, newspaper columns and his effect on family members and friends will continue to be important in Washington, evoking not only fond memories but also something more lasting -- broadened horizons and the beneficent influence of the values of a simpler age.  ---  Mr. Satter, a frequent contributor to the Journal, is at work on a book about the Soviet Union.  Swedish appliance giant AB Electrolux announced an alliance with Japan's Sharp Corp. to market household appliances in Japan.  Under the pact, Sharp will offer imported Electrolux appliances to customers at about 1,000 of its stores in big Japanese cities.  The marketing accord represents the first time a major Japanese appliance maker has opened its retail network to a Western rival, said Leif Johansson, head of Electrolux's appliance division.  "For an outsider like us, almost all distribution in Japan used to be completely blocked by local manufacturers," Mr. Johansson said.  He added the pact with Sharp "reflects the changing retailing scene in Japan.  The emergence of independent retailers is putting pressure on manufacturer-controlled retailers to be able to offer a wide range of products at competitive prices."  The Electrolux appliances, imported from Europe and the U.S., will begin appearing at Sharp outlets in October.  "It will be a fairly complete line of our most upscale products," Mr. Johansson explained.  All will bear the Electrolux logo, together with a sign saying the product is imported by Sharp.  Mr. Johansson said the appliances are aimed at a small group of Japanese consumers -- "the people who drive Mercedes and BMW autos."  Electrolux expects the venture to produce annual sales of about 100,000 units and revenue equivalent to about $70 million "in a couple of years."  That's about double the number of Western appliances the Swedish concern estimates were sold in Japan last yearand seven times Electrolux's own 1988 revenue in Japan from sales of vacuum cleaners plus a handful of refrigerators sold to builders of luxury apartments.  In a statement, Electrolux boasted that the accord is a major strategic move that would put it "well ahead of European and American rivals in the difficult Japanese market."  Not everybody agrees.  Bill Coleman, European electronics analyst at London-based James Capel & Co., said the partnership "could get a lot of curiosity value" and may placate international critics who've pressed Japan to open its markets to more Western products.  "But it's still a little early for the big appliance manufacturers to go head over heels about charging into the Japanese market," Mr. Coleman said.  Some analysts dismiss the growing popularity of Western appliances among increasingly affluent Japanese consumers as a fad.  To some, European and U.S. stoves and washing machines are status symbols that sometimes barely fit into small Japanese homes.  So far, Western appliances have been hard to find.  Mr. Coleman said the most popular marketing channel so far has been through catalogs offered by some Japanese department stores.  "Electrolux will be the first Western manufacturer to move into Japan, but Sears {Roebuck & Co. of the U.S.} got there first," he quipped.  Electrolux has been actively expanding outside Sweden.  It acquired Cleveland-based White Consolidated Industries Inc. three years ago for $773 million.  In Europe it is the No. 1 appliance maker, with a 20.5% market share, and it is No. 3 in the U.S. with about 18% of the market, according to analysts.  In some ways, Electrolux already has an inside track in Japan.  It opened a vacuum-cleaner subsidiary in Tokyo 14 years ago.  And Electrolux Chief Executive Anders Scharp got to know Sharp Corp. well during the 1970s when the Japanese company and an Electrolux unit, AB Facit, collaborated on a venture.  Mr. Johnsson said Electrolux began formal negotiations with Sharp a year ago, after making sure the company could comply with Japan's thorny import regulations.  "And it took a long time to get consensus within Sharp, Japan's fourth-biggest appliance concern, that this was a good idea," Mr. Johansson added.  Playing down the official company line, Mr. Johansson conceded that Electrolux doesn't anticipate quick revenue or quick profit -- nor does it expect to have lots of followers among international appliance concerns.  "This is an experiment in opening up the Japanese distribution system," Mr. Johansson said.  "We're looking ahead 10 or 15 years.  We think this will show us what it takes to be serious in the Japanese market together with a Japanese partner."  Faye Wattleton, head of Planned Parenthood, decrying the "anti-family planning, anti-abortion fringe" in The Nation, July 24/31:  Their one and only solution to the problem of teen-age pregnancy is, "Just say no]" But just saying no prevents teen-age pregnancy the way "Have a nice day" cures chronic depression.  Ford Motor Co. said it is sweetening the discounts on several car and truck models, including its popular F-series full-sized pickups and the struggling Bronco II sport utility vehicle.  Ford said it is offering $500 rebates on four-wheel drive, F-150 model pickups, and two-wheel drive models with automatic transmissions.  Ford also is offering a $750 rebate on F-250 four-wheel drive pickups.  Previously, Ford hadn't offered cash rebates on these F-series trucks.  Last year, the F-series trucks were the best-selling line of vehicles in the U.S.  But through July of this year, F-series sales have been flat, compared with a year earlier and the line's share of the full-sized pickup market is down a percentage point to 43.3%.  Meanwhile, General Motors Corp.'s new full-sized trucks have helped the No. 1 auto maker raise its share of this lucrative market segment by a point to 38.9%.  Ford also boosted the rebate on its Bronco II sport utility vehicle by $500 to $1,250.  Bronco II sales have fallen 13% through July this year, and the product's image was tarnished this spring when Consumer Reports magazine advised readers to avoid buying the vehicle because of its unstable behavior in sharp turns.  Recently, Ford officials said that the Bronco II name will be dropped, and a new version of the vehicle due out in 1990 will carry the name Explorer.  In addition, Ford increased rebates on South Korean-made Festiva L-Plus and LX minicar models to $800 from $600; raised the discount on Aerostar vans to $500 from $300; and boosted rebates on Econoline E-150 vans to $750 from $500.  Holders of only 0.03% of B.A.T Industries PLC's equity have accepted Sir James Goldsmith's #13.35 billion ($21.19 billion) takeover bid, which the Anglo-French financier extended to Sept. 15.  The low level of acceptance was expected for the highly leveraged, all-paper offer by Hoylake Investments Ltd., the Goldsmith bidding vehicle.  The acceptances and additional purchases give Hoylake and its backers effective control of about 2.3% of B.A.T's equity, compared with 1.48% before the bid.  Most institutional investors say they want a sweetened, largely cash offer before they will tender holdings in the London-based tobacco, financial-services, paper and retailing giant.  People close to Hoylake said that if significant regulatory obstacles are overcome, Hoylake may consider offering a large cash element.  Hoylake is trying to get Britain's Takeover Panel to consider extending the deadline for its bid.  Under the usual timetable, Hoylake has until Oct. 7 to acquire more than 50% of B.A.T.  It then would have 21 days to remove any remaining conditions.  In the U.S., Hoylake is seeking state regulators' approval for its plan to sell B.A.T's Farmers Group Inc. insurance unit to Axa Midi Assurances, a big French insurer.  At the same time, Hoylake is proceeding with federal suits challenging the states' jurisdiction.  Several major decisions of the Reaganized Supreme Court's first full term have been hailed as evidence of a change of direction toward stricter statutory construction, states' rights, and openness to a reconsideration of decisions of the Burger and Warren Courts.  Many believe that a conservative Supreme Court would be good for business.  In one sense this is true.  Certainly companies can expect a more sympathetic response from the current Supreme Court than from some of its predecessors in controversial areas such as employment discrimination, labor-management relations, securities regulation, and so on.  In fact, corporate defendants tallied at least some significant victories in these areas during this past term.  However, business leaders should be wary of some consequence of the victories they are winning.  There are four major areas of concern:  -- Legislative reversal of corporate legal victories.  The congressional reaction to the Supreme Court's civil rights decisions this term has been swift.  Legislation has already been introduced in the Senate to overturn the Supreme Court's decisions in three major employment cases.  For example, Sen. Howard Metzenbaum (D., Ohio) has introduced the Fair Employment Reinstatement Act, which would overturn the Supreme Court's decision in Ward's Cove v.  Atonio and require an employer to prove a business justification in disparate impact discrimination cases.  Similarly, a bill introduced by Sen. Paul Simon (D., Ill.), would overturn the court's ruling in Richmond v.  J.A. Croson, Co., which severely restricted the legality of the minority set-aside programs in effect in 36 states and 200 municipalities.  Sen. John Heinz (R., Penn.) has introduced a resolution that would overturn the Supreme Court's ruling in Public Employees Retirement System of Ohio v.  Betts and apply the Age Discrimination in Employment Act to clarify employee benefit plans.  Congress's reaction should not surprise anyone -- it responded in exactly the same way to many of the conservative decisions of the Burger court.  Congress moved unusually swiftly to overturn General Electric v.  Gilbert (holding that discrimination on the basis of pregnancy does not violate Title VII of the 1964 Civil Rights Act), Grove City College v.  Bell (curtailing enforcement of Title IX of the act), and NLRB v.  Bildisco (permitting bankrupt employers to repudiate labor contracts).  In each case, the legislation to correct the court -- the Pregnancy Discrimination Act, the Civil Rights Restoration Act, and the Bankruptcy Amendments of 1984, arguably imposed more onerous restrictions and burdens on employers than legal defeats would have exposed them to.  -- Resurgence of States' Rights.  Judicial conservatism has always prized states' rights.  When liberal courts read the federal constitution's supremacy clause broadly, states' rights languished.  But now, the Reagan court has already issued several decisions sharply curtailing the so-called federal pre-emption doctrine.  This will open up to the states areas of law making that have long been foreclosed by pervasive federal regulation.  Conservative as this trend may be, it is hardly a completely happy one for American business.  States will be free to exercise their regulatory muscle in areas formerly dominated by uniform federal standards.  Companies that have multi-state operations face the grim prospect of complying with a crazyquilt of 50 different state laws in a multitude of regulatory areas ranging from the environment to family leave.  -- Strict Statutory Construction.  Business leaders will no doubt welcome the conservative Supreme Court's return to strict adherence to the words and plain meaning of federal statutes.  This court has already demonstrated that it will be less willing to defer to federal agency regulations and guidelines that are not totally faithful to the language of the statute and congressional intent.  While this trend will come as a welcome relief to American business, it will also create considerable uncertainty.  During this interim period, it will be much harder to know whether the Supreme Court would uphold a particular Department of Labor regulation or Equal Employment commission guideline.  Of course, American business should take considerable comfort from the knowledge that a statute will once again mean what it says and nothing more.  -- Racial Preferences, Affirmative Action and Reverse Discrimination.  Over the years, the Supreme Court has issued a series of decisions dealing with the distinction between permissible affirmative action and illegal reverse discrimination.  Essentially, the court has ruled that rigid racial quotas are unlawful, but not racial preferences involving reasonable goals and timetables.  However, these holdings have been sharply divided.  Corporate affirmative action programs have been guided by the thinnest of plurality decisions.  The addition of conservative justices to the Supreme Court calls into question the continuing validity of the 5-4 decisions that have shaped this area of the law.  The court's decision this term to allow white firefighters to sue the city of Birmingham, Ala., for the promotions they lost consequent to a court-approved consent decree may be an ominous sign.  Should the Supreme Court revisit its earlier decisions, employers could be required to revamp their existing affirmative action commitments and defend themselves against reverse discrimination claims by disappointed white male employees or job applicants.  On balance, the perceived conservative thrust of the newly constituted Supreme Court is good news for American industry, but business leaders should keep an even more watchful eye for knee-jerk legislative responses by Congress and state legislatures.  When a conservative court of "last resort" rules, the real battle for business may be just beginning.  ---  Mr. Skoning is a Chicago lawyer.  General Housewares Corp. plans to consolidate the sales, marketing and administrative aspects of its Cookware group and Chicago Cutlery subsidiary in Terre Haute, Ind.  The move will trim about 40 to 50 administrative positions in the cutlery group, says General Housewares President Paul Saxton, who will oversee the combined business.  The cookware and cutlery units currently are based in Terre Haute and Minneapolis respectively.  Total employment is about 550 workers in cookware and 300 in cutlery, plus 400 in the giftware division, which remains in Hyannis, Mass.  The company doesn't expect to take any charges for the consolidation.  Also, Mr. Saxton said the layoffs in the cutlery group will be "tempered" as the company hires several direct-sales employees and moves away from independent representatives.  "We were paying fairly high commissions to the independents," said the 50-year-old Mr. Saxton, who took the president's post Aug. 1.  "From a strategic point of view, we wanted to take some of that money and invest it in new-product development and customer service."  The consolidation, which is expected to be completed this year, also will eliminate duplication of effort, the official said.  Cookware and cutlery post total annual sales of about $80 million.  General Housewares had 1988 sales of $97.9 million, including six months of Chicago Cutlery, acquired in June 1988.  The giftware division makes candles and accessories.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, General Housewares shares rose 62.5 cents to $1.375 each.  Warsaw, Saturday, Aug. 19: The first sign of the intense Western interest in this country shows up outside my plane window as we touch down here: a white Boeing jet marked "United States of America" parked among the Aeroflot planes on the tarmac.  Inside the terminal, the first of many long lines is at the currency exchange.  The lady at the counter doesn't want to cash $300.  She smiles and says "too much, too much."  I won't find enough to buy for that amount, she explains, exchanging only $200.  In town, in the square before the Hotel Victoria, stands a monument to Poland's war losses.  The square is called "Victory Square," but the eternal flame commemorates mainly defeats -- for example, the long days 50 years ago, in September 1939, when Poland resisted Hitler and Stalin.  At the hotel, two American senators, Paul Sarbanes and Alan Cranston, are talking excitedly in the lobby.  "There seems to be a recognition that Marxism-Leninism is not working," says Mr. Cranston.  At the bar, a pack of Marlboros costs 7,000 zlotys, or one-quarter of a pensioner's monthly social security check.  Sunday, Aug. 20: As the 6 a.m. express for Gdansk prepares to depart, mounds of baggage line the platform.  Potatoes and bread peek out of the pockets of suitcases -- in this uncertain economy, Poles choose to carry their dinner with them.  When the train reaches the countryside, the flat brown-and-green landscape makes it easy to understand why so many Poles settled around Chicago.  Foreign reporters fill the dining car, and an audience of amused Poles listens as they practice pronouncing the name of the prime minister-designate: "mah-zo-VYET-ski."  By the end of the three-hour trip some of us have opted for a nickname that's easier to enunciate: "Maz."  "God Save Poland" and "God Save Your Soul" reads a cross outside Lech Walesa's home church, St. Brygida's, a friendly brick structure.  Among the crowds waiting for Mr. Walesa and Maz are veterans sporting red-and-white armbands marked "P," which stands for Pawiak prison, where they were put for fighting Hitler and Stalin.  For decades these fighters have been ignored by the Communists.  They are now getting their first recognition.  Suddenly the crowd gets nervous.  Maz is arriving in a Peugeot.  Bells ring as Poles crowd into the church, along with reporters and TV crews.  White-robed boys push the press back from the altar.  Mass begins and a priest throws a splash of holy water on the press pack, dampening some cameras.  A wilting Maz receives communion, and the sanctuary resounds with the clicks and whirs of camera shutters.  Outside after Mass, a now-exhausted Maz is pushed forward to the front of a balcony that has reporters and local children clinging to its rails.  An older lady in a knit-pink outfit behind me lectures a friend, "In democracy you can do what you want."  Monday, Aug. 21: Back in Warsaw, where the offices of Tygodnik Solidarnosc are the center of much that is happening here.  Until now, Maz has served as editor of this weekly newspaper.  It became legal, as did Solidarity, only a few months ago.  Wanda, the secretary, is a typical Solidarity veteran.  She is a doctor, but hasn't been able to practice medicine since she was dismissed in 1981 for supporting Solidarity.  Rumors have it that the Communist Party is thinking of walking out on its new partnership with Solidarity.  At Interpress, the government press agency, I copy down the Communist communique.  "The situation has been dangerously aggravated in Poland," it reads.  "The initiators of the rift will carry historic responsibility for losing a chance for the country's transition."  Is this a crisis?  An interpreter says "no," the Communists are just rattling the bars on the new cage that has locked them out of absolute power.  Tuesday, Aug. 22: The interpreter turns out to be right, I learn at the office of Andrzej Barcikowski, a functionary in the ideological offices of the Central Committee.  Six green telephones sit silent by his desk -- across from a bust of Lenin.  Mr. Barcikowski had a hand in writing the communique; he says, with embarrassment, that it has "perhaps been misinterpreted."  He offers a lesson on dealing with Communist rhetoric.  "When you read a socialist document," he says, "you have to disregard the words and see the meaning.  Here the meaning is that we will work with Solidarity."  Actually, it's hard to find a Communist in Warsaw this week.  All the officials I meet talk like Milton Friedman.  In the morning I have coffee with Jerzy Jozwiak, the leader of the Democrats, who have, until recent weeks, spent decades as a Communist satellite party.  "The Democratic Party, which has always spoken for independence, has for the first time filled its words with substance," Mr. Jozwiak says proudly.  This afternoon I go to the Polish Parliament, the Sejm, a pleasant white building with marigolds bordering the lawn.  Andrzej Bratkowski, a reformer Communist, says, "The question does not concern whether to make the economy a market economy, but how to do it."  The government's decision to index wages to inflation is "the political rape of the economy."  In my mind I dub him "Mr.  Small Is Beautiful," for he focuses on helping smaller companies.  He is pessimistic about the government's chances.  Outside, Poles also seem pessimistic.  Photographers search in vain for mass demonstrations in support of Solidarity.  Wednesday, Aug. 23: In the green-walled hall at the Sjem, Maz is answering questions.  One of the first is a complaint of the Solidarity Farmers.  They are hurt because Solidarity has teamed up with the Peasants Party, until now also a partner of the Communists.  "We will make our own section in the Sejm," the spokesman for the Solidarity Farmers announces.  When will the Solidarity government free the press?  Soon, Maz says.  He wants a model that's more objective, "like the BBC."  As for the 900,000 Communists who hold management positions in Poland, he says, "We are going to have pluralism.  I am not going to hunt witches.  But I will take a look at their competence."  Maz gives me an interview in the afternoon.  Close up, behind his editor's desk, the 62-year-old intellectual looks even more tired than in Gdansk.  As he talks, he chainsmokes Marlboros and fingers his red paisley tie.  Maz seems a careful man; he talks slowly.  Asked about abortion, he puts his arms up behind his head and reflects.  His conclusion: He personally is opposed to abortion, but is against stopping it with "repressive means."  The office workers who helped the reporters to get in are as excited as we are.  "Write a good report of Poland," Wanda tells me as I go out.  Thursday, Aug. 24: A morning's shopping in Warsaw.  Some 60 tired Poles queue in the lobby of Super Sam, a big food market.  They haven't reached food lines yet; this is a line for shopping carts.  Lots of items are for sale.  Some prices: A container of yoghurt goes for about one American cent; jam goes for about four cents a pint; a liter of whole milk costs around three cents.  It's easy to see why Poland's milk subsidy is greater than its defense budget.  There is no sugar.  To pay for their purchases, shoppers stand in yet another line.  At an outdoor flea market known as the Praga Bazaar, every imaginable denim product is available: skirts, jeans, change purses, handbags.  A pair of Lee jeans goes for 85,000 zlotys, or two-thirds the average monthly salary.  Some signs of the old Poland are here, too.  One stand is doing brisk business in lacy wedding gowns.  Prices: 130,000 and up.  My interpreter tells me that when she got married, her mother failed to make it to the wedding.  Mom had ordered a taxi, but it never came.  Back at the Sejm, the nation votes in a new government.  The hands go up and the tally is clear: 378 for Maz, 4 against, and 41 abstaining.  In one corner two colonels sit side by side.  One votes for Maz, and one votes against him.  Later, Col. Jozef Blaszcz explains why he voted against Maz.  He fears Maz will be like his Communist predecessor.  This is reported by a Solidarity leader, who quotes the colonel as saying of Maz: "He is a journalist.  His predecessor was a journalist, and look what happened."  Friday, Aug. 25: To visit Warsaw's Old Town is to see what Poles can accomplish.  The Nazis razed the historic old section of the town.  Poles built it again after the war, from old blueprints, old maps and memory.  The gabled roofs, ochre walls and the cafes in this new old town are prettier than anything James Rouse, America's outdoor mallmaker, could have redeveloped.  For a bit more than a dollar, I buy a Solidarity T-shirt from a boy selling them in the main square.  On the way back I stop along the fishless Vistula, the river choked by pollution.  I pause to look at the other side, where in August 1944 the Red Army sat and waited while the Nazis massacred the free Polish forces.  Saturday morning, Aug. 26: At the Victoria, I buy another pack of Marlboros.  Now the price is 8,000, up a thousand from the beginning of the week.  At the airport, a German businessman, who has been selling machines to make cigarettes, says he has "mixed feelings" about doing future joint ventures here.  As my plane lifts off the ground, my eye catches some words I'd heard and recorded in my notebook earlier in the week.  They are a joke about the economic challenge facing Poland.  "Capitalism is to communism as an aquarium is to fish soup," a communist had told me.  "You can always turn the aquarium into fish soup -- all you have to do is cook and salt it.  But try reversing the process, and turning fish soup into an aquarium of live creatures -- it's nearly impossible."  ---  Miss Shlaes is editorial features editor of the Wall Street Journal/Europe.  "I don't deal with civil matters," Valentin Kosyakov says.  "Such things don't interest me.  I like crime."  The Soviet Union's first private eye bends over the burner of the kitchen stove and lights a cigarette.  He is 30 years old, with a squarish build, cropped hair and steel-rimmed glasses.  A jagged scar runs through his lower lip halfway to the tip of his jaw.  He doesn't talk about how he got it.  Mr. Kosyakov keeps his address under wraps.  He agreed to meet in a foreigners' compound and flashed his plasticized identification card to impress the uniformed policeman in the guard box outside.  The card has a blue diagonal line across it -- "to prevent forgery" -- and the word "ALEX" in capital letters.  "It means protector, if you translate from the Greek," Mr. Kosyakov says.  He registered officially in Leningrad in February.  In April, he opened a Moscow branch.  To hear him tell it, the Soviet police were glad to get some help in a line of work that had been communism's least penetrable monopoly.  "Everybody understands," he says, "that we strengthen order in the country."  And order needs strengthening.  This old police state isn't that tightly policed.  Ethnic turmoil aside, the Soviet Union seems to be in the midst of a crime wave.  Statistics released this year, after a half-century hiatus, show murders and attempted murders in 1988 rose 14% to 16,710 from a year earlier. (The U.S. counted 20,680 actual murders that year.) Assaults rose 32%, violent robberies 43%.  In the first six months of this year, the numbers worsened.  More than a million crimes were reported, up 32% from a year earlier.  Street crime rose 84%, muggings 109%, crimes involving guns 22%.  It might be a mistake to blame this on Mikhail Gorbachev's new openness.  Crime could have been worse in the "stagnation" that preceded him; figures for those years remain secret.  But more crime is surely rising to the surface.  Soviet policemen complain in public that their cars are too slow, their walkie-talkies too weak.  They want more freedom to use their guns.  In Leningrad, 30 patrolmen have died violently in the past five years.  A memorial meeting for one of them in March turned into a demonstration for more pay and better equipment.  Valentin Kosyakov had the same gripes.  He quit the force.  "I started as a cop on the street," he says, stubbing out his cigarette in a saucer on the kitchen table.  "I won't tell you when.  Then I was an operative -- a detective -- in Moscow.  There were detectives on various levels.  I won't tell you the structure.  When I left, I had a territory and a staff."  He specialized in economic crime: bribery and corruption, theft of state property, speculation.  A speculator buys cheap and sells dear; here, that's illegal.  A crooked boss pads his employee list and rakes off phony salaries; that's theft of state property.  "You never heard of this?" says the detective.  "Different systems, different crimes."  But the Soviet police system, he came to realize, "couldn't solve all problems.  We couldn't put a cop on every citizen."  And Mr. Kosyakov had needs the police couldn't satisfy.  "I wanted to use computers.  I couldn't."  He also wanted more than $400 a month for risking his neck.  Now, he figures, he can have it all.  "We can do it privately.  We can rent a cop."  His agency takes all comers.  It protects cooperatives from protection rackets, hires out security guards and bodyguards.  It sleuths for lawyers: "We find witnesses and crack cases."  And it fights spies (the commercial kind) for hard currency: "We render assistance to resist espionage in joint ventures."  Since the agency got some publicity on Soviet television, the phone in Mr. Kosyakov's hidden office "is permanently ringing."  So far, most calls come from parents who want wayward children traced.  "Surveillance is a possible method for dealing with this," the detective says, stubbing out another cigarette.  "Morally, it is not clean to follow children.  There are other methods.  We do not reveal our methods."  He doesn't stoop to divorce work, either.  Twenty full-time operatives have signed on in his Moscow branch, Mr. Kosyakov discloses, plus 50 part-timers.  "I don't want to tell you how many we have in Leningrad."  All have Interior Ministry or KGB experience; some left voluntarily, some didn't.  "A person can be fired," Mr. Kosyakov says of his new hires, "not because he is a bad worker but because he has conflicts with his boss."  Mr. Kosyakov is getting along fine with his old bosses.  He says he is talking with them about using the agency's new Soviet personal computers to tap into the Interior Ministry's crime files.  On guard duty, the Kosyakov rent-a-cops have won permission to wear uniforms: black shirts, black trousers, and black baseball caps by night; the same outfit, in camouflage khaki, by day.  "We'd love to buy those hats in America," Mr. Kosyakov says.  He would also love to get clearance to buy and carry guns.  "It's a necessity.  We are negotiating that.  We can have air pistols now.  You have them on sale in America."  If Mr. Kosyakov fulfills his ambitions, private eyes will soon be opening offices from Brest to Vladivostok.  "We already have a few branches," he says.  He won't say where.  "We want to create an all-national system."  And what about the bottom line: How much does hiring a private detective cost in the Soviet Union?  Mr. Kosyakov gets up to go.  "I don't have the authority to reveal concrete figures."  He leaves, forgets his umbrella, comes back to get it, and drops a hint: "Cheaper than Pinkertons."  Ousted LVMH Moet Hennessy Louis Vuitton Chairman Alain Chevalier says he is in the process of acquiring the Pierre Balmain fashion and perfume house.  The move marks the return of one of France's most respected businessmen.  When he left Moet Vuitton in January, after devoting most of his adult life to the company, Mr. Chevalier said that if he had his life to live again, he would do one thing differently: own his own business.  Now, he's trying to live that dream.  "I want to prove to myself that I can do it," he says.  At one point, Mr. Chevalier's name seemed synonymous with that of Moet Vuitton.  It was he who built the Moet & Chandon champagne concern into France's largest luxury-products company, the leader in champagne and cognac, and a strong force in perfume.  He presided over its 1987 merger with luggage and luxury-goods concern Louis Vuitton S.A.  But as was common at large French concerns until recently, Mr. Chevalier held few shares.  Historically, French managers didn't take stock options; their power was based on their competence.  Now, with takeovers and financial battles proliferating, shareholders have begun throwing their weight around.  When Moet Vuitton's two leading holders, investor Bernard Arnault and Vuitton family leader Henry Racamier, began struggling for control, Mr. Chevalier found himself without any bargaining power of his own.  "What I've learned is that you must have effective power," he says.  So at age 58, the former elite manager rejected other employment offers at big companies.  Balmain dazzled the high-fashion world after World War II, but fell on hard times because it seemed too stuffy for the 1970s.  By the time Mr. Balmain died in 1982, he had sold his business.  It eventually became the property of Canadian investor Erich Fayer, who returned it to profit last year.  Messrs.  Chevalier and Fayer have reached an agreement in principle on the sale, but continue to work out details.  Mr. Chevalier says he expects to complete the transaction in a few weeks, but he won't disclose price or other details.  He is lining up financial backers, whose names he says he will disclose later.  His goal now, he says, is to further restructure Balmain, boost its profit, and develop its main business lines: high fashion, ready-to-wear accessories and perfumes.  He said he also hopes to develop an area the company has just begun, home furnishings such as wallpaper.  Sources say Balmain had sales last year of about 100 million French francs ($15 million) in its clothing lines, and, unlike many fashion concerns, high fashion is one of its biggest revenue earners, after license income.  Its perfume sales last year totaled about 50 million francs.  Next Tuesday, President Bush is going to deliver his much-anticipated speech about America's drug problem.  Unfortunately, the talk coming out of the White House lately has been very much in tune with the failed siren songs of drug wars past.  The current obsession is Colombian drug kingpins.  We'd be happy to support almost any action the U.S. might take to punish the gangsters that threaten Colombian sovereignty, but that is a foreign policy problem.  The truth is that the drug problem begins on American streets, not in Colombia.  The Colombia fixation misleads people into thinking that drugs are merely a foreign scourge imported into innocent American neighborhoods.  That was the premise of past drug efforts.  It's not true, and the policies that grow from it don't work.  Drugs don't destroy urban neighborhoods.  The destruction was well under way before the drugs arrived.  Hard-core drug users are often already committing crimes before they indulge in drugs.  They are already living disorganized lives, outside of families and schools.  Drugs only make their problems worse.  Instead of blaming foreigners and drugs for the drug problem, Mr. Bush could be the first President to hold drug users responsible for their immoral behavior.  That takes a subtler form of courage, because polite opinion has been committed to denying individual responsibility.  Senator Joseph Biden is typical; he calls the drug problem a "public health emergency," which conveniently abstracts drugs from any moral considerations.  Others talk about an "addiction crisis," as if it was all just a matter of biochemistry.  Holding people responsible for their actions is especially difficult in ghetto areas.  One of the advantages an affluent kid has over an underclass kid is that when a suburban kid is caught with cocaine, nobody starts asking about the "root causes" of the problem.  The ghetto kid, on the other hand, is reduced to sociology; he is left to live in a moral fog.  Judging by the media thrust on this subject, one could draw the conclusion that every underclass kid in America is a dealer or an addict, or soon will be.  What a cruel insult this is to the majority of underclass kids who are resisting drugs.  William Bennett has rightly used Ralph Ellison's phrase the "invisible man" to refer to this group because it gets no media attention.  There are inner-city kids showing up every day for their high-school classes, but let just one drug-related shooting occur and the TV crews are climbing all over the place.  Viewer reaction: They are out of control.  The only serious treatment we've seen was done by Insight magazine, which profiled kids who passed up the drug trade to make money the old-fashioned way.  Quincy McLane, 19, of Washington, was making $200 a day as a runner for a crack dealer.  He gave that up to earn $4.88 an hour cooking chicken at a Popeye's.  At night he's a dishwasher at a Holiday Inn.  It is simply ridiculous to say that people are incapable of governing themselves.  It is worse than ridiculous; it undermines the efforts of the people in these areas who really are trying to teach individual responsibility in their neighborhoods.  More of them have begun to appear in the past few years.  One such group is Black Men Together, headed by Alvin Brooks in Kansas City.  Mr. Brooks gathers a group of tough-looking men for rallies in front of crack houses.  With bullhorns they challenge dealers to get out of the neighborhood.  Black Men Together teaches kids that not all the strong guys are dealers.  It's possible to be cool as well as good.  These groups exemplify and teach individual responsibility.  Drug Czar William Bennett has designed a plan consistent with that philosophy, emphasizing that drugs are not a discrete problem, but are intertwined with the decay of community institutions and values that started in the late 1960s.  Placing more cops on the street, making jail terms for retail dealers more likely, forcing users into treatment programs and dealers into boot camps -- these and other Bennett-endorsed programs make those involved with drugs face the consequences of their actions.  Irving Kristol has described the challenge well: "The moral code for all civilizations must, at one time or another, be prepared to face the ultimate subversive question: 'Why not?' Our civilization is now facing that very question in the form of the drug problem. . . ."  He wrote that in 1970.  Almost 20 years later, with so many people willing to run the risks of a life with narcotics, George Bush has the opportunity to give a clear answer to that tough question: Why not?  Paul Keating, Australia's treasurer, confirmed the government will use all of its 9.12 billion Australian dollar ($6.92 billion) budget surplus expected for this fiscal year to repay its foreign and domestic debt.  Mr. Keating said the government won't undertake any new overseas borrowing and doesn't plan any further Treasury bond tenders this year.  He also confirmed that the government plans to start a "reverse" bond tender program in the quarter ending Dec. 31 to buy back Treasury bonds.  This had been announced Aug. 15 in the budget for the year ending June 30.  Although the budget surplus could repay the federal government's entire foreign-currency debt, Mr. Keating said in a statement, "this wouldn't be economically attractive due to the difficulty of convincing foreign holders to surrender their securities."  Moody's Investors Service Inc. has downgraded Australia's long-term foreign-currency debt rating to double-A-2 from double-A-1 in part because of the rising foreign debt.  Stanford University finally managed to get rid of W. Glenn Campbell, who will begin his forced retirement this evening.  In 29 years as director of the university's Hoover Institution, Mr. Campbell made it one the most important research organizations in the world.  It now has a magnificent library, a $300 million endowment, and a staff that includes five Nobel Prize winners as well as notable scholars such as Thomas Sowell, Robert Conquest, Seymour Martin Lipset and many others.  Stanford is purging Mr. Campbell for two reasons.  He is demanding and sometimes strident, exactly the sort of rough-edged entrepreneur who doesn't fit into a bureaucracy such as Stanford's.  And Hoover's staff, of course, is more conservative than the Stanford faculty, which isn't saying much; the first 500 names in any town in America would produce individuals more conservative than Stanford's faculty.  Many of the writings emanating from Hoover strongly support free markets and strongly oppose communism, views that would have been regarded as impolite to press too hard in most faculty lounges over the past 25 years.  By bagging Mr. Campbell, Stanford hopes to bring Hoover more into conformity with community standards.  Now, there are at Stanford, as at any university, good scholars who actually believe in and welcome diversity of thought.  But in recent years Stanford has been overwhelmed by a coterie of mediocre academics who don't brook disagreement with their world view.  It's a typical problem in academia.  Moribund professors win tenure about age 35.  Unable to realize the satisfactions of being either a good teacher or an original thinker, they spend their parched decades consumed with academic politics.  And if their playpen happens to be a Stanford, they tirelessly press the sort of radical ideology that can make sense only in a place such as Palo Alto.  The politicized professors maintain the fiction that they are non-partisan.  They want Hoover off campus.  Typically, Stanford president Donald Kennedy and the Stanford Board of Trustees are more oblique.  They merely want to gain control of Hoover and its abundant resources, and they hope to do so by eventually replacing Mr. Campbell with someone more congenial to what they represent.  In doing away with Mr. Campbell, they claimed they were merely upholding Stanford's mandatory retirement policy; Mr. Campbell turns 65 this year.  But apparently this policy applies only to Mr. Campbell.  The Board of Trustees recently gave 64-year old Richard Lyman (who, like Donald Kennedy, was a member of the Carter administration) a five-year contract to head a new international relations institute at the university.  His contract was approved at the same meeting the board forced out Mr. Campbell.  What is going on here is a form of academic protectionism: An ideology that is competing poorly in the real world is trying to bar its stronger rival.  This intolerance in academia today has forced many conservatives to flee to think tanks, such as the Heritage Foundation or the American Enterprise Institute.  Thus like others before them, if Hoover's free-thinkers are made unwelcome at their own institution, they can move to Washington and possibly have more impact on policy.  Still, even a Stanford can't completely escape the judgment of the marketplace.  Many of the donors who give money to universities support diversity of opinion, and because of its crabbed radicalism on Hoover and other issues, Stanford has experienced a decline in donor support.  Perhaps, as Glenn Campbell might suggest, these donors are finding more productive uses for their intellectual and financial capital.  We're delighted that the State Department is taking a tough line toward something that calls itself the World Tourism Organization in Paris.  The WTO, it seems, is contemplating the admission of "Palestine," a creation of the Palestine Liberation Organization, to membership and State rightly objects.  We're not sure why tourists would want to go to this Palestine, even if it existed, since where the PLO exists there always seems to be trouble.  Lebanon hasn't had a moment's peace since the PLO first arrived there.  We also wonder why the U.S. gives tax money to the WTO in the first place.  Tourism, it seems to us, is an industry fully capable of self-support.  Nippon Telegraph & Telephone Corp. wants computer hackers to try to break the security code protecting its private communication and data system.  The Tokyo telecommunications company is offering a $7,000 reward to any person or organization that can invade its FEAL-8 system, according to an Associated Press report.  Officials at NTT America Inc., NTT's U.S. subsidiary, weren't able to confirm the report.  The reward offer was said to expire Aug. 31, 1991.  AP reported that a Nippon official made the offer in Japan, hoping to detect any defects in its data communication system.  Rumors in Europe had suggested that a way to penetrate it had been found.  The New York Mercantile Exchange, which has been criticized for not bringing more disciplinary cases against its members, said it increased to $250,000 from $100,000 the maximum fine it will impose for major trading offenses.  The new maximum -- about equal to those at other major futures exchanges -- grows out of a Nymex review of its self-regulatory policies, begun after the big federal investigation of Chicago futures trading surfaced in January.  The Nymex is the major futures market for crude oil, heating oil, gasoline and platinum.  Industry officials and regulators said the maximum fine that an exchange sets isn't as important as the number of fines it imposes.  And Nymex, which is New York's most active futures exchange, levied a total of $87,500 in fines for trade-practices violations through the first six months of the year, a spokeswoman said.  That compares with $120,000 in trade-practices fines for all of 1988, but at some other exchanges, individual traders have been fined more than that.  In addition, the maximum Nymex fine for minor offenses was doubled to $10,000, the exchange said.  Suspensions will no longer be limited to one year and will be mandatory for anyone found to have defrauded customers.  Also, member brokers will be banned from "cross trading" between customers and themselves.  The exchange said the changes will be submitted to the Commodity Futures Trading Commission for approval.  After a five-month investigation, the city attorney's office hasn't found any evidence of criminal wrongdoing by Mayor Tom Bradley and is likely to determine only that the mayor improperly documented his personal finances, City Hall sources said.  A final report on the matter is scheduled to be released in about two weeks.  The city attorney has been looking at whether the mayor helped steer city funds to Far East National Bank, a Chinatown bank that paid him as a consultant, and helped aid Van Nuys-based Valley Federal Savings & Loan Association, of which he was a paid director, in zoning and tax disputes with the city.  Mr. Bradley still faces a federal probe into his investment ties to Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. as part of a broader inquiry into the firm's associations with politicians.  He held securities issued as part of Drexel-financed takeovers, and helped start a congressional lobbying effort earlier this year to persuade the Securities and Exchange Commission to let Drexel keep its junk-bond operations in Beverly Hills.  The mayor has maintained he didn't violate any law but did concede he made "an error in judgment" by working for Valley Federal and Far East.  El Al Israeli Airlines said it plans to sell as much as 50% of the company to the public.  The Israeli flag carrier said it plans initially to sell 25% in Israel, with the buyers to include El Al employees.  An additional 25% is to be sold later on foreign stock exchanges.  The airline would use proceeds from the stock sale to replace and enlarge its fleet.  El Al "isn't in a position" yet to announce the number of shares to be offered or a price, said Baruch Lilo, a vice president at the carrier.  A panel of government officials and El Al representatives will handle initial preparations for the offering.  Though the airline has been operating under a receiver since January 1983 -- the company had financial and labor problems, according to Mr. Lilo -- it has been profitable in each of the past three years.  Revenue in 1988 rose 27% to $665.3 million from $520.6 million in 1987.  "Comrade Stalin, I ask you to stop sending terrorists to Yugoslavia to murder me.  We have already caught seven. . . .  if this doesn't stop, I will send one man to Moscow, and there will be no need to send a second."  Marshall Tito eluded Stalin.  Millions did not.  In some nameless grave lies Roy Medvedev's father, snatched from sight by the terror of the '30s.  He himself earned a stiff rebuke for a history of Stalinism, finished in the late '60s, when statues of Georgia Joe were still sprouting like cabbages in the fields.  Mr. Medvedev was expelled from the party; and it was in the West that his book was published -- the first study using material from Soviet archives. (The Tito letter was plucked from Stalin's drawer along with other favorite pieces of memorabilia.)  The new wind blowing in Moscow has swept Stalin from his pedestal and returned Mr. Medvedev to respectability.  As a revised and expanded edition of Mr. Medvedev's book, "Let History Judge: The Origins and Consequences of Stalinism" (Columbia University Press, 903 pages, $57.50), was being translated, the Soviet historian was readmitted to the party and elected to the Congress of People's Deputies in April.  His book's less controversial sections have already appeared in Soviet periodicals.  The rest of us can read without censorship Mr. Medvedev's analysis of power based on repression.  In the Soviet Union, this boiled down to what East Bloc intellectuals these days call "contra-selection."  Stripped of democratic control, a ruling hierarchy resorts to the most ruthless, most unprincipled and most inept toadies that circumstances permit.  "Let History Judge" is an extraordinary testament to this phenomenon, tracing how over a few years the Soviet party, government and military were packed with a class of "degenerates," commonly called the "nomenklatura."  Thus, from the Georgian peasant Soso Dzhugashvili, an inarticulate social retardate with a pock-marked face and a deformed left arm, evolved Koba, organizer of "expropriations" -- bank jobs and the like -- for the benefit of the Bolshevik treasury.  Koba was such a third-rate revolutionary, his name at one point slipped Lenin's mind.  As Stalin (literally, Man of Steel), he became unforgettable soon enough as a mass murderer who the world insisted on perceiving as a statesman working long hours to continue Lenin's legacy and the revolution.  Focusing on the "mistakes and crimes" of Stalin, a man with "limitless ambition and . . . limited abilities," Mr. Medvedev rejects commonplace apologia for Stalinism.  He attributes its rise less to capitalist hostility than to Western gullibility (from Churchill to George Bernard Shaw); less to the threat of Nazism, than to cooperation with it; and least to rank-and-file sabotage, but largely to gross economic mismanagement.  The Soviets prevailed in World War II, Mr. Medvedev writes, in spite of Stalin's miscalculations and vacillations.  Victory derived not from coherent strategy, but sheer numbers -- as many as 30 million Soviet lives, against seven million German corpses on all fronts.  "Let History Judge" is a numbing chronicle of the "gigantic meat grinder" that established Stalin as the champion of terror: More than 600,000 death sentences and the arrest of at least five million in the worst years of 1937-38.  He destroyed children as well as old people, nobodies and party favorites.  His victims included an innocent old woman who confused "Trotskistka" with "traktoristka," along with the tainted NKVD chief Nikolai Yezhov.  We read of idealists who died with "Long Live Stalin]" on their lips, and of the disillusioned Chekist Artur Artuzov, who scrawled a damnation of Stalin on a wall in his blood just before he was shot.  In the countryside in 1932-33, as many as eight million starved to death in accordance with an agricultural policy based on killing "kulaks" (farmers) outright or just wasting their lands.  Mr. Medvedev abandons in this new edition the argument that agricultural collectivization was necessary for socialism.  It is Mr. Medvedev who brought forth the appalling fact that Stalin exported huge quantities of grain to Western Europe at low prices during the famine just for appearance's sake.  Such cynicism thrived in the absence of an effective opposition.  Mr. Medvedev avers that the "rightist" opposition of Bukharin, Rykov and Tomsky failed "to exploit . . . opportunities" to defeat Stalin because they "shied away from the struggle."  He makes a similar case against the "left" personified by Trotsky, who the author now links closer to Lenin than he did in the 1971 edition.  In light of the general bewilderment and "refined" methods of intimidation and torture in place at the time, Mr. Medvedev does not condemn such reticence.  Rather, he denounces Stalinism for "perverting" the concepts of Lenin, who Mr. Medvedev deems "a political genius of a type that appears perhaps once in a century."  Yet the new edition of "Let History Judge" rejects Leninism as "the last word in the political and social sciences."  When Lenin chose the lesser of two evils -- centralism over losing control of the revolution -- he essentially rationalized one-party dictatorship and censorship.  Mr. Medvedev doggedly argues, though, that Lenin meant these measures to be temporary.  If this is true, now is the time for his political heirs to prove this.  They could go a long way toward burying Stalinism by exposing the anti-democratic contradictions inherent in Leninism. ---  Mr. Keresztes is deputy editorial page editor of The Wall Street Journal/Europe.  Michel Gaucher, 45 years old, was named chairman and chief executive officer of this food retailing and real estate concern, succeeding Melvyn Dobrin, 66, who resigned as chairman and a director, and Irving Ludmer, 54, who resigned earlier as president, chief executive and a director.  Mr. Gaucher remains chairman and president of Socanav Inc., Montreal, which acquired control of Steinberg last week.  The other nine Steinberg directors also resigned.  Jean-Roch Vachon, 45, previously president, food group, Canada, was named Steinberg president and chief operating officer.  Those named to the new five-member board are Mr. Gaucher; Nancy Orr-Gaucher, Mr. Gaucher's wife and business associate; Louis Rochette, Mr. Gaucher's junior partner in Socanav; Raynold Langlois of the Montreal law firm of Langlois Trudeau Tourigny; and Daniel Paille, a vice president at Caisse de Depot et Placement, the Quebec government pension fund agency and Socanav's financial backer in the successful Steinberg bid.  Sunday, Sept. 3, 8-9 p.m. EDT, on PBS (PBS air dates and times vary, so check local listings): "Down the Shore."  What better time to face up to bad news than summer's end?  This film focuses on the new consensus in states like New Jersey that it's time to quit polluting the Atlantic Ocean.  Monday, Sept. 4, 7-8 p.m. EDT, on Cinemax (repeated Sept. 8, 14, 16, 19, 23 and 29): "Montgomery Clift: His Place in the Sun."  When the camera peers into the troubled depths of Clift's handsome eyes in films like "From Here to Eternity" and "The Misfits," the trouble it sees is real.  This segment of "Crazy About the Movies" hints at why.  Tuesday, Sept. 5, 8-9 p.m. EDT, on PBS: "The President and Mrs. Bush Talking With David Frost."  Let's hope nothing toxic washes up on the beach at Kennebunkport, Maine, while Mr. Frost is taping his first interview with the Bushes since the election.  Tuesday and Wednesday, Sept. 5-6, 10-11 p.m. EDT, on NBC: "The R.A.C.E."  In this "Racial Attitudes and Consciousness Exam," NBC News will use interactive technology and electronic feedback to assess audience opinions on race.  The figures gathered on this live show (hosted by Bryant Gumbel) will be compared with national poll data compiled by the University of Chicago's National Opinion Research Center.  Wednesday, Sept. 6, 8-9 p.m. EDT, on CBS: "West 57th: Three-Star Comedy Edition."  Past and present chew-the-fat sessions with Chevy Chase, Billy Crystal and Tom Hanks.  Wednesday, Sept. 6, 9 p.m. EDT (and 6 p.m. PDT), on MTV: "1989 MTV Video Music Awards."  Hosted by Arsenio Hall, this live show will feature four new categories: rap, dance, heavy metal and postmodern.  It also will bestow its Video Vanguard Award on George ("I Want Your Sex") Michael.  Wednesday, Sept. 6, 9-11:30 p.m. EDT, on PBS: "Intifada: The Palestinians and Israel."  Wrapped around the controversial film, "Days of Rage: The Young Palestinians," are a WNET-produced segment exploring the reasons for Israel's presence in the occupied territories, and a panel discussion hosted by Hodding Carter that includes diverse points of view from Alan L. Keyes, Richard W. Murphy, Seymour D. Reich, Walter Ruby and James J. Zogby.  Saturday, Sept. 9, 10-11 p.m. EDT, on HBO (repeated Sept. 10, 14, 17, 20 and 26): "HBO World Stage: Diana's World Tour."  From London's Wembley Arena, the indefatigable Diana Ross reprises her old hits, regales us with her new gowns, and reveals would-be hits from her latest album.  Sunday, Sept. 10, 10-11 p.m. EDT, on Showtime (repeated Sept. 14, 19, 25, 30 and Oct. dates to be announced: "Carmilla."  From Shelley Duvall (producer of "Faerie Tale Theatre"), this second "Nightmare Classic" is an adaptation of a 19th-century vampire tale in which a young girl (Ione Skye) and her widowed father (Roy Dotrice) become attached to a mysterious woman (Meg Tilly) who turns out to have strange and sanguinary tastes.  Starting Monday, Sept. 11 and ending in October (date to be announced), on syndicated stations nationwide: "Remembering World War II."  On its 50th anniversary, we expect to see WWII repackaged as entertainment.  This effort, from Greystone Communications, claims to shed new light on such subjects as "Adolf Hitler: The Man and the Myth" (the title of the first episode).  Monday-Friday, Sept. 11-15, all regularly scheduled news programs and a special three-hour segment of "48 Hours," on CBS: "Drugs: One Nation, Under Siege."  CBS News will follow the president's Sept. 5 announcement of his anti-drug strategy with a solid week of attention to America's tragic habit.  Mondays, Sept. 11-Dec. 4, 8:30-9 p.m. EDT (and EST), on HBO: "Jim Hensen's Ghost of Faffner Hall."  If you like "The Muppet Show's" house band, you'll love this new series about a Gothic mansion haunted by jazz, folk and pop music-loving creatures out to teach your kids (and you) as much as they can about music.  Monday, Sept. 11, 10-11 p.m. EDT, on PBS (Tuesday, Sept. 12, 8-9 p.m. EDT; and Saturday, Sept. 16, 2-3 p.m. EDT {in Spanish}, on WNET/Thirteen): "Other Faces of AIDS."  There's more bad news in this documentary about the impact of AIDS on poor black and Hispanic communities, hosted by ABC's medical correspondent, George Strait.  Wednesday, Sept. 13, 9-11 p.m. EDT, on PBS: "Firing Line Special Debate."  The topic is free trade -- defended by William F. Buckley Jr., Jeane Kirkpatrick, Newt Gingrich and Jack Kemp; and attacked by George McGovern, Gary Hart, Pat Schroeder and John Kenneth Galbraith.  James J. Reilly, director of financial controls, was named to the new position of corporate vice president, financial operations, at this maker of defense electronic systems.  William J. Maloney was named president and chief executive officer of the Rockefeller Center Development Corp. unit of this closely held real estate company.  He succeeds John G. Burnett, 65 years old, who is stepping down to pursue other business interests in real estate.  Mr. Maloney, 42, has been senior vice president of the unit.  David Yoffie, 35-year-old professor at Harvard Business School, was named a director of this semiconductor maker, expanding the board to 11 members.  Several changes are being made in the Dow Jones Equity Market Index, effective today.  Reading & Bates Corp. is being dropped from the oil drilling industry group, because it is restructuring.  Replacing it will be Global Marine Inc.  Paramount Communications Inc., formerly Gulf & Western Inc., is being moved from the conglomerates group to the recreational products and services group.  In the food retailers and wholesalers group, Food Lion Inc. will be represented by its Class A shares instead of its Class B shares.  The condition of heavily indebted developing countries "appears to be unravelling further" and large U.S. banks likely will have to increase their provisions for shaky Latin American loans this year, the New York rating agency Moody's Investor Service Inc. said.  A further round of adding to loss reserves at big U.S. banks would probably mean further staff and spending cutbacks at these institutions, coupled with property sales and other revenue-raising measures.  In 1987, U.S. banks added more than $20 billion to their provisions for doubtful loans to developing nations, but the amount put into such reserves at the largest U.S. institutions still lags that maintained by most big European banks.  The Bank of England recently required the big four British banks to raise their loan-loss provisions to close to 50% of their credits to troubled developing-nations debtors.  Previously, these British banks had reserve levels equal to roughly one-third of these credits, about the same as many large U.S. banks maintain.  As if to underline Moody's message on the unravelling debt situation, Brazilian officials are set to meet with bankers in New York next week to discuss $2 billion in interest that comes due on that country's debt in September.  It is now unlikely the country will make these payments.  Brazil hasn't been able to reach a provisional agreement with the International Monetary Fund, and as a result more than $2 billion in loans pledged to it are being held up by the IMF, commercial banks and Japan.  Brazil probably won't be able to reach a compromise with the IMF before its presidential election in November, according to bankers and officials.  It failed to reach previously agreed IMF targets for its government deficit and hasn't been able to agree with the agency on further substantial deficit-reducing measures.  This makes it almost certain that Brazil will continue to fall behind on interest payments on its $110 billion foreign debt.  In its report on Third-World debt, Moody's says that Brazil has found that the most effective way to extract concessions from bank creditors is "by building up arrearages."  The rating agency says the pressures of the country's forthcoming election may harden its debt stance.  The New York rating agency says the recent U.S. debt initiative -- the so-called Brady plan -- has begun "an irreversible process of forgiveness as the U.S. has tilted away from the banks" on the international debt problem.  The debt plan, which was launched March 10 and has been substantially refocused since, places somewhat more emphasis on cutting back debt and interest payments than on arranging new loans.  The Brady plan is causing the accounting value of loans to debt-troubled countries to "catch up with the economic value," Moody's says.  Accounting recognition of the lower value of credits "affects regulatory capital" and "financial flexibility," Moody's adds, warning that it may have to "revisit" the issue of the credit-ratings of the most heavily exposed banks as a result of the further unravelling of the debt situation.  Mexico was the first country to hammer out the outline of an agreement with its foreign bank creditors under the Brady plan.  The plan will provide the country with "very modest relief," the rating agency says in a blunt and critical assessment of the proposed accord.  It asserts that Mexico could encounter balance-of-payments problems as early as next year.  That bleak analysis is in marked contrast to that of the Mexicans themselves, their bank creditors and the U.S. government, who all maintain that the recent proposed agreement gives Mexico the chance to resume economic growth.  In Washington County, Iowa, speeding drivers slow down for dummies.  They do when the dummies are in patrol cars, that is.  With plenty of highways and only 12 deputies on its force, the county Sheriff's Department decided to try something different: Put a mannequin in a radar-equipped car and set the car along busy stretches of road.  "The average individual, when he sees a patrol car, does one of two things: hit the brakes or check the speedometer," observes Chief Deputy Jack Dillon.  Who -- or what -- is inside the car doesn't matter, he maintains.  Deputy 92-0, as the dummy has been dubbed, is a female form that used to model clothes in Spurgeons, a local retailer.  Although she can't write tickets, the radio in her car is programmed to trigger radar detectors.  On duty, the dishwater blonde sports mirrored shades and a regulation green and brown uniform.  In addition, she holds a microphone up to her mouth.  "It does do the job.  People slow down," says Vickie Flynn, assistant manager at Exporter Elevator in Westchester, Iowa.  The mannequin-equipped patrol car has been stationed near her company on three separate occasions.  "Until we knew what was going on, we were all wondering if we had a woman officer in this county."  Other unsuspecting residents have called the sheriff to complain that a patrol car has been sitting in front of their house all day.  Besides saving wear and tear on patrol cars, the new deputy saves the department on payroll costs, Mr. Dillon says.  "She works real cheap."  Not all of the county's residents are warm on the idea.  "Everybody here thinks it's kind of a joke," says Fred Leichty, production manager at Iowa Feeds in Washington, Iowa.  Mr. Dillon concedes that the ruse works mainly on through traffic, not on locals who know what to watch out for.  And even with through traffic, Deputy 92-0 may lose her effectiveness as word spreads.  But the department can always tinker with the idea if speeders catch on.  "We can put two 'people' in the car, or add a radar operator," says Mr. Dillon.  "Our imagination is the only thing that restricts us."  Paul G. Kirk Jr., 51 years old, was elected a director of this telecommunications, hotel, financial services and office equipment company, increasing board membership to 13.  He is a managing partner at the law firm of Sullivan & Worcester and a past chairman of the Democratic National Committee.  Bryan E. Lodder has been elected president and chief operating officer of this textile manufacturer.  He succeeds George Greenberg, who retired from the posts in July, but will remain a member of the company's board.  Investor Arthur M. Goldberg extended his unsolicited $32-a-share, or $154.3 million, tender offer for DiGiorgio Corp. until midnight Sept. 20.  The Goldberg group also said it may be "forced to reconsider" its offer for DiGiorgio, which previously rejected the Goldberg offer as inadequate while leaving the door open for a superior offer.  In a letter to DiGiorgio's board, Mr. Goldberg said the group may reconsider its offer if DiGiorgio's values or prospects are "adversely affected" by "this course of delay and diversion."  "A protracted procedure whereby a company is shopped around, especially in parts, may have the effect of causing a deterioration in the business, employee morale and customer relations," Mr. Goldberg said.  "The result could be a reduction, rather than an enhancement, in the value of the company as a whole."  DiGiorgio, a San Francisco distributor of food products and building materials, closed yesterday at $34.25, down 25 cents, in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  About 3,800 shares of DiGiorgio common had been tendered as of the close of business Tuesday.  The offer was scheduled to expire yesterday.  The 3,820 shares tendered, together with the 717,900 shares of DiGiorgio common owned by Mr. Goldberg, represents about 13% of the company's common outstanding on a fully diluted basis.  In San Francisco, a spokesman for DiGiorgio declined to comment on Mr. Goldberg's letter.  Minority business organizations have asked federal regulators to deny approval of major accounting firm mergers because they violate antitrust law and the firms have made so few minority partners.  Robert Gnaizda, a partner in Public Advocates Inc., a San Francisco public interest law firm, petitioned the Federal Trade Commission and the U.S. Justice Department earlier this month on behalf of 15 groups, including the California Council of Urban Leagues, the Latino Issues Forum and Associated Asian CPA Firms.  Mr. Gnaizda called the number of minority partners in large accounting firms "appalling."  He said that data obtained by Public Advocates showed that less than 0.5% of partners at major accounting firms are black, about 0.5% are Hispanic, and another 0.5% are Asian.  Only 4% are women, Mr. Gnaizda said.  Public Advocates' petition maintains that the Big Eight accounting firms operate as a "semi-secret society" of white male senior partners and policymakers.  With rare exceptions, the firms "have excluded minorities from even low-level junior partnership roles," the petition said.  It urged regulators to force big accounting firms to set goals for making minority partners and to investigate the adverse impact of mergers on minority hiring and the development of minority businesses.  The FTC has referred the petition to the Justice Department, according to a letter it addressed to Public Advocates.  A spokeswoman for the Justice Department's antitrust division didn't return phone calls.  A spokesman for the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants, which has 286,000 members, declined to comment on the petition.  A survey conducted by an American Institute committee in 1988 showed that among 114 accounting firms, including the Big Eight firms, there were 37 black, 97 Hispanic, 44 Asian and 403 women partners.  Mr. Gnaizda noted that the Big Eight alone had more than 9,000 U.S. partners last year.  Bert N. Mitchell, the managing partner of Mitchell/Titus & Co. in New York, the largest minority-controlled accounting firm in the U.S., said he agrees the Big Eight should have more minority partners.  But, he said, the mergers are irrelevant to the number of minority partners in accounting firms.  An increase in the number of minority partners is important "whether there is a Big Eight or a Big Five," he asserted.  In recent weeks, Arthur Young & Co. and Ernst & Whinney have merged into Ernst & Young, and Deloitte, Haskins & Sells and Touche Ross & Co. have combined into Deloitte & Touche.  Arthur Andersen & Co. and Price Waterhouse are also considering a merger.  Yields on money-market mutual funds fell in the latest week to their lowest point since January, although portfolio managers have moved to capture recent increases in short-term interest rates.  In the week ended Tuesday, the average seven-day compound annual yield slipped to 8.64% from 8.66%, according to Donoghue's Money Fund Report, a Holliston, Mass.-based newsletter.  Compound yields assume reinvestment of dividends.  But after falling for about three months, short-term interest rates have risen in the past few weeks.  Six-month Treasury bills sold at Monday's auction, for example, yielded 8.32%, compared with 7.74% July 31.  Portfolio managers are shortening the maturities of the funds' investments to take advantage of those increases.  The average maturity of the 387 taxable funds tracked by Money Fund Report declined by two days in the latest week to 38 days.  Shorter maturities permit fund managers to reinvest assets sooner at higher rates, just as longer maturities lock rates for a longer period when rates are believed to be declining.  Early this month, the average maturity stood at 42 days.  As a result, money-fund yields should move up a bit in the next few weeks, said Walter Frank, chief economist for the Donoghue Organization, which publishes Money Fund Report.  Shorter maturities "indicate that caution is creeping in -- that fund managers are a little concerned about rates going up," Mr. Frank said.  Total assets of the 387 funds declined in the latest week for the first time in more than four months.  It was a small loss, however, to $335.7 billion from $335.9 billion, and it was due to a decline in institutional funds as institutions moved cash into the rising stock market.  Assets of general-purpose funds continued to increase.  Investors can still get close to double-digit yields from the top-performing funds.  Dreyfus Worldwide Dollar Money Market Fund had a seven-day compound annual yield of 9.60% in the latest week; the seven-day compound yield of Fidelity Spartan Money Market Fund was 9.50%.  The average seven-day simple yield of the taxable funds was 8.29%, down from 8.31%.  The average 30-day simple yield fell to 8.32% from 8.38%, and the average 30-day compound yield declined to 8.67% from 8.73%.  Yields on tax-exempt funds rose slightly, although they were still below the taxable yields, on an equivalent basis, for most investors.  The average seven-day compound yield of the 191 tax-free funds tracked by Donoghue was 5.70%.  That's equal to a taxable yield of 8.51% for an investor in the 33% tax bracket and 7.92% for an investor in the 28% tax bracket.  The average seven-day simple yield on tax-exempt funds rose to 5.55% from 5.53%.  The average 30-day simple yield remained at 5.50%, and the 30-day compound yield was 5.65% for the second week in a row.  Assets of the tax-free funds fell to $69.3 billion from $69.7 billion.  General Electric Co. said a unit signed a $10 million contract to supply two coal-fired turbine-generators for a cogeneration plant in Rocky Mount, N.C.  The cogeneration plant to be built by closely held Cogentrix Inc., Charlotte, N.C., would supply steam for nearby industries and electric power to North Carolina Power Co.  GE has interests in broadcasting, financial services and electrical products.  Parker & Parsley Development Partners L.P. said it completed its previously announced $24.2 million sale of its 91% interest in the Levelland Waterflood Project.  The buyer wasn't disclosed.  Levelland was acquired in June 1988.  Parker & Parsley, which develops, produces and acquires oil and gas properties, said that proceeds of the sale will be used to retire debt.  The following issues were recently filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission:  Employee Benefit Plans Inc., filed a proposed initial public offering of two million common stock shares via Dean Witter Reynolds Inc. and Piper Jaffray.  Kirby Exploration Corp., filed for a proposed offering of $50 million of subordinated debentures.  Merry-Go-Round Enterprises Inc., filed a proposed public offering of 3,350,000 common stock shares, of which one million are to be sold by the company, and 2,350,000 by holders via Alex.  Brown, PaineWebber Inc. and PrudentialBache Capital Funding.  Rally's Inc., filed an initial public offering of 1.7 million common shares, about 1.5 million to be sold by Rally's and 265,000 to be sold by holders, via Alex.  Brown & Sons Inc. and Montgomery Securities.  United HealthCare Corp., filed a public offering of 2,500,000 new common stock shares via Alex.  Brown and co-managed by Merrill Lynch Capital Markets and Piper, Jaffray & Hopwood Inc.  Westpac Banking, filed an initial public offering of eight million American Depositary Shares, via Merrill Lynch.  John F. Bard, recently named president and chief operating officer of Tambrands Inc., has become the latest executive to leave the company's upper ranks.  Mr. Bard, 48 years old, had envisioned running the company as a whole, but he wasn't given that latitude by Tambrands' new chairman and chief executive officer, Martin F.C. Emmett.  Mr. Emmett in early August divided the business into two segments, North America and international, essentially eliminating the role of Mr. Bard.  "In April, we set up an organization that we thought was appropriate at that time.  We have looked more closely at the organization and have decided that the COO position was an extra layer that was not necessary," Mr. Emmett said.  "Given John Bard's desire to run the business as a whole, he didn't see an attractive position for himself in the new structure."  The company didn't disclose if or when the posts would be filled.  Mr. Bard couldn't be reached for comment.  The Lake Success, N.Y., company's top management has been revolving most of this year, beginning with the sudden resignation in February of Edwin H. Shutt Jr. as chairman, president and chief executive.  Mr. Shutt had been under pressure to diversify the company beyond its mainstay feminine-protection business.  The company was run for a time by E. Russell Sprague, honorary chairman, who returned temporarily from retirement.  Mr. Emmett, a former investment banker, was named chairman and chief executive in April.  Mr. Bard was named president in May.  He had been named chief operating officer in February, shortly after Mr. Shutt resigned.  Mr. Shutt's resignation sparked speculation that the company might be sold or bought out, sending its stock soaring.  Among those rumored to be interested in Tambrands were Johnson & Johnson and Centaur Partners, an investment concern.  The companies have repeatedly declined to comment.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Tambrands closed at $75.125, up 50 cents.  Charles J. Chapman, who in mid-August was named executive vice president of the parent and president of the feminine-protection business in the U.S. and Canada, and Dustin L. Allred, group vice president in charge of the international division, will assume Mr. Bard's duties.  Mr. Chapman worked for Mr. Emmett in the early 1980s while they were at RJR Nabisco Inc. Mr. Allred is the most senior member of Tambrands to remain in his job since Mr. Emmett took over.  A spokesman for Tambrands said Mr. Bard's departure "didn't happen instantaneously.  It was discussed and considered for some period of time."  It wasn't clear whether Mr. Bard was offered the chance to head either Tambrands group; the company wouldn't comment on "inner workings," the spokesman said.  When Mr. Bard was named president, Tambrands said he would oversee the world-wide tampon business.  Until April, he had run the company's feminine-protection business from 1986, when he was hired.  Previously, he had been in charge of an international division of Clorox Co.  Tambrands also has interests in cosmetics and diagnostic testing products.  The Canadian government said it plans to auction Wednesday 750 million Canadian dollars (US$636.8 million) of bonds maturing Dec. 1, 1999.  Proceeds of the issue will be used for general government purposes.  Britain's narrow money supply, known as M-0, rose a seasonally adjusted 5.3% in the year to July, according to Bank of England figures.  The rise is unchanged from the bank's preliminary estimate issued earlier in the month and is above the government's target range of 1% to 5% growth in the year ending next March 31.  M-4 lending, which includes bank and building society lending in sterling to the U.K. private sector, rose a seasonally adjusted #7.2 billion ($11.43 billion) in July, compared with provisional estimates of a #6.9 billion rise.  Thin trading put stock prices and the dollar on a seesaw, while bond prices inched higher.  In a market dominated by program trading activity, the Dow Jones Industrial Average gained 1.52 points to close at 2728.15.  But continued takeover talk in the airline industry boosted the Dow Jones Transportation Average to another all-time high of 1529.52, a 22.94-point gain over the previous record Tuesday.  The dollar slumped in early New York trading but recovered to post snappy gains against the mark and yen.  But cautious bond investors, awaiting tomorrow's August employment report, kept a lid on bond prices, holding the gains in long-term Treasury bonds to about a quarter of a point, or about $2.50 for each $1,000 of face amount.  Investors paid little attention to yesterday's government report showing both personal income and consumer spending rising 0.7% in July.  The gains, only slightly below market expectations of 0.8% rises in both statistics, only confirmed the general impression of a healthy economy.  Instead, what activity there was generally grew out of technical factors unique to each market.  In stocks, for instance, computer-assisted program trading related to stock index arbitrage was the big moving force.  Buy programs early in the day pushed prices higher, with the Dow Jones industrials gaining 18 points at the market's intraday peak.  Later sell programs knocked the average 14 points below its opening level before yet another round of buy programs carried prices to their closing levels.  In the currency markets, the dollar first slumped as traders focused their attention on the relationship between the mark and yen.  But after the mark failed to attain a technical breakthrough against the yen, traders abandoned the mark in favor of the dollar, driving the U.S. currency sharply higher.  Traders said they expect financial markets to again focus on fundamentals after a batch of economic reports is issued Friday and many of Wall Street's players return to their desks after the long Labor Day weekend.  The reports due Friday include the August employment report and the purchasing managers' August survey.  In major market activity:  Stock prices rose in moderate trading.  Volume on the New York Stock Exchange totaled 174.4 million shares.  Advancing issues on the Big Board were ahead of losers 795 to 650.  The dollar rallied against most major currencies.  In late New York trading, the dollar was quoted at 1.9544 marks and 144.30 yen, compared with 1.9360 marks and 142.95 yen Tuesday.  Bond prices crept higher.  The yield on the Treasury's benchmark 30-year bond slipped to 8.17%.  A franchisee-investor group disclosed it has offered embattled DWG Corp. more than $200 million to purchase DWG's fast-growing Arby's Inc. restaurant company.  But Victor Posner, the Miami Beach investor who controls DWG, showed no sign that he intends to turn control of Arby's over to its franchisees.  The market reacted favorably to the offer.  DWG's stock jumped $1 to close at $12.375 in American Stock Exchange composite trading.  Arby's is the marketing, franchising and service company for the 2,100-store Arby's restaurant chain.  The franchisee group, R.B. Partners Ltd., consists of eight of Arby's largest franchisees, which together operate about 25% of the chain's restaurants.  Atlanta-based R.B. Partners, which said it made its offer last week in a letter to Mr. Posner, said it believes the legal and financial problems faced by DWG and Mr. Posner threaten the future of Arby's.  The group sent an additional letter to other franchisees earlier this week, stating that the initial offering price "could increase during the negotiation process."  However, Chesapeake Financial Corp., the unit of DWG that owns Arby's, said yesterday that it had "no interest in pursuing such a sale."  In addition, Mr. Posner said he is "committed to the continued growth and expansion of Arby's."  According to R.B. Partners, the proposed $200 million price is about three times higher than the price that DWG paid for Arby's as part of its 1984 acquisition of Royal Crown Cos.  In 1988, Arby's reported revenue of $153.8 million and operating profit of $20.7 million.  Sales among the 2,100 restaurants jumped 18% in 1988 to $1.16 billion; the percentage increase was three times the restaurant industry average for that year.  That performance has established Arby's as one of the crown jewels in Mr. Posner's otherwise battered financial empire.  DWG, a holding company, has been under siege for five months, attempting to fend off a $22-a-share, $572 million hostile takeover bid from Granada Investments, New York.  "We think it is very unlikely that Arby's could remain unaffected by all these pressures on Mr. Posner and DWG," R.B. Partners said in the letter to franchisees, adding, "The best way to ensure our future is through franchisee ownership of the system."  Industry observers, however, weren't surprised that Mr. Posner would reject the offer.  "At the rate (Arby's) is going now, I don't see why (Mr.  Posner) would accept $200 million," said Kenneth Franklin, president of Franchise Developments Inc., a consulting firm in Pittsburgh.  "He's had financial and legal problems for a number of years, and Arby's has obviously done well in that time."  Mr. Franklin acknowledged that the franchisees had some legitimate concerns.  Capital, he said, could be diverted away from Arby's if problems worsen for DWG and Mr. Posner.  But "the downside to being franchisee-owned right now is the effect of the additional debt on Arby's growth," Mr. Franklin said.  He said efforts such as this year's new and more aggressive advertising and marketing campaign, which challenges the bigger and better-known burger chains, could run short of funds as the company seeks to service its debt.  R.B. Partners said it has lined up financing for the proposed transaction and would offer Arby's top management "long-term" employment contracts and an equity interest in the company.  Officials at Arby's itself declined to comment on the offer.  Swiss Bank Corp., the country's No. 2 commercial bank, said it will assume full ownership at the beginning of 1990 of a small Swiss bank, Walliser Ersparniskasse, in which it has an 88% position.  The stock-swap transaction is valued at about 12 million Swiss francs ($7.18 million), according to a spokesman.  Swiss Bank said Walliser, which has assets of 1.38 billion francs ($826.1 million), is too small to fund needed investments on its own.  France's retail price index rose 0.3% in July from June and was up 3.5% from a year earlier, according to final data published by the National Statistics Institute.  The increase, which confirms the government's preliminary data, leaves the index at 178.2, compared with 177.7 in June, 172.2 in July 1988 and 100 in 1980.  Michaels Stores Inc., which owns and operates a chain of specialty retail stores, said its August sales rose 21% to $18.5 million from $15.3 million a year earlier.  Sales in stores open at least a year increased 13% to $17.3 million from $15.3 million.  David Shulman, an analyst for Salomon Brothers, figures that the end of the Cold War would slice $100 billion from the annual defense budget, lift the dollar, cut interest rates, reduce the budget deficit and liberate enough defense-industry brainpower to make U.S. products more competitive overseas.  Barry Blechman, an arms-control expert at the Johns Hopkins Foreign Policy Institute, says that's just flat wrong.  The largest conceivable cuts in nuclear, conventional and naval forces over the next 10 years, he calculates, would yield, at best, $60 billion -- and more likely a small fraction of that.  The Pentagon, he says, would adopt expensive alternatives that would eat up the savings from arms control.  Remember the "missile gap" of the 1960s?  Welcome to the analysis gap of the 1990s.  While Soviet leader Mikhail Gorbachev appears to have a plan, experts in the West are in the midst of a free-for-all over the tricky, seldom-explored questions of the social, economic and political costs of gearing down for peace.  "There is no place in NATO {the North Atlantic Treaty Organization} that thinks about the post-arms-control environment," despairs Uwe Nerlich, director of research for West Germany's Foundation for Science and Politics.  "We have left it to the left wing and the Russians to do that."  The West's side of the puzzle, according to Mr. Nerlich, is more difficult because businessmen and politicians are running way ahead of events.  It is months, if not years, before the first conventional-arms deal, yet the U.S. defense industry is already in the midst of rapid shrinkage, and defense budgets in the U.S. and Europe are under siege.  Most analysts do agree on one point: The economic impact of the defense-industry shakeout will be severe.  A study by Washington's Center for Strategic and International Studies says 80,000 U.S. companies, most of them small or middle-sized, have dropped out of the defense business over a five-year period.  A follow-up survey of 41 top defense contractors by the center shows that almost half are planning to switch more of their production effort into civilian goods.  Ninety percent of the companies blamed the declining defense budget.  The Bush administration's efforts to accelerate the pace of the conventional-arms talks in Vienna mean that answers must soon be found for a number of knotty "peace" questions currently under dispute among the experts.  Here are some other examples:  Question: How should the government manage the decline of the defense industry?  "There is going to be a lot of political maneuvering," says Robert Costello, former undersecretary of defense for acquisition, "because you're going to wind up with somebody in DOD {the Department of Defense} to decide which company goes out of business."  The politics will pit one region against another.  For example, Mr. Shulman and William Kaufmann, an analyst for Washington's Brookings Institution, agree that there could be regional depressions in places like Southern California, Massachusetts, Texas, northern Virginia and other places where the defense industry is clustered.  Mr. Shulman asserts that the impending fallout of skilled technicians and scientists from the defense industry will be a boon to companies in other areas, such as in Iowa, Wisconsin and Illinois.  The influx of talent, he says, will lead to better civilian goods that can sell abroad.  Mr. Kaufmann, though, says that "is probably a myth."  "You don't convert a guy from a defense job automatically into being a marvelous designer of refrigerators," he says.  "I know of no thought being given to how you would make use of these allegedly multitalented people from defense industries."  The Defense Department, Mr. Kaufmann says, must intervene to protect key parts of the defense industry from being dismantled, especially its high-technology and research-and-development components.  "This can't be left entirely up to the market."  John Lehman, former Navy secretary, says that "is baloney," adding, "I don't buy the argument that the Pentagon's role is to preserve the industrial base."  Mr. Lehman predicts that "you're going to see a lot of companies close, merge or peel off divisions."  Mr. Lehman has seen the problem from peculiar vantage points.  He led the Reagan-era defense buildup by promoting the 600-ship Navy.  Now he is managing director for corporate financing at PaineWebber, where he hopes to be in the middle of many defense-industry mergers.  Question: What is the best way to handle the costs of bringing troops home?  Mr. Lehman says the best way is to convert as much as one-third of active forces into reserve forces, a move that many politicians in Washington see as inevitable.  The cost of withdrawing U.S. troops stationed in Europe -- where they often live in subsidized facilities -- and building new bases for them here will run into the billions; hence the lure of cycling units into the reserves.  Such a restructuring would mean, over time, that any succeeding war would be much different from Vietnam.  It would mean that to fight, a post-arms-control Army would have to mobilize the butcher, the baker and, perhaps, even the girl next door.  This thought makes some experts queasy.  "The problem with the guard and reserve is that if you say anything bad about them you are accused of being unpatriotic," says Lawrence Korb, a former assistant secretary of defense for manpower and reserve affairs.  "The fact is that their level of aptitude across the board is not as good as it should be.  The modern Army has some fairly sophisticated things to work with.  This is no longer a job for Willie and Joe and the Doughboys."  "What you would get is lower capability and lower readiness for less cost," asserts Robert Pirie, an analyst for Rand Corp., who also formerly dealt with reserve matters in the Pentagon.  Question: What will a U.S. soldier fight with in the new era of the 1990s?  Gen. Edward Meyer, a former Army chief of staff, believes that instead of buying more aircraft and tanks that will be increasingly costly, the services should use this period of uncertainty to invest in robot tanks, high-technology unmanned aircraft and more-sophisticated electronics.  The result would be lighter, cheaper, more-capable weapons, says Gen. Meyer.  "All of these areas are going to have a tremendous impact on what the {nation's military} force will look like in the year 2000," he says.  "So there is a big business out there for industry."  John O'Brien, chairman of Grumman Corp., says Gen. Meyer's vision is improbable.  "I don't think we'll get there in my lifetime."  In a future war, Mr. O'Brien believes, the Navy will rely heavily on F-14D fighters that will be made by Grumman.  The saga of the F-14D is a signal that Congress may not be ready for any new era.  Under heavy pressure from lobbyists, the House ignored the Bush administration's effort to kill the program.  Unlike weapons of an earlier era, which were often made in one or two plants, the $45 million to $75 million fighter (depending on how many are purchased) is a flying national public-works project.  Pieces of it, according to Grumman, are made in 49 of the 50 states.  Norman Augustine, chairman of Martin Marietta Corp. and a former Pentagon official, worries about what will happen if this process continues.  If the price of new fighter planes continues to increase by a factor of four each decade, he says the Pentagon will have to further shrink the size of its air units.  Mr. Augustine says one way to stop the phenomenon from unilaterally disarming the Pentagon will be to upgrade older airplanes, which may have to fly 30 years or longer.  Martin Marietta manufactures electronics and other systems that can be fitted on older aircraft.  Question: Which military service will get the biggest budget in a post-arms-control world?  Geoffrey Bentley, head of the defense-market forecasting committee for the Electronic Industries Association, says it has to be the Navy, which will need more ships to carry military equipment back to Europe in the event of a crisis.  "If you want to buy a stock for widows and orphans, it's the Navy," he asserts.  It's the Army, says Phillip Karber, senior vice president for BDM Corp.  The "enforcer" of any agreement that withdraws troops and weapons from Europe will be the U.S. Army, he argues.  The Army must be able to reinforce Europe quickly in time of a crisis.  Fast ships crossing the Atlantic might be safer if they went individually, rather than in protected World War II convoys, he reasons, especially if the Soviet Union decides to scrap much of its navy.  Since the U.S. Navy has traditionally focused its budget on warships and not on ships to carry men and equipment, Mr. Karber suggests that the Pentagon could set up a new agency to lease such transports.  Meanwhile, he says, the Navy's budgets would be eaten up by expensive maintenance bills for the idle warships.  ---  @ Shrinkage of U.S. Defense Industry  @ Number of weapon suppliers  @ 1982 1986  @ Ground Vehicles 3,497 1,280  @ Ships 2,602 488  @ Aerospace 17,907 3,550  @ Ordnance 5,601 2,663  @ Source: Center for Strategic & International Studies.  France's Socialist government plans to cut taxes on business next year, despite complaints from Socialist Party members that the government is doing too much for the rich.  The planned tax cuts are part of the government's effort to draw up a budget for calendar 1990 that pleases both the rich and the poor.  To help the poor, Finance Minister Pierre Beregovoy said he hopes to do away with the value added tax on medicine and to limit local taxes on low-income families.  The government also plans to reduce taxes on investment income, which it calls income from savings.  And to please the left, it is considering raising the tax on accumulated wealth, which hits France's 125,000 richest people.  At the same time, Mr. Beregovoy said, he hopes to further reduce the tax on corporate profit that is reinvested, as well as to cut the top value added tax rate, currently 28%, which primarily affects automobiles.  Personal income taxes, which in France account for only 12% of government revenue, aren't to be changed.  Neither are the charges that employers and employees pay for medical care and retirement income.  Those charges and the value added tax are the major sources of government revenue.  The business tax cuts are to be among the most modest changes.  Overall, Mr. Beregovoy said, tax cuts will cost the government about 15 billion francs ($2.3 billion) next year, compared with total expected revenue of more than 1.1 trillion francs ($168.7 billion).  Sources say the tax cut for business isn't likely to exceed about 1.5 billion francs, or about 10% of the total cuts.  A year ago, the government cut the tax on reinvested business profit for the current year to 39% from 42%.  Sources say it isn't likely to be cut much below 38% next year.  The tax on profit that isn't invested remains at 42%.  The cut in business taxes is aimed at helping companies build capacity, in view of their apparent inability to meet French domestic demand.  France's trade deficit in July was the highest since last August, mostly because of a rise in imports of manufactured goods.  Officials figure that if French businesses were expanding output more rapidly, the trade deficit could be cut.  But the proposed business tax cut hasn't won much applause from either right or left.  French business leaders and the right-wing opposition complain that from an economic point of view it would be more effective to cut business taxes across the board, rather than just on reinvested income.  "That may be true," one government official says privately, "but in the current political climate it would be impossible."  Socialist Party leaders have publicly said they don't see the need for further business tax cuts and have called on the government to do more to distribute wealth more fairly.  Critics of the proposals point out that the biggest tax break will be the reduction of the top value added tax rate.  The cut to 25% from 28% is expected to cost the government more than six billion francs, while officials say the cut in taxes on medicine will reduce government revenue by only about one billion francs.  Despite the tax cuts and a planned government spending increase next year, officials hope to narrow the budget deficit to 90 billion francs from a projected 100 billion francs this year.  They can do that, they say, because strong economic growth will boost the tax base, bringing increased revenue even as tax rates go down.  Growth in France's gross domestic product slowed to 0.7% in the second quarter of 1989 from 1.3% in the first three months, the National Statistics Institute said.  The state-run institute said that if the economy kept expanding at its latest pace, growth for the full year would be 3%, compared with 3.8% in 1988.  Industrial production showed an increase of 0.4% in the second quarter, the institute said, pulled higher by a 2.4% gain in the capital goods sector.  Production in the consumer goods industries was nearly flat, rising 0.2%, and output in the intermediate-goods sector fell 1.1%.  Money Market Deposits-a 6.26%  Super-NOW Accounts-a 5.05%  Six-month Certificates-a 8.06%  One-year Certificates-a 8.05%  Thirty-month Accounts-a 7.96%  Five-Year Certificates-a 7.95%  U.S. Savings Bonds-b 7.81%  a-Average rate paid yesterday by 100 large banks and thrifts in the 10 largest metropolitan areas as compiled by Bank Rate Monitor.  b-Current annual yield.  Guaranteed minimum 6%.  Data General Corp. said it obtained a license to use Hewlett-Packard Co.'s NewWave program-interface software.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Data General will use the NewWave graphical interface in office-automation products expected this fall.  Not all European jet-setters receive the kind of welcome Phillippe Junot encountered during a recent visit here.  Thank goodness, says his Dallas attorney, George Milner.  "What happened to Phillippe shouldn't happen to any one," he says.  Not all European jet-setters had dealings with the Texas thrift industry in its highflying -- and often, fraudulent -- days.  And that involvement led to an uncomfortable two weeks for Mr. Junot, best known for his brief marriage to Princess Caroline of Monaco.  Mr. Junot was greeted at a Dallas wedding reception earlier this month by seven Federal Bureau of Investigation agents assigned to the Dallas Bank Fraud Task Force.  They had a warrant for his arrest as a material witness in the long-running investigation of lending practices at the defunct Vernon Savings & Loan Association, according to a tape recording of Mr. Junot's detention hearing.  Specifically, Mr. Junot was wanted for questioning about Vernon's $6.8 million financing of the purchase and renovation of New York's Bon Vivant restaurant, in which he held an unspecified interest, according to FBI agent Dale Hogue, who testified at the Aug. 14 detention hearing.  Mr. Hogue, who emphasized that Mr. Junot is not a suspect in any wrongdoing, said he also wanted to question Mr. Junot about his consulting work for Vernon, his personal contacts with former Vernon Chairman Don Dixon and the possibility that Mr. Dixon sent assets to Europe.  The episode was the latest twist in the task force's two-year investigation of Vernon Savings, one of the largest thrifts to fail in the Texas savings and loan debacle.  The task force has been criticized for its slowness in obtaining an indictment against Mr. Dixon, one of the most flamboyant and free-spending of the old Texas thrift executives.  Mr. Dixon met Mr. Junot in Europe in 1983, when Mr. Dixon was looking to expand Vernon's horizons.  "It was part of his {Mr.  Dixon's} dream to be international," said Mr. Dixon's criminal defense lawyer, William Ravkind of Dallas.  While Mr. Junot, who maintains residences in Paris and Marbella, Spain, apparently was paid by Vernon for some consulting work, he also attempted to collect reimbursement for expenses after Vernon was placed under the supervision of the Texas Savings and Loan Department in September 1986.  He was rebuffed by the state's agent.  Mr. Junot, who testified that he would have appeared voluntarily as a witness, spent 36 hours in FBI custody before his detention hearing, at which task-force prosecutors asked that he be required to post a $1 million cash bond to remain free.  "I understand that this savings and loan scandal may be the biggest thing that ever happened in their lives, but this is too much," said Mr. Ravkind of the bond request.  U.S. Magistrate John B. Tolle agreed, declining to set any bond and releasing Mr. Junot on his personal recognizance.  "No one's ever requested a bond of that size for a material witness in the 10 years I've been on the bench," the magistrate said.  The task force's Robert Hauberg Jr., who is currently prosecuting Vernon's former president, refused to comment on the matter.  A spokesman for the U.S. Justice Department in Washington said there would be no comment on behalf of either the task force or the FBI.  Apparently, the task force didn't want to take any chance that they would lose their witness, although their pursuit of Mr. Junot wasn't exactly relentless.  Mr. Junot said Mr. Dixon informed him about seven months ago that the FBI might want to talk to him.  But he said he was never contacted by the agency until the seven agents met him in the lobby of The Mansion, a Dallas hotel.  Mr. Junot had just come from his friend's wedding, where he served as best man.  "I thought it was very strange but that that might be the way it is," Mr. Junot said of the arrest.  Agent Hogue, who was in the group at The Mansion, acknowledged that he never made an effort to reach Mr. Junot directly although he conceded that Mr. Junot was "very well known" in Europe and probably not all that hard to find.  "I was instructed by my office in Washington and in Paris that we could not contact Mr. Junot personally because the French government would not allow us," Mr. Hogue testified.  After the arrest, Mr. Milner persuaded the agents and federal prosecutors not to lock up his client in the federal penitentiary in Fort Worth.  As a compromise, Mr. Junot gave up his room at The Mansion and checked into the Residence Inn with a couple of the FBI agents.  Mr. Junot left Dallas last week after testifying before a federal grand jury and spending 20 hours being questioned by attorneys for the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corp. in a civil lawsuit against Vernon's former officers.  Mr. Milner said his client harbors no harsh feelings toward the FBI.  "He was hurt but he's not the kind who's going to waste any time on bitterness," Mr. Milner said.  CMS Energy Corp.'s Consumers Power Co. unit said it will refund a total of $36.7 million to Michigan gas customers under a settlement with the Michigan Public Service Commission.  In addition, the settlement reduces by $24 million the cost of Michigan natural gas Consumers Power will buy from suppliers between now and 1991.  The savings will be passed on to the utility's gas customers, a company spokesman said.  After a nine week trial, Leona Helmsley, Manhattan's self-proclaimed hotel queen, was convicted of 33 counts of conspiring to defraud the U.S., tax evasion, filing false tax returns and mail fraud.  Mrs. Helmsley, 69 years old, listened stoically as the verdict was read.  She was acquitted of the most serious charge, conspiring to commit extortion, and of seven counts of mail fraud.  Mrs. Helmsley wouldn't answer questions from reporters after the verdict.  As she left the federal courthouse, where about 400 people waited outside, she tossed her jacket to a bodyguard and walked down the steps to a waiting car.  The jury also convicted Mrs. Helmsley's two co-defendants, former Helmsley employees Frank J. Turco and Joseph V. Licari, on 33 counts of conspiring to defraud the U.S., mail fraud, and aiding Mrs. Helmsley in tax evasion and the filing of false returns.  The government charged that the two men were instrumental in helping Mrs. Helmsley and her husband, Harry, cheat the U.S. out of $1.2 million in personal income taxes from 1983 through 1985.  Mr. Turco also was acquitted of conspiring to commit extortion.  In addition, the two men were acquitted of seven counts of mail fraud.  The charges stemmed from the fraudulent billing of millions of dollars in personal expenses -- mainly for work on the Helmsley's Connecticut estate -- to Helmsley companies.  The prosecutors charged that the fraud also allowed the companies to lower their taxes because the personal charges were deducted as business expenses.  Mr. Helmsley was named as a defendant in the case, but U.S. Judge John M. Walker found that the 80-year-old real-estate magnate was mentally unfit to stand trial.  Sentencing is scheduled for Nov. 14.  Because the crimes occurred before November 1987, Mrs. Helmsley won't face mandatory jail time under the new federal sentencing guidelines.  Many judges, however, stay close to the guidelines even for such cases, known as "old law" cases.  If Judge Walker applies the guidelines to Mrs. Helmsley's case, she would face a sentence of 21 to 27 months based on the crimes committed and the taxes evaded, said Benson B. Weintraub, a Miami criminal defense lawyer, who is chairman of the sentencing committee of the National Association of Criminal Defense Lawyers.  But, Mr. Weintraub said, "In white-collar crime cases, I have noted a tendency of judges ruling in old-law cases to apply less severe sentences than those prescribed under the guidelines."  Mr. Weintraub said a judge's sentencing decision in high-profile cases like Mrs. Helmsley's "ultimately comes down to a matter of public perception and whether the judge perceives a need to demonstrate a greater general deterrence principle."  If sentenced to jail, Mrs. Helmsley would likely serve time in one of a few federal minimum-security prison camps for women.  The two closest to New York City are in Alderson, W.Va., and Danbury, Conn.  Greg Bogdan, a spokesman for the federal Bureau of Prisons, said that in assigning convicts to a prison, "we do try to keep individuals as near to their release destination and their family as possible."  The prison camps at Alderson and Danbury have no fences and have recreation areas and educational programs.  Mr. Bogdan said the camp at Alderson offers business education and business mathematics courses.  Mrs. Helmsley, president of Helmsley Hotels Inc., also faces a maximum fine of about $7 million.  A separate lawsuit against Mrs. Helmsley and her husband is pending in New York state court alleging state tax violations.  And the Internal Revenue Service could file a civil suit seeking payment of the federal taxes owed plus interest and penalties.  Mrs. Helmsley's attorney, Gerald Feffer, wouldn't comment on the verdict except to say that it will be appealed.  Appeals also are planned by attorneys for Mr. Turco, who was Mrs. Helmsley's right-hand man at the hotel company, and Mr. Licari, formerly chief financial officer of Helmsley Enterprises Inc., the hotel company's parent.  U.S. Attorney Benito Romano, whose office prosecuted the case, said, "The verdict will encourage compliance by other taxpayers. . . .  We are out there vigorously enforcing the tax laws."  He added that the case "should discourage the cynicism shared by many that the rich are above the law."  U.S. officials said there were no efforts to settle the case before trial.  Jurors apparently rejected the defense's claim that the falsified bills were simply a way to circumvent the difficult Mrs. Helmsley, rather than a scheme to avoid taxes.  Mr. Feffer had argued that the fake bills were the only way to get many of the expenses for the Connecticut estate paid, because Mrs. Helmsley was displeased with much of the work.  Mr. Feffer also claimed that the Helmsleys honestly believed that their companies could deduct many of the personal expenses.  Wednesday, August 30, 1989  The key U.S. and foreign annual interest rates below are a guide to general levels but don't always represent actual transactions.  PRIME RATE: 10 1/2%.  The base rate on corporate loans at large U.S. money center commercial banks.  FEDERAL FUNDS: 8 15/16% high, 8 13/16% low, 8 13/ 16% near closing bid, 8 7/8% offered.  Reserves traded among commercial banks for overnight use in amounts of $1 million or more.  Source: Fulton Prebon (U.S.A.) Inc.  DISCOUNT RATE: 7%.  The charge on loans to depository institutions by the New York Federal Reserve Bank.  CALL MONEY: 9 3/4% to 10%.  The charge on loans to brokers on stock exchange collateral.  COMMERCIAL PAPER placed directly by General Motors Acceptance Corp.: 8.775% 30 to 44 days; 8.75% 45 to 59 days; 8.50% 60 to 89 days; 8.25% 90 to 119 days; 8.125% 120 to 149 days; 8% 150 to 179 days; 7.625% 180 to 270 days.  COMMERCIAL PAPER: High-grade unsecured notes sold through dealers by major corporations in multiples of $1,000: 8.90% 30 days; 8.80% 60 days; 8.70% 90 days.  CERTIFICATES OF DEPOSIT: 8.33% one month; 8.32% two months; 8.30% three months; 8.27% six months; 8.26% one year.  Average of top rates paid by major New York banks on primary new issues of negotiable C.D.s, usually on amounts of $1 million and more.  The minimum unit is $100,000.  Typical rates in the secondary market: 8.85% one month; 8.80% three months; 8.80% six months.  BANKERS ACCEPTANCES: 8.79% 30 days; 8.70% 60 days; 8.60% 90 days; 8.51% 120 days; 8.45% 150 days; 8.38% 180 days.  Negotiable, bank-backed business credit instruments typically financing an import order.  LONDON LATE EURODOLLARS: 9% to 8 7/8% one month; 9% to 8 7/8% two months; 9% to 8 7/8% three months; 9% to 8 7/8% four months; 9% to 8 7/8% five months; 9% to 8 7/8% six months.  LONDON INTERBANK OFFERED RATES (LIBOR): 9 1/16% one month; 9% three months; 9% six months; 8 15/16% one year.  The average of interbank offered rates for dollar deposits in the London market based on quotations at five major banks.  FOREIGN PRIME RATES: Canada 13.50%; Germany 8.50%; Japan 4.875%; Switzerland 8.50%; Britain 14%.  These rate indications aren't directly comparable; lending practices vary widely by location.  TREASURY BILLS: Results of the Monday, August 28, 1989, auction of short-term U.S. government bills, sold at a discount from face value in units of $10,000 to $1 million: 7.94% 13 weeks; 7.88% 26 weeks.  FEDERAL HOME LOAN MORTGAGE CORP. (Freddie Mac): Posted yields on 30-year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days. 10.19%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.625%, 2% rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  FEDERAL NATIONAL MORTGAGE ASSOCIATION (Fannie Mae): Posted yields on 30 year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days (priced at par) 10.14%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 9.15%, 6/2 rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  MERRILL LYNCH READY ASSETS TRUST: 7.98%.  Annualized average rate of return after expenses for the past 30 days; not a forecast of future returns.  DONALD C. MCVEARRY was named a senior vice president of James Madison Ltd.  His title was misstated in yesterday's edition.  (See: "Who's News: James Madison Ltd." -- WSJ Aug. 30, 1989)  In a burst of ethnic pride, Cuban-Americans surged to the polls in Miami on Tuesday to elect Ileana Ros-Lehtinen, a conservative Republican, to the congressional seat held for 26 years by the late Claude Pepper, a liberal Democrat.  Mrs. Ros-Lehtinen's victory over Democrat Gerald Richman represents the coming of political age of South Florida's Cuban-American community, a conservative enclave composed largely of prosperous voters who fled their native land after Fidel Castro came to power.  The 37-year-old Mrs. Ros-Lehtinen, who was born in Havana, defeated Mr. Richman, 48, a Miami lawyer, by 53% to 47% in a bitterly fought race that pitted Mrs. Ros-Lehtinen's Little Havana constituency against Mr. Richman's Jewish constituency centered in Miami Beach.  Both candidates were criticized for urging voters to cast their ballots along ethnic lines.  Mrs. Ros-Lehtinen, who will become the country's first Cuban-American member of Congress, faces re-election in 14 months, and Mr. Richman said he might run against her again.  The battle over stock "basket" investment vehicles goes on.  The Philadelphia Stock Exchange filed a new proposal with the Securities and Exchange Commission that it said will "make clear" that its new basket product is a security, not a futures instrument.  About two weeks ago, a federal appeals court in Chicago invalidated the three-month-old basket products of both the Philadelphia exchange and the American Stock Exchange.  Ruling on a suit brought by the Chicago futures exchanges, the court declared that the products, which allow investors to trade the equivalent of a portfolio of stocks, in some ways like a stock-index futures contract, were futures rather than securities.  Thus, the SEC shouldn't have approved them, the court said.  Because of that court ruling, the two exchanges by the end of next month will have to shut down their basket trading, which began in May.  The Philadelphia exchange's revised proposal for so-called Cash Index Participation, or CIP, shares will allow investors to "cash out" their positions at any time and without penalty.  This and other changes will establish CIPs as securities rather than futures, the exchange claims.  Maybe, but the Chicago futures exchanges that sued because of the initial baskets are expected to go to court once again to try to block the new proposal, if the SEC approves it.  Litigation of the initial proposals goes on, as well, with an appeal to the U.S. Supreme Court expected.  A Chicago Board of Trade spokesman said it was too early to comment on the Philadelphia exchange's new proposal.  Meanwhile, the American exchange seems to be taking a different tack than the Philadelphia exchange in the basket battle.  Instead of tinkering with its Equity Index Participation product, the Amex says it is working on "completely new alternatives" that may serve the same purpose.  Amex officials wouldn't be specific, but said they will have an announcement in a few weeks.  Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. is shaking up its top management amid signs of strain at the embattled Wall Street securities firm.  The new appointments signal the rise of several young Drexel managers who face the difficult task of shoring up the firm's battered image.  The changes also represent an attempt by Drexel to install stronger controls over its global securities business.  Drexel, in a statement, said the moves "will further strengthen the firm for the competitive climate Drexel anticipates for the 1990s and represent a natural extension of the broad restructuring the firm implemented in April."  Last April, Drexel agreed to a settlement of Securities and Exchange Commission civil charges that will give federal regulators an unprecedented amount of control over the firm's securities operations.  The accord settled a complaint charging Drexel with numerous securities-law violations in connection with 18 corporate takeovers between 1984 and 1986.  It followed Drexel's agreement with the government last December to plead guilty to six felonies.  Drexel said the latest management changes "had absolutely nothing to do with the government's investigation."  A casualty of the management shake-up is Edwin Kantor, Drexel's vice chairman who joined the firm in 1955.  Mr. Kantor, who was responsible for all of Drexel's trading operations, including its highly profitable junk bond division in Beverly Hills, Calif., is considering resigning, people familiar with the situation said.  Mr. Kantor sought the promotion of two younger proteges on the assumption that he, too, would be promoted.  Instead, his proteges wound up with major segments of his old job, leaving him with a more ceremonial position, people familiar with the situation said.  "There's a 50-50 chance Kantor will resign," said a person with knowledge of the situation.  Frederick Joseph, Drexel's chief executive, who is responsible for the executive changes, declined to comment.  Drexel said Mr. Kantor was unavailable.  The government's investigation of Drexel and its former chief of junk bonds, Michael Milken, left Mr. Kantor particularly vulnerable to criticism.  In March, Mr. Milken was indicted on 98 counts alleging racketeering and securities fraud.  Mr. Milken, who earned as much as $550 million a year, reported to Mr. Kantor during the 1980s.  Mr. Kantor hoped to be named Drexel's president, succeeding Joseph A. Vitanza, who recently turned 65 years old and who is retiring at the end of the year, people familiar with the situation said.  Instead, Mr. Joseph selected Howard M. Brenner, 56, a senior executive vice president in charge of the firm's administration, as the new president.  Mr. Brenner joined Drexel in 1963.  Two younger executives, who Mr. Kantor sponsored for promotions, now will assume control of most of Mr. Kantor's responsibilities:  Arthur Kirsch, 37, was appointed an executive vice president and named head of institutional equity sales, trading and research, both in the U.S. and internationally.  Mr. Kirsch joined Drexel in 1979.  Richard L. Sandor, 47, was named an executive vice president and head of fixed income trading, including financial futures and options, mortgage-backed securities and international fixed income.  Mr. Sandor, who is considered one of the founders of the interest rate futures market, joined Drexel in 1982.  In other moves, Burton M. Siegel, 54, succeeds Thomas H. Lovell Jr. as chairman of Drexel Burnham Lambert International and the firm's principal officer in international business.  Mr. Lovell is returning to an unspecified assignment at Drexel in the U.S. Mr. Siegel joined Drexel in 1978.  Stephen L. Joseph, 46, an executive vice president, was named head of a newly created commercial real estate department.  Mr. Joseph, who is the brother of Drexel's chief executive, joined Drexel in 1984 from Salomon Brothers Inc., where he helped create Salomon's mortgage-backed securities department.  Thomas K. Guba, 39, succeeds Mr. Joseph as head of mortgage-backed securities at Drexel.  In London, Mark Fox-Andrews, 36, a managing director, was named manager of the London office.  Mr. Fox-Andrews joined Drexel's London futures division in 1977 and had been responsible for the firm's London futures brokerage business.  Geoffrey D. Cheatham was elected vice president and treasurer of this supplier of medical devices and diagnostic systems.  He had been assistant treasurer, domestic operations.  Robert A. Reynolds, who recently was named vice president of finance and controller, had held the duties.  Detecting the Signs  Of Workaholic Behavior  WITH MANY managers routinely putting in 60 hour work weeks, it may seem hard for them to know when they've crossed the line from simply working hard to the unhealthy obsession of workaholism.  But experts say there are clear warning signs.  Workaholics crave work like an addictive drug and can't seem to do without it.  "They'll be thinking about an assignment while playing golf on Saturday or take mental notes about the office while at a party," says Mortimer Feinberg, chairman of BFS Psychological Associates, a New York consultant.  Unlike the most effective executives, they haven't learned "to live in air-tight compartments of time, with some space reserved for leisure," he adds.  At the same time, work doesn't satisfy workaholics.  "They're not energized by it because what's driving them is the need to avoid something," says Beverly A. Potter, a Berkeley, Calif., organizational psychologist and author of "Preventing Job Burnout."  "Maybe they're in a lousy marriage they can't face," she adds, "or are frightened of failure at their company."  Once workaholism sets in, it progresses through stages similar to those in alcoholism and drug addiction.  Among these: increased tolerance for more and more work, a feeling that "you can't stop," and anger and other withdrawal symptoms while away from work.  Workaholics also tend to deny their addiction.  "You ask them if their round-the-clock schedules are a problem for them or their families and they insist 'everything's fine,'" says Marjorie Hansen Shaevitz, director of the Institute for Family and Work Relationships in La Jolla, Calif.  Job Searches Lengthen,  But Pay Grows, Too  OUT-OF-WORK executives can expect to spend more time looking for new jobs this year.  But when they finally do land positions, they can count on higher total compensation.  The average time to find a new executive job rose to 5.9 months this year from 5.1 months in 1988, according to a Drake Beam Morin survey of some 1,500 clients looking for work.  But total compensation rose almost 9% to $82,440 in 1989 from $75,978 last year.  The brightest spots in the executive job market were marketing and sales, where the number of positions increased 5% and total pay scales rose 10%.  But opportunities in general management, finance and accounting declined.  And the average search time for a corporate staff position increased to 7.3 months, from 5.3 months last year.  Women managers found jobs faster than men (an average 5.2 months vs. six months).  They were behind in pay, though.  Their total compensation in new jobs was 26% lower than men's -- $63,339 compared with $86,134.  For both sexes, the old-boy network remains crucial to a job search.  Some 64% of the managers surveyed said they landed a new job through a personal contact.  Another 12% -- the next largest category -- found positions through a search firm, while 11% answered an ad.  CEOs Are Out of Touch  With Subordinates  NO WONDER so many chief executives complain that it's lonely at the top.  Isolated in executive suites, they not only are unaware of what other managers think, but they also aren't being heard themselves.  A new Forum Corp. survey of 611 executives at Fortune 500 companies shows a significant gap between what chief executives consider "extremely important" to their companies and what lower-ranking executives think.  For example, 92% of the CEOs polled rated "quality of customer service" extremely important, compared with 83% of vice presidents.  CEOs also placed more importance than subordinates on employee productivity and employee satisfaction.  Conversely, CEOs were far less likely to be concerned with immediate financial results (51% rated them "extremely important," compared with 70% of vice presidents), and financial community perceptions (43% vs. 55%).  Yet many CEOs have little idea they aren't making themselves heard.  A full 82% believe their strategy is "clearly understood to a great extent by everyone who needs to know."  But only 68% of chief operating officers and 76% of vice presidents agreed with that assessment.  ---  @ Ranking Priorities  @ CHIEF  @ OPERATING  @ CEO OFFICER VP  @ Quality of customer service 92% 87% 83%  @ Long-term growth 85 79 78  @ Employee productivity 79 77 70  @ Immediate financial results 51 69 70  @ Employee satifaction 65 61 54  @ Source: Forum Corp., Boston, Mass.  Coats May Be Optional,  But Never Go Tieless  WHETHER a male manager chooses pin stripes or checks is a matter of personal taste, but one dress-for-success rule is sacrosanct: Never forget your tie.  Sixty-nine percent of the personnel directors at 100 Fortune 1000 companies agree "it's never acceptable" not to wear a tie at work, according to a survey by Robert Half International, an executive-search firm.  By contrast, forgoing a jacket is often fine.  Some 35% agree it's "generally acceptable," and another 36% believe shirt sleeves alone are enough "except when meeting with visitors."  In another sign that the economy continues to perform at a healthy pace, the government said Americans' personal income and spending grew solidly in July.  Income and spending both increased 0.7%, the Commerce Department reported, their biggest gains in the past few months.  The July gains follow revised increases of 0.5% in personal income and 0.2% in personal spending in June.  The new report came a day after the government sharply revised its calculation of the economy's growth in the second quarter, largely because federal analysts found increases in consumer spending to be double their original estimate.  Consequently, the new statistics on income growth and spending "certainly tell us that anybody who had some negative numbers for the second quarter or thought that this quarter might be the beginning of a recession might be premature," said Stuart Hoffman, chief financial economist at PNC Financial Corp. in Pittsburgh.  The new report showed that purchases rose across a spectrum of goods and services in July.  At the same time, because of the larger income gain, the nation's savings rate stayed at 5.7% of disposable income, fairly high for recent years.  Overall, personal income expanded to a $4.449 trillion annual rate, while personal spending -- which includes everything but interest payments on debt -- increased to a $3.482 trillion rate.  Income from wages and salaries shot up 1.0%.  "At least on the face of it, the income gains in July kept consumers above the inflation rate," Mr. Hoffman noted.  As with a string of recent indicators, these numbers were revised upward to show greater strength than the government initially reported.  Originally, the department said personal income grew only 0.3% in June, while personal spending was unchanged.  All numbers were adjusted for seasonal fluctuations.  After adjusting to remove the effects of inflation, personal spending grew 0.5% in July and O.1% in June.  ---  Here is the Commerce Department's latest report on personal income.  The figures are at seasonally adjusted annual rates in trillions of dollars.  @ July June  @ 1989 1989  @ Personal income ............... 4.449 4.416  @ Wages and salaries .......... 2.647 2.621  @ Factory payrolls ............ 0.553 0.552  @ Transfer payments ........... 0.634 0.631  @ Disposable personal income .... 3.804 3.776  @ Personal outlays .............. 3.587 3.560  @ Consumption expenditures .... 3.482 3.457  @ Other outlays ............... 0.104 0.104  @ Personal saving ............... 0.218 0.216  Jim Marchessault, a harried printing firm executive, treasures a cartoon he keeps in his desk.  It shows a king striding off to battle, clutching his sword, unwilling even to glance at the useful-looking machine gun sitting next to him.  "I can't be bothered," the king says.  "We've got a battle to fight]"  Mr. Marchessault had much the same problem in his own little kingdom, Business Card Service Inc. of Burnsville, Minn.  "I was up to my armpits filling orders, tracking mistakes, keeping files and was buried in manual paper work," says Mr. Marchessault, the 36-year-old vice president of the company.  But the cartoon made him decide that Business Card Service, with $2.5 million in annual sales, had no choice but to try something different.  "We were already working 60 or 70 hours a week, so a few more hours taken to get new ideas couldn't hurt any more," he says.  The company installed a $650,000 computer system that sharply cuts the time it takes to fill orders, reduces paper work and eliminates printing errors.  Innovation, always difficult for any business, is especially hard to accomplish at smaller firms.  Whether it's the need for a new product, a new manufacturing process, a new group of customers, or just a new computer, such long-range projects tend to get pushed aside by the crisis of the moment.  Too bad.  "Small-business managers often get so tied up in keeping up with daily problems that they lose track of the bigger picture," says Richard Dwyer, a consulting partner with Ernst & Young, a major accounting firm.  "That's a big mistake because they're giving away their future."  The people who diagnose small-business problems for a living say that failure to innovate can be a killer.  Companies can "die from psycho-sclerosis or malignant status-quoism, both of which harden attitudes to new ideas," says Austin Pryor, Ernst & Young's national director of innovation services.  The problem afflicts companies large and small, but usually comes into public view only when the failure to innovate occurs on a grand scale -- as in the case of Western Union Corp., which continues in the outdated business of telegrams long after other forms of communication have bypassed them.  The most difficult task is carving out time for the big project.  Easier said than done, of course.  But doing it has made a big difference for many companies.  For example, Basler Electric Co., a closely held company in Highland, Ill., found that a division selling electrical relays to utilities was drowning in paper work.  "It was a full-time effort doing the marketing mailings to 15,000 potential customers," says Malcolm Swanson, the division's general manager.  So three years ago Basler handed over the work to an outside firm, ADH Sales Support Inc. of Edison, N.J. "Now we have more time to introduce new products such as a new protective relay we've just introduced that makes us competitive with General Electric and Westinghouse," says Mr. Basler.  "We introduced the unit last February, and because of ADH mailings, we've already sold more than 300 units."  When a company does innovate, its customers often benefit as much or more.  "The new computer system of Business Card Service saves us four hours a day in checking our own files," says Bonnie Gitzen, an office services supervisor for Minnesota Mining & Manufacturing Co. in St. Paul, Minn., which places 14,000 orders for business cards a year with Mr. Marchessault's company.  Now, to order a business card for any of 3M's 86,000 employees, she simply punches in a code to her computer, which interfaces with Business Card Service's mainframe computer.  And voila: The business card with the correct name, title, typeface and layout arrive in two to five days from Business Card Service.  "It used to take at least two weeks, before the new system, to get the right information and check it at various printing stages," says Ms. Gitzen.  "And now errors are almost nonexistent."  "It took a while to get out the bugs, and we may have initially lost some business, but it was well worth it," says Mr. Marchessault.  Sometimes even companies with products that help their customers be innovative have to come up with new ideas themselves.  For example, RAM Center Inc., a Red Wing, Minn., maker of robots, got most of its business by visiting factories of potential customers to spot ways to automate production with robots.  Robert Cahlander, RAM Center president, wanted to introduce robots into retail settings, but he couldn't figure out how to do it.  "Just visiting any retail store like a supermarket wouldn't have helped us come up with an innovative idea because we wanted to develop something that doesn't exist," says Mr. Cahlander.  "We wracked our brains and finally decided to build a retail store right on the factory floor."  This meant pulling six engineers off the floor and proved costly.  As a result, RAM Center figures it will operate at close to the break-even point in its fiscal year ending Jan. 31, compared with a profit of $800,000 last year.  "But we now have a retail store selling compact disks with music that can be run entirely by robotics," says Mr. Cahlander.  "It took some thinking as to how we could be innovative."  In October, such a robot-run store will open in a shopping center in South Minneapolis.  The robot pays for itself in a year by replacing the cashier and manager.  Customers pay with credit cards or cash at a machine similar to an automatic teller machine.  The robot keeps track of inventory, stocking and reordering.  One way for small business to spur innovation is for one or more managers to shed day-to-day administrative duties and concentrate on stimulating ideas among the work force.  That's what Scott Rickert, the president of Nanofilm Corp., a Strongsville, Ohio, maker of protective coatings for eyeglasses, does.  Mr. Rickert walks around the factory during the day, coffee cup in hand, and visits with each of his 14 employees.  "Just the other day I helped one technician figure out how to cut costs for a solvent by 15 times by brainstorming with him," says Mr. Rickert.  "Halfway during the day I replace the coffee with water so I don't get buzzed out on caffeine."  For bargain-hunting money managers, the stock market's summer leap to record levels is spawning increased caution.  After feasting earlier this year on issues they considered reasonably priced, these managers of mutual-fund and other portfolios say they are starving for stocks with price-to-earnings ratios below that of the general market and above-average dividend yields.  These so-called value investors are never fully satisfied, of course.  But their sentiment is turning into a market factor as they buy less stock and pile up more cash.  "Stocks just seem fully valued," says Richard Howard, manager of T. Rowe Price's $130 million Capital Appreciation Fund.  That verdict is based on Mr. Howard's observation that the average company's stock price compared with its book value, which essentially is assets minus liabilities, is higher than historical norms.  Also, he complains that the average stock offers a low dividend yield, compared with that on fixed-income securities.  Mr. Howard started the year with 71% of his portfolio in stocks, 23% in cash and 6% in preferred stock.  Now his stocks are down to 52%, with 27% in cash and 21% in bonds and preferred stock.  He also has some money in stock index options.  John Neff, the portfolio manager of the $8.7 billion Windsor Fund, says 20% of the fund's assets are in cash now, compared with 4% at the beginning of the year.  He has raised the cash level in part, he says, because many stocks don't look as cheap as they used to.  The Windsor Fund's net asset value is up about 24% this year, compared with about 27% gains in Standard & Poor's 500-stock index, the Dow Jones Industrial Average and the Dow Jones Equity Market Index.  Some small-money managers are even uneasier.  James Pappas, who invests for individual clients and company pension funds, is so "nervous" about stocks that he has put 50% of the $2.5 million he oversees in cash.  "It's harder to find good ideas that are reasonably priced," he complains.  Mr. Pappas thinks that comparing a company's P-E ratio and profit-growth rate is the best way to evaluate its investment potential.  For instance, he would consider investing in a company whose stock traded at 22 times per-share earnings if those earnings were growing at about 50% a year.  But a company with the same earnings growth selling at a P-E of 35 would be harder to swallow, he says.  At IDS Financial Services, even the most bullish investment managers are raising cash.  Rich Lazarchic, an IDS portfolio manager, estimates that most funds' cash has gradually risen to 15% to 25% from zero to 10% at the start of this year.  "After the crash, there were some excellent values out there," Mr. Lazarchic says.  But now, he says, many managers are approaching issues with the attitude: "Gee, do I have to?"  Mr. Lazarchic is an associate portfolio manager of the $1.5 billion IDS Mutual Fund.  About two-thirds of the fund's assets are in equities and the remainder is in fixed-income securities.  Mr. Lazarchic says the fund usually maintains about a 2% to 3% cash position, but it's twice as big now.  Overall, however, cash-level statistics don't reflect this caution.  Statistics from Gordon, Haskett & Co.'s Indata service indicate that cash levels in mutual funds that hold stocks, bonds and cash are down to 8.8% from 9.5% at the end of 1988.  One reason may be that some money managers don't have the flexibility to keep large sums out of stocks.  The investment objectives of many funds and portfolios require managers to maintain a certain percentage of assets in stocks.  Consider Jerry Peterson, a portfolio manager at Denver Investment Advisors.  He co-manages a $1.8 billion aggressive equity portfolio that is almost fully invested.  His stock choices are already up about 46% this year.  If he had his druthers, Mr. Peterson says, his exposure to stocks would be "very small -- at least for the next six months."  New Jersey casino regulators granted Merv Griffin a few months' reprieve on certain regulatory issues as the entertainer and businessman girds for the restructuring of troubled Resorts International Inc.  Mr. Griffin's holding company, Griffin Co., is scheduled for casino licensing hearings on Sept. 25.  The New Jersey Casino Control Commission agreed to limit the scope of those hearings to whether Mr. Griffin and Griffin Co. are suitable for licensing, rather than considering the overall financial stability of Resorts.  If the commission were to consider Resorts' financial stability at the September hearings, Mr. Griffin could run the risk of being denied a permanent casino license.  The license for Resorts itself expires in February, and the company's recent financial woes will weigh heavily in determining whether the casino is relicensed.  Earlier this week, Resorts suspended interest payments on $925 million of secured and unsecured debt.  Mr. Griffin told bondholders that Resorts' cash flow is lower than expected, and that the company is having problems selling off certain assets.  The company said it plans to present a recapitalization plan to its bondholders Sept. 19 at its flagship casino in Atlantic City, N.J.  Casinos must document their financial stability and the honesty and good character of their executives, among other things, in order to retain their licenses.  The New Jersey Division of Gaming Enforcement, which makes recommendations to the commission, had argued that Resorts' financial problems should be considered at the Griffin hearings because Resorts is Griffin Co.'s main operating unit.  "How do you make that financial stability determination in a vacuum?" asked Anthony Parrillo, the division's chief.  Regulators have the authority to request that Resorts' casino licensing be reopened for hearings at any point, which technically means that the company's financial stability could be re-evaluated before February.  Mr. Parrillo said the division will decide what further steps to take in the next week.  Mr. Griffin, who acquired the hotel-casino company in November for $365 million after a takeover battle with Donald Trump, wasn't available for comment.  A spokesman for Mr. Griffin declined to comment.  Sara Lee Corp. agreed to take steps in its 31 meat-processing plants to reduce workplace hazards that cause repetitive-motion injuries, the Labor Department said.  The department's Occupational Safety and Health Administration reached a similar agreement last November with IBP Inc. at 15 of that meatpacker's facilities.  Sara Lee, based in Chicago, agreed to a plan including use of ergonomic consultants.  They will review work processes that may lead to cumulative trauma disorders, which include repetitive-motion injuries to workers' hands, wrists and arms, OSHA said.  The company agreed to use methods that will do the most to reduce the problem, including production line changes, rotating employees to less hazardous jobs, training workers and supervisors, early recognition of problems and quick medical diagnosis and treatment.  Sara Lee agreed to pay $20,000 in penalties and withdraw its contesting of OSHA citations for four alleged violations involving cumulative trauma disorders at the company's plant in New London, Wis., the agency said.  Sara Lee officials weren't available for comment.  In what could be a precedent-setting case in trade law, the Commerce Department is investigating a complaint that Singapore is unfairly subsidizing software exports to the U.S.  The complaint, filed by Visible Systems Corp. of Waltham, Mass., involves several million dollars in annual U.S. sales of a software-designing program developed by a Singapore firm, CSA Pte.  The Massachusetts firm calls the investigation a "test case" to define the grounds on which the U.S. software industry can fight off unfairly traded products sources like Japan and the European Community.  Although the U.S. leads in software development, Commerce Department officials worry that Tokyo's efforts to strengthen its software industry could eventually spell trouble for even such leading U.S. firms as Microsoft Corp. and Lotus Development Corp.  However, if the Commerce Department rules in the petitioner's favor, it may have to go beyond the historic interpretation of trade law to offset the alleged subsidies.  Normally, the U.S. imposes a countervailing duty on subsidized imports to offset their price advantage over U.S. products.  But software is different from other traded products in that it can be transmitted over telecommunications lines or through a single master disk that can be reproduced by the thousands once in the U.S.  Thus, countervailing duties wouldn't be enough to protect the U.S. products.  "The value of the product is in the information rather than in the media in which it's contained," said Alice Denson, the international affairs manager of Adapso, the U.S. software industry's trade body.  U.S. officials said it was the first unfair-trade investigation involving software to be opened by the Commerce Department, which plans to announce its preliminary determination by Nov. 2.  If the department decides Singapore unfairly subsidized the CSA product, it has to impose countervailing duties.  But if these duties aren't sufficient to offset CSA's price advantages in the U.S., the Bush administration may have to resort to other remedies, including negotiating with Singapore to persuade it to minimize or eliminate its alleged subsidies.  Generally, in unfair-trade cases, the International Trade Commission must independently determine that a U.S. industry is being injured by subsidies.  However, an ITC ruling isn't required in this case because Singapore isn't a signatory to an international code limiting the use of government subsidies.  Therefore, this case will be handled entirely by the Commerce Department.  In its petition, Visible Systems alleges that the Singapore subsidies are in the form of a grant of more than $10 million to CSA, the loan of government-supported technical staff, and various official assistance and incentive programs.  The complaint says the subsidized product, called POSE, is being marketed in the U.S. by a CSA subsidiary, Computer Systems Advisors Inc. of Woodcliff Lake, N.J.  POSE competes in the U.S. with other products of its kind called computer-aided software engineering, or CASE.  Such products are used by software designers to lay out the electronic blueprints of various types of personal-computer programs.  Visible Systems estimates the U.S. market for this type of CASE software to be about $1 billion a year.  A lawyer for the Singapore government said it won't respond to the complaint until it receives a formal questionnaire from the Commerce Department.  Visible Systems acknowledges that it's exploring the outer edges of trade law in pressing its complaint.  "Even if the Commerce Department rules in our favor, it could be powerless to do anything about it" under current trade law, said Cedric Nash, the firm's international sales manager.  The larger question the U.S. has to investigate, he said, is how it will cope with "numerous government-orchestrated software development efforts around the world."  Defense contractors are scrambling to strengthen their own ethics rules to deflect pressure stemming from the Pentagon procurement scandal for tougher federal controls.  They are especially eager to head off government-imposed codes-of-conduct for their employees and "revolving door" laws intended to prevent officials from moving directly from government jobs into lucrative industry positions involving the same federal contracts.  Industry people say voluntary ethics programs are more effective than mandatory rules primarily because they can be tailored to the corporate culture and operations of specific firms.  "If it turns into a government checklist mentality, you won't see senior management involved so deeply," asserts an industry lawyer.  But defense firms will have a tough time deflecting a government crackdown in the wake of recent revelations of widespread bribery and influence-peddling in Pentagon contracting.  "I don't think voluntary compliance efforts are enough," warns Rep. Nicholas Mavroules (D., Mass.), chairman of a House Armed Services subcommittee.  "Unless industry goes further down that road, {lawmakers} are determined to act."  Robert Constello, a former Pentagon acquisition chief, adds that many defense contractors shy away from ethics programs because they "still have a philosophy of catch us if you can."  To demonstrate their commitment to reform, major Pentagon suppliers have fired many long-time consultants and restricted future consulting contracts, according to Derek Vander Schaff, the Pentagon's deputy inspector general.  When consulting fees are billed to military contracts these days, he says, contractors go out of their way to supply detailed back-up documents to government auditors.  Many contractors and trade groups also are issuing new ethics rules.  "The debate is over how specific the new ethics rules should be," says John Englund, a senior official of the Washington-based American Electronics Association.  "But there's no doubt that congressional interest has lit a fire under some organizations."  The National Contract Management Association, which represents some 24,000 public and private purchasing experts, has adopted an ethics code that covers everything from gift-giving and preparation of accurate invoices to hiring consultants and avoiding any contracting decisions "that might reasonably be construed" to pose a potential conflict-of-interest.  It provides that members who fail to comply automatically will be expelled from the association and could even forfeit certain professional certificates issued by the group.  "Without tough sanctions, ethics codes are meaningless . . . and only amount to lip service," explains Jeffrey Michelman, a St. Louis attorney who drafted the code.  The voluntary approach gets strong support from the Bush administration.  Defense Secretary Dick Cheney scrapped previously proposed regulations that, in effect, would have imposed uniform ethics rules on large and small contractors.  In a report to the White House earlier this summer, he asserted: "If such codes are to be a meaningful reflection of management's priorities and commitment, they must be adopted by contractors voluntarily, not mandated in procurement regulations."  Still, Rep. Mavroules and his colleagues on the Armed Services panel are considering wide-ranging legislation that may call for further restrictions and greater accountability for consultants, enhanced protections for whistleblowers, tighter controls on recruitment of government officials by contractors, and increased reliance by the Pentagon on purchasing less expensive, off-the-shelf items.  Rep. Charles Bennett of Florida, another Democratic subcommittee chairman, wants to prevent senior and many mid-level defense officials from going to work for defense contractors for at least two years after they leave government.  There seems to be a consensus on Capitol Hill that former Pentagon officials shouldn't be allowed to benefit personally from inside information they take with them when they resign.  The current law "lends itself to a tremendous amount of abuse," Rep. George (Buddy) Darden (D., Ga.) said at a recent hearing.  "Something {tougher} is going to pass.  There's no doubt about that."  A federal grand jury has issued subpoenas to Alyeska Pipeline Service Co. and at least one of its owners as part of an investigation into possible criminal wrongdoing in connection with the disastrous Valdez oil spill.  The grand-jury investigation, long rumored, was confirmed in documents filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission by Atlantic Richfield Co. Arco's Arco Pipeline Co. unit owns 21% of Alyeska, the consortium set up by seven big oil companies to operate the Trans-Alaska Pipeline.  A separate but related Federal Bureau of Investigation investigation has been under way since shortly after the March 24 spill, caused when the Exxon Valdez supertanker crashed into a reef and dumped 11 million gallons of crude oil into Alaska's Prince William Sound.  Alyeska is responsible for mounting the first efforts to contain damage from spills in the sound and had long assured state regulatory bodies that it was capable of responding speedily to any major spill.  It has been bitterly criticized for a slow, stumbling response in the hours immediately after the Exxon Valdez ran aground.  Although Alyeska has defended its efforts, environmentalists and many state officials maintain that Alyeska's failure to corral more of the oil before it drifted away from the ship greatly increased the environmental damage done as the oil roamed the sound and washed up on its rocky shoreline.  Late yesterday, Alyeska confirmed that it had been subpoenaed but said that the Justice Department had informed it that it was "not a target" of the probe.  An Alyeska spokesman declined to specify the target.  Neither the Justice Department nor the FBI had any immediate comment on the grand jury probe.  In its filings, Arco said Arco Pipeline had been subpoenaed by a federal grand jury in Anchorage for records of its "review and evaluation of Alyeska's oil spill equipment, personnel, capabilities and contingency plans."  To operate the pipeline, Alyeska is required by state law to submit contingency plans spelling out how it will respond to spills or other disasters.  In the Valdez spill, Alyeska failed to do many of the things it had said it could do in its plan.  For example, the plan called for Alyeska to respond in less than five hours to spills in the area where the Exxon Valdez crashed.  Significant emergency equipment didn't begin arriving at the site until nearly 14 hours after the ship went aground.  In addition, some of Alyeska's spill-fighting equipment was in disarray or quickly broke down.  Lawyers familiar with the numerous investigations and lawsuits surrounding the spill also said it was likely that, in addition to Arco, the other owners of Alyeska had been or will be subpoenaed, too.  Those companies are Exxon Corp. (which owns the Exxon Valdez), British Petroleum Co., Mobil Corp., Amerada Hess Corp., Unocal Corp. and Phillips Petroleum Co.  Arco wouldn't elaborate on precisely what the grand jury is looking into.  A spokesman would say only that "we have been asked for records, and we are in the process of compiling those records."  None of the other owners could be reached to comment.  However, the probe most likely focuses on whether any of the companies may have been guilty of negligence that would constitute violations of federal anti-pollution laws such as the Clean Water Act.  The laws authorize sizable fines and -- in certain circumstances -- prison sentences of as many as 15 years.  Last month, Alaska dropped a criminal probe of Alyeska, saying that federal laws have stiffer penalities and tougher provisions than state laws and thus were better suited to the case.  Alyeska has already been named a co-defendant in many of the suits filed in connection with the spill, including the massive civil lawsuit filed by the state earlier this month.  Lincoln National Corp. agreed to sell its National Reinsurance Corp. subsidiary in a transaction valued at $390.6 million to an investor group that includes Texas financier Robert M. Bass.  Under the accord, a new company, Nat Re Holdings, will be formed to acquire National Reinsurance for $395.1 million in cash and notes.  In turn, Lincoln will acquire for $4.5 million a 15% stake in Nat Re Holdings.  Lincoln, based in Fort Wayne, Ind., also will receive warrants that would allow it to boost its stake in Nat Re Holdings to as much as 25%.  Lincoln, the nation's seventh-largest insurance holding company, said it expects to reap a one-time gain "in the range of $1 to $1.25 a share," or $41.9 million to $52.1 million, from the planned sale.  The transaction, which is subject to clearance by Delaware insurance regulators, is expected to close around year end.  Lincoln said the subsidiary's property-casualty reinsurance business "lacks a long-term strategic fit with our life reinsurance business or our primary property-casualty business."  Under the accord with Robert M. Bass Group Inc. and Acadia Partners Limited Partnership, an affiliated concern, Lincoln will receive $320.1 million in cash, as well as $75 million face amount in 13 1/4% preferred stock issued by Nat Re Holdings.  National Reinsurance's management is also participating in the investor group, Lincoln said.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Lincoln gained 50 cents a share to close at $54.50.  National Reinsurance, which Lincoln acquired in 1984, had net income of $34.9 million on revenue of $344.4 million in 1988.  Robert Crispin, executive vice president and chief investment officer of Lincoln, said National Reinsurance, while a strong performer in its own right, hadn't provided the "synergy" with Lincoln's other operations that the company had hoped for.  A final figure for the anticipated gain on the sale "depends on valuation of the securities being received," said Mr. Crispin.  Proceeds from the sale will be used to help repay debt Lincoln had assumed in other acquisitions, and "eventually we expect {the funds} will be deployed into other parts of our business."  In 1988, Lincoln's net income slipped 38% to $146.7 million, or $3.21 a share, on revenue of $7.31 billion.  The results were hurt by a $61.7 million charge related to disposal of certain unprofitable health-maintenance organizations in Florida.  McDonnell Douglas Corp. was awarded $201.2 million in contracts for improvements to Army AH-64 helicopters and for testing Navy F-18 aircraft missiles.  The Defense Logistics Agency awarded jet fuel contracts to Navaho Refining Co. for $81 million; Barrett Refining Corp. for $38.1 million; Coastal Refining & Marketing Inc., a unit of Coastal Corp., for $34.2 million; Diamond Shamrock Refining & Marketing Co. for $28.9 million; Hawaiian Independent Refinery Inc., a unit of Pacific Resources Inc., for $25.1 million; Calcasieu Refining Co. for $23.4 million; and Western Petroleum Co. for $20.1 million.  ITT Corp. received a $55.6 million Air Force contract to operate Western testrange facilities.  Simulaser Corp., a unit of Applied Solar Energy Corp., got a $35.9 million Army contract for laser training devices.  Ford Aerospace Corp., a unit of Ford Motor Co., was given a $28 million Air Force contract for support of the Nellis Air Force Base electronic warfare range.  General Electric Co. received a $14.2 million Army contract for an advanced airdefense sensor system.  Grumman Corp. was given an $11.4 million Navy contract for A-6E aircraft repair kits.  Amerada Hess Corp. received a $10.7 million Defense Logistics Agency contract for burner oil.  Textron Inc. was issued a $10.2 million Army contract for support of M-1 tank engines.  The U.S. International Trade Commission decided that imports of stretched limousines from Canada may be injuring a domestic industry.  The ITC preliminary decision on anti-dumping and countervailing-duty complaints filed by Southampton Coachworks Ltd. of Farmingdale, N.Y., requires the Commerce Department to continue its inquiries on subsidized exports of Canadian-built limousines.  If the department and the ITC issue final rulings against the imports of the modified motor vehicles from Canada, U.S. penalty duties could be ordered to offset Canadian government export subsidies or "dumping-price" sales of the Canadian-built limousines to U.S. buyers.  ITC officials said imports of Canadian-built stretched limousines, which are large cars modified to increase passenger capacity and provide users with deluxe accessories, total $10 million to $20 million a year.  Southampton Coachworks alleged that the Canadian government has provided various types of subsidies to several companies in Canada that produce such vehicles.  It also charged that Canadian companies, including A.H.A Manufacturing Ltd., Brampton, Ontario, have sold their vehicles in the U.S. market at unfairly low prices, ranging from 19.4% to 24.4% below the Canadian home-market prices for the same vehicles.  ITC officials said about 30 U.S. companies make up the domestic limousine-manufacturing industry, and that the Southampton Coachworks complaints were filed on behalf of the U.S. industry.  Troubled National Intergroup Inc. will face heightened pressure to deliver profits after tomorrow.  That's when the company's five-year partnership ends with NKK Corp. of Japan, which holds a 50% stake in its National Steel Corp. unit.  The agreement, first touted as an innovative way to turn around a mature business, has served in effect as a "poison pill," investors and analysts say.  It has prohibited Pittsburgh-based National Intergroup from selling its half interest in the steel unit to a third party.  Moreover, it stipulated that NKK could buy National Intergroup's stake at a bargain price if a hostile suitor emerged.  With the agreement about to end, National Intergroup, which has posted losses in six of the past seven years, must move quickly to prevent an unfriendly takeover.  Already, one disgruntled shareholder with an 8.8% stake has called for the ouster of Chairman Howard M. Love and other major investors complain that the company has failed to improve earnings.  "When this {agreement} falls by the wayside, it makes the company more vulnerable," asserted Timothy McCartney, representing Walker Street Associates, Inc., the group with the 8.8% stake.  Indeed, National Intergroup's stock has increased steadily in recent weeks from a July low of $15.50 to close yesterday at $20 a share, up 50 cents, in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange.  "This company is worth more dead than alive," one investor said.  Mr. Love, who has been criticized for devoting more time to charities than to the company, insisted National's operations are improving and that 1989 will be "a comeback year in spades."  That turnaround, however, will hinge on the sale of both National Intergroup aluminum and steel operations, he acknowledged.  His strategy is to use proceeds to reduce debt and then concentrate on shoring up the disappointing wholesale drug distribution business, which was acquired three years ago.  In an interview, Mr. Love noted that National Intergroup has narrowed the list of 12 bidders for the aluminum operations and expects an agreement "within the next couple of weeks."  Analysts estimate the business, which is valued on company books at about $140 million to $150 million, could fetch anywhere from $200 million to $300 million.  But selling the steel operation -- which has the worst profits per ton of any major U.S. steel producer and is hamstrung by a costly labor accord that restricts layoffs -- will prove far more difficult.  National Intergroup has been trying to sell its 50% stake to NKK, but the Japanese company wants to retain an American partner for political and customer-relations purposes.  After tomorrow, National Intergroup will be free to look for a third-party buyer, but it's unclear who would be interested.  Any transaction will undoubtedly involve some provision regarding an estimated $200 million liability from National Intergroup's former Weirton Steel unit.  Mr. Love said he still expects the steel business, which is valued on company books at $370 million, to be sold by the end of this year.  Analysts say those operations could be sold for $350 million to $450 million.  Walker Street's Mr. McCartney said the investment group is willing to see if National Intergroup makes good on its long-promised plan to shed its metals businesses.  "We're taking a wait-and-see attitude," said Mr. McCartney.  "But we're certainly open to all our options," including gaining control of the company.  Walker Street's largest investor is Charles Hurwitz, whose Maxxam Group Inc. bought KaiserTech Ltd. and then dismissed James S. Pasman Jr. as chairman.  Mr. Pasman is now president at National Intergroup.  Meanwhile, institutional investors are growing impatient with promises of improved earnings.  "We hope the company feels pressure because it has failed in executing its {diversification} plan," said James Severance, portfolio manager of Wisconsin State Investment Board, one of NII's biggest shareholders.  Some investors criticize Mr. Love, the son of a former Chrysler Corp. chairman, for delegating much management responsibility to subordinates.  But it was the 6-foot-5-inch Mr. Love -- guided by an army of outside consultants -- who orchestrated National Intergroup's diversification from metals to distribution businesses.  Viewed for a time as a visionary, he bought a savings and loan, and spun off Weirton Steel to employees in the largest employee stock-ownership plan.  Then, the company negotiated a landmark joint venture with NKK, convinced that it would soon be the premier steel producer in the nation.  Subsequently, however, National Intergroup bought Permian Corp., just before oil prices fell, and then FoxMeyer Corp., paying prices some investors believe were far too high.  In addition, FoxMeyer has been fraught with problems, including poor inventory controls and unprofitable sideline operations.  Its operating margins as a percentage of sales are 50% to 70% below competitors, analysts say.  Then, National Intergroup recruited Laurence J. Farley, a former Black & Decker Corp. chairman, to turn FoxMeyer around.  But he abruptly resigned this year after unsuccessfully trying to convince the board that Mr. Love wasn't moving fast enough to shed money-losing businesses, including the Ben Franklin retail chain.  Mr. Love said he doesn't plan to sell Ben Franklin, even though investors consider it a dud.  He also said he doesn't regret the decisions he's made at National Intergroup and wouldn't "do anything different in regards to strategy."  Insisting that his strategy is finally paying off, he pointed to a 37% increase in net income in this year's first quarter.  As for the looming deadline with NKK, Mr. Love said National Intergroup's best defense is continued focus on the wholesale drug distribution business.  "It won't change what we're currently doing," he said.  On the morning of March 12, a sleek, twin-engined executive turbojet took off from a small airfield in Colombia.  Although its two pilots didn't know it, the flight marked the beginning of a new and difficult chapter in the U.S.'s increasingly desperate war against drugs.  In its nose, the aircraft carried a number of large duffel bags, which law-enforcement officials now believe contained at least half a ton of cocaine.  In its rear cabin was a stack of 38 seven-gallon cans of fuel, waiting to be poured into a jury-rigged internal refueling system.  It gave the plane a range far beyond ordinary small aircraft.  The flight plan was simple: Through the Windward Passage and then straight north, circumventing the entire land-based, electronic "fence" of radar beacons the U.S. uses to spot incoming drug traffic over the Caribbean and the Bahamas.  During the early days of the drug war -- in the 1970s -- a few daring pilots used this risky technique to make nonstop marijuana deliveries to New York.  U.S. Customs Service officials, whose small planes and limited radar couldn't reach that far out into the Atlantic, came to call the route "the New York Express."  In the intervening years, this game has grown more sophisticated and much, much richer.  While U.S. officials have been beefing up surveillance along the southern border, Colombian drug lords have been rerouting shipments directly into small airfields in eastern Canada.  From there they are trucked south to New York City, where a half ton of pure cocaine can fetch $25 million on wholesale markets.  But on the day the executive turbojet took off from Colombia, the drug lords were, for the first time, up against a more potent foe: U.S. military forces.  Thus began an 18-hour drama that ultimately involved law-enforcement agencies and armed services of both the U.S. and Canada.  It would, however, end in frustration, and would give both countries a bracing first lesson in the tricky art of joining civilian and military agencies in a drug-fighting role: Cumbersome bureaucracies -- no matter how well equipped -- are no match for agile, airborne drug traffickers.  To play in this game, you have to be agile yourself.  It has taken Congress a long time to drag the reluctant military into the war against drugs.  For years, the services argued that drugs are an issue for the police and other agencies to contend with.  Some in the armed forces also worried that a drug role would expose troops to bribes and other corrupting influences, a problem police forces now face.  But last fall, desperate to do something about the ceaseless flow of drugs into the country, Congress passed a law that earmarked $300 million of the defense budget for drug interdiction.  That started the huge military bureaucracy moving.  The cutting edge of the Air Force's entry into the new drug mission is the E-3 Airborne Warning and Control System, or AWACS, the far-seeing, computerized radar plane designed to orchestrate air battles.  Last year, AWACS planes were available only occasionally for anti-drug missions.  For two days in May, however, the service assembled enough AWACS planes to watch the whole southern border, from Florida to California, at once.  It saw nothing.  "Nobody flew into the U.S. because they knew we were there," Lt. Gen. Thomas W. Kelly, director of operations for the Joint Chiefs of Staff, told the Senate's Permanent Subcommittee on Investigations.  Gen. Kelly believes that pilots for the drug cartels use radar detectors to spot the AWACS, and turn around and wait until the planes go away.  This year, the Air Force is expanding the amount of time AWACS will be on patrol.  The Navy is also assigning 13 P-3 antisubmarine aircraft with similar radar capabilities to the mission, and is examining ways to use high technology to see into shipping containers.  And a joint task force in the Pentagon is about to buy two new radar-carrying balloons -- one tethered to a submersible oil platform, another attached to a ship -- to plug radar gaps in the Caribbean.  The Army, meanwhile, is studying the topography of the southern U.S. to see how many electronic sensors, radars and human patrols it will need to close all the gaps in the land border.  The Colombian plane that took off in early March flew along a path outside the range of land-based radar, but well within the range of airborne surveillance.  It first appeared off the East Coast as a blip on a radar screen aboard an AWACS plane, which was flying lazy circles during a training mission over Florida.  "It was sheer luck," explains Frank Kapitan, director of the Custom Service's aviation operations.  Judging the speed and the direction of the blip, a Customs agent aboard decided the plane might be on a drug mission.  The North American Air Defense Command (NORAD) launched two Air National Guard F-16 fighters from a base in Maine.  What the lead fighter saw as he approached the vicinity of the blip was a Commander 980 executive jet.  It was heading toward Nova Scotia without running lights as dusk approached.  It had not filed a flight plan.  The F-16s shadowed the Colombian jet until their fuel ran low, staying far enough away to avoid alerting the drug runners.  Then the planes were replaced by two more Air Guard F-16s summoned by NORAD from Vermont.  Under the rules of this new phase of the drug war, the military may follow drug smugglers, but it doesn't have the authority to stop or arrest them.  NORAD needed somebody to hand the mission over to.  Once again it was lucky.  A U.S. Customs Service "interdiction unit" -- a specially equipped turbojet and a Blackhawk helicopter -- were sitting in Bangor, Maine.  Normally assigned to the Caribbean, they were spending a few weeks working with the Royal Canadian Mounted Police, checking out rumors of increasing drug traffic going through Canada.  Three Customs officers piled into the plane and joined the chase.  Meanwhile, the Blackhawk crew waited in the gathering darkness at Bangor airport for a team of Mounties.  They would be needed to make arrests if the plane landed in Canada.  This first leg of the chase underscored perhaps the biggest problem the U.S. faces in its enlarged air war against drug traffickers: expense.  It costs $3,000 an hour to operate an AWACS plane, and $2,300 an hour to send an F-16 after a suspicious flier.  What's more, there aren't enough fighter planes to chase after every blip, and the government's hugely expanded radar surveillance system will soon generate a great many blips to worry about.  While U.S. authorities seized over 55,000 pounds of cocaine from private aircraft last year, more than from any other means of conveyance, the General Accounting Office worries that launching fighters to examine every suspicious aircraft will cost more money than it's worth.  It found that most of the 1,443 suspicious planes the Customs Service chased in the last two years were on legal trips.  In 23% of the cases, Customs landed next to the suspect plane and confronted the crew.  Nine percent of the pursuits resulted in arrests, seizures of drugs or other legal action.  Another GAO study found that, in 1987, the Air Force spent $2.6 million flying AWACS planes on anti-drug missions, which resulted in six drug seizures and 10 arrests.  A cheaper way to sort out the blips, the U.S. Customs Service has suggested, would be to require planes flying in drug traffic areas to use special air corridors to enter the U.S. Planes traveling outside the corridors without proper identification would be the ones to home in on.  Some Congressmen, such as South Carolina Republican Arthur Ravenel Jr., want to go further.  He would empower the military to make arrests and stop incoming planes that fly outside proper corridors and don't identify themselves.  "The real meat of my amendment is to shoot the bastards down.  They're killing our children," says Rep. Ravenel, a former Marine.  This idea rattles John L. Baker, president of the 291,000-member Aircraft Owners and Pilots Association.  "We call this the Strangelove proposal," he says.  "We lobbied to kill that thing last year and we'll kill that S.O.B. again."  Mr. Baker says the members of his group worry about mistakenly getting shot down by a zealous fighter pilot and chafe at having their flight paths prescribed.  Instead, the association is launching a volunteer effort to report suspicious activity at airports.  The luck that had graced the U.S. pursuers as they chased the Colombian plane began to run out a couple of hours before midnight.  The Commander 980 flew a meandering course over Maine, first on one side of the U.S.-Canadian border, then on the other.  Meanwhile, the Blackhawk crew was unable to locate the Mounties who had spent the day with them in Bangor.  Worrying that Customs might need plenty of backup when the plane landed, the chopper crew took off to join the chase.  At around 11 p.m. the Colombian plane headed back into Canada and approached a tiny airfield at Sorel, 50 miles northeast of Montreal.  The normal procedure for a U.S. Customs intercept is for the helicopter crew to land and make the arrest while the Customs jet circles overhead, watching the scene with special night-vision equipment.  But the helicopter was still on its way.  Worse, the Canadian authorities, who had been informed by NORAD of the chase into Canada, hadn't given Customs permission to land.  "There was a lack of communication on the situation," admits Supt.  Neil Pouliot, head of the Mounties' Drug Enforcement Directorate.  The Colombian plane touched down in the darkness at Sorel.  The pilot of the Customs jet circling overhead saw through his night-vision goggles that a small truck pulled immediately alongside the plane.  People began to unload the duffel bags into the truck.  According to Mr. Kapitan, it was ten more agonizing minutes before a "senior Canadian police official" gave Customs permission to land.  As the Customs jet was landing, the small truck sped away.  Rifle-toting Customs officers forced the two pilots and the airport manager to lie face down on the runway as they searched the plane.  They were lying there when the Blackhawk landed.  First the local police, then the Mounties arrived.  Confusion over what had happened and who was in charge mounted.  The next day Canada filed a diplomatic protest with the U.S. for a possible "violation of Canadian sovereignty."  It was later quietly withdrawn.  Law enforcement agents in both countries are still investigating how at least half a ton of cocaine disappeared into the night.  But that wasn't the only loss.  Absent the evidence, the pilots of the Colombian plane were merely charged with a variety of minor infractions, including bringing a stolen plane into Canada.  They were fined $23,000, which they paid from a large wad of cash, and were deported a few days later.  Nobody went to jail.  What is believed to be the next flight of the "New York Express" bumped down on a tiny airstrip near Fredricton, New Brunswick, on April 3, three weeks later.  It would prove that -- high-tech radar and firepower notwithstanding -- the war on drugs still largely depends on old-fashioned, gumshoe detective work.  Spotted by AWACS and chased by U.S. jets up the East Coast, the plane was easy prey.  It's pilots, dizzy from gasoline fumes wafting through the craft, made a shaky landing and then crashed into a snow drift.  Quickly, a ground crew materialized and transferred a half a ton of cocaine from the plane into a small truck, which again sped away.  This time, though, the bureaucracy was prepared.  Undercover Mounties had already penetrated the drug ring, and were behind the wheel of the truck.  Eleven hundred pounds of cocaine, intended for delivery to New York, were seized, making it the most valuable drug bust in Canadian history.  The two pilots and three other Colombians on the ground were arrested and are awaiting trial in Canada.  "You make your own luck in this business," says one Canadian official.  Canadian Express Ltd. said it will sell its 25.7 million Pagurian Corp. Class A non-voting shares, which have an indicated market value of about 212 million Canadian dollars ($180.3 million).  It said the transaction is part of a program to reduce the cross holdings between the two holding companies and give them separate business identities.  Pagurian recently sold its stake in Canadian Express.  Both concerns are Toronto-based holding companies.  Canadian Express said the shares will be offered first to its own holders and then to the public.  Canadian Express is 24%-owned by Hees International Bancorp Inc.  In trading on the Toronto Stock Exchange yesterday, Pagurian Class A shares closed at C$8.25, down 12.5 Canadian cents.  Pagurian said it plans to issue an undetermined number of Class A non-voting shares in conjunction with the Canadian Express distribution.  Pagurian has about 50 million Class A shares outstanding.  About two-thirds of its voting shares, which aren't traded, are held by managers of the Edper group of companies, which, like Hees, are controlled by Toronto's Bronfman family.  Canadian Express said proceeds from the sale of its Pagurian shares will be used to repay debt.  Pagurian said proceeds from its planned share issue will be used toward the purchase of C$100 million senior securities of Edper Holdings Inc., also controlled by the Bronfmans.  Diamandis Communications Inc. is overhauling its American Photographer magazine in a move to attract a wider audience of photography professionals and general readers and to boost ad sales.  Beginning with its January 1990 issue, 11-year-old American Photographer will change its name to American Photo, decrease its frequency to bimonthly from monthly, increase its page size and upgrade its paper stock.  David Schonauer, editor of American Photographer, said the new magazine will focus on "event issues" with 25% more editorial pages, carrying more photographs as well as expanded columns and departments.  While publishers frequently redesign magazines, it is rare for them to change the name and frequency of an existing publication.  American Photographer is successful, but its circulation has been relatively flat in recent years at about 250,000.  Peter Diamandis, chief executive of DCI, said the creation of American Photo is an attempt to lure new readers and attract advertisers such as automotive companies while retaining American Photographer's current advertisers, largely high-end photography product makers.  Diamandis, a unit of French publisher Hachette S.A., is the leading publisher of popular photography magazines in the U.S.  In late May, DCI purchased Modern Photography magazine from ABC Publishing and folded it, combining its trademark and subscription list with its own Popular Photography magazine.  The company also publishes Elle magazine in the U.S., Woman's Day, and other magazines.  Mr. Schonauer said each issue of American Photo will have "a dominating or special theme with photo stories by the world's leading photographers."  By creating "something close to a coffee table photo magazine," he added, "we are reaching out to a wider audience that wants to look at great pictures and to remain a showcase for photographers."  Advertising rates and the magazine's cover and subscription prices are expected to be changed and will be announced later.  The change in publishing frequency, Mr. Schonauer said, would allow the magazine to "concentrate the resources of the product . . . we want the topics to be significant and the coverage to be complete."  Some possible event issues could be on a city, a country, or based on a theme such as sports or war photography.  While a step down in the frequency usually means a magazine is in trouble and is looking to cut publishing costs, Diamandis executives say that isn't the case.  For the first six months of 1989, the magazine's advertising revenue totaled $2.7 million, an increase of 18% from the same period in 1988.  Small investors are slowly warming to stock mutual funds, but many fund shareholders have stood by the gate as the stock market has taken off.  Assets of all mutual funds ballooned in July by $36 billion -- one of the largest monthly increases ever -- to a record $936.6 billion.  But much of this 4% increase stemmed from continued heavy inflows into money market funds, according to the Investment Company Institute, a Washington-based trade group.  "Individual investors are still numbed and afraid to do anything," says Norman Fosback, editor of Mutual Fund Forecaster, a Fort Lauderdale, Fla., newsletter.  Many stock-fund investors aren't putting any more cash into these funds, he says.  "And those who have missed the market for the most part are unwilling to come back in."  Still, investors poured $1.3 billion more into stock funds in July than they took out, the highest level since last December.  That surpassed the $1.2 billion net inflow in June and marked a turnaround from a $359 million outflow in July 1988.  Several mutual fund firms, moreover, say stock-fund inflows have swollen further this month.  Yet the renewed investor interest in stock funds remains far below pre-crash levels.  Net sales of stock funds -- sales minus redemptions -- averaged about $2.7 billion a month in 1986 and 1987, more than double last month's total.  Many small investors remain cautious.  Warren Womble, a retired civil engineer from Naples, Fla., is keeping his money stashed in money market and bond funds.  Only if the market falls 10% or more will he buy any stock portfolios, he says.  Even investors who do buy stock funds are trying to play it safe.  Moses Passer, a Washington investor, says the money he puts into stock funds these days is going only into funds that have been raising their cash levels. (Higher cash hoards buffer stock market declines, but can hamper performance in rising markets.)  "I'm a little concerned about the market," Mr. Passer says.  "So I'm targeting funds with good reputations that are showing some conservatism," he says.  The stock funds that continue to see the most inflows are growth-and-income funds, which combine fat dividends with the goal of capital appreciation.  Investors also showed more of an appetite in July for the more risky growth funds, according to the trade group.  More money is flowing into bond funds, too.  Investors pumped a net $2.1 billion into bond funds in July, compared with net inflows of $1.7 billion in June and $451.4 million in July 1988.  The big winner in July among all fund categories was long-term municipal bond funds, which posted gross sales of $2.3 billion.  But money market funds continue to steal the show.  Fund holders poured more than $14 billion into money funds in July, despite yields that have slipped from their highs in the spring.  And the surge into these funds continued unabated this month.  Meantime, managers of stock funds increased their cash holdings in July to 9.9% of assets from the 9.8% level in June.  But the July cash level still lags behind the 10.6% of July 1988.  Buying an option on a stock or stock index is often touted as a near-ideal investment: The maximum an investor can lose is limited to the cost of the option, but the returns can be many times the option's cost if the buyer has called the market correctly.  But experience shows that though option buyers sometimes win big, they don't do it often.  The money-makers in options trading are those who sell them, or "write" them as it's known.  Their winnings are never spectacular, just regular.  As might be expected, option buyers tend to be individual investors and option sellers tend to be professionals, typically floor traders and institutional investors.  An option gives its owner the right to buy or sell a specified amount of an underlying investment at a fixed price, called its strike or exercise price.  Purchasers of call options will profit only if the underlying investment moves up enough to cause the option's value to exceed its cost, usually called its premium.  Purchasers of put options will profit only if the underlying investment has a major decline.  Option buyers win so infrequently, says Alex Jacobson, an options specialist at the Chicago Board Options Exchange, because "option buyers are betting on extraordinary events and they don't happen very often."  He ruefully estimates that "the game is at least 60/40 against the buyer.  Over time you can't win against those odds."  Bernard Schaeffer, executive director of Investment Research Institute Inc., a Cincinnati-based market-strategy firm and publisher of investment newsletters, recently studied the returns on various option-buying strategies for the nearly 31 months ended July 21.  Because options trade on more than 500 stocks it is impractical to track the performance of all equity options.  So Mr. Schaeffer chose the S&P 100 index option, commonly known by its ticker symbol, OEX, as a proxy for the universe of equity options.  He also created an options-buying index, which neutralizes the effect of the OEX rising or falling by having the average option buyer each month purchase equal dollar amounts of calls and puts with the same strike price.  Mr. Schaeffer stresses that his index is a measure of how option buyers do, in general, not a strategy.  Good thing it isn't.  As the accompanying table shows, this approach produced a return of 4.6% over 2 1/2 years while the OEX itself rose 35.6%.  The year of the crash, 1987, was the only recent exception: Investors who bought both calls and puts made 61.3% as both puts and calls showed profits at different times as the stock market first moved substantially up and then precipitously down.  However, after the crash there were eight months in which buyers of both calls and puts lost money.  The extended bull market would have allowed investors who purchased calls each month to have earned 151% on their capital, making 46% in the first seven months of 1989, alone, Mr. Schaeffer's study showed.  Steadfast put buyers, on the other hand, would have lost 71% of their capital since the beginning of 1987.  These returns assume that an investor bought options with 10% of his portfolio's assets.  In most cases when larger portions of assets were used the results were worse.  Both commissions and interest on idle funds weren't included in the calculations.  Investors who used a simple trend-following rule were also able to generate profits at a rate that beat the OEX.  It is assumed they bought calls when the index had risen the previous month and bought puts when it fell.  Mr. Jacobson of the CBOE says Mr. Schaeffer's study probably replicates the experience of most option buyers.  Options are heavily stacked against buyers for three reasons: Options lose value as they approach expiration; about a third of all option contracts expire worthless; transaction costs amount to 7% to 10% of invested capital.  Mr. Jacobson says studies show that of every 100 trades made by individual investors, about 55 are buys, about 15 are options written against individual stocks, three are written without the writers owning the stock -- so-called naked writing -- and the balance are more esoteric trades such as spreading one option against another.  Option trading is, ignoring commissions, a zero-sum game.  That means every dollar lost by option buyers shows up in the pockets of option sellers.  Investors who sell call options on individual securities when they already own the securities -- so-called covered writers -- are looking to protect stocks they own against market declines and to generate additional income.  Their risk is that if the stock price increases after having sold a call against it, the stock might be called away from them.  Writers of naked options take more risk.  In a bull market a naked call seller might be forced to deliver stock he doesn't own; in such a case he must buy it in the market regardless of price.  In a bear market a naked put writer might be forced to buy stock he doesn't want from a put owner.  How do option writers fare?  To answer this question, James Yates, president of DYR Associates, a Vienna, Va., firm that provides option information to institutional investors and brokerage houses, created a portfolio of the 99 most heavily traded stocks on which options are written.  His covered writer's index measures the returns that would be generated by an investor selling calls against the stock in the portfolio.  Since the beginning of 1987 that index gained 26.7% while the portfolio of stocks rose 45.9%.  The reason for the poorer performance of the index is that as stock prices rose the shares against which calls were written were called away from the portfolio.  Over a longer period, the past 15 3/4 years, Mr. Yates found that the unhedged portfolio and the same portfolio with calls sold against it have had almost the same returns.  However, he also found that the selling of calls reduced the risk of owning the portfolio by almost half.  The risk reduction occurs because the additional income from selling the calls in effect reduces the costs of the stocks on which they are sold.  Mr. Yates also analyzed a strategy involving the selling of both puts and calls -- a trading technique known as a straddle -- against the stock in a portfolio.  This approach would have returned 30.9% since the end of 1986.  During the past 15 3/4 years this technique had a return 28% higher than the covered-writing strategy, the second-best technique studied.  The worst performance came from selling naked calls on the stocks in the portfolio.  It produced a loss of almost 20% during the past 2 1/2 years.  Mr. Yates also ignored commissions in his calculations, but unlike Mr. Schaeffer he assumed that all dividend and option income was invested in Treasury bills.  At the end of each quarter, all cash was reinvested in additional portfolio holdings, against which options were written.  Harrison Roth, an options analyst at Cowen & Co., New York, confirms Mr. Yates's findings.  Since exchange-listed options began trading 16 years ago, "it has always been the writers who have made money," he says.  Of course, he acknowledges, the past few years have been great for option buyers fortunate enough to own options on takeover stocks.  ---  @ How Options Buyers and Sellers Fare  @ Two studies show returns of varying strategies  @ Buyers  The performance of option-buying strategies from Dec. 31, 1986, to July 21, 1989  @ Options-buying index 4.6%  @ Call buying 151.1  @ Put buying -71.1  @ Trend following 71.8  @ Benchmark:  @ S&P 100 stock index 35.6%  Source: Investment Research Institute Inc.  @ Sellers  The performance of option-selling strategies from Dec. 31, 1986, to June 30, 1989  @ Buy stock/sell straddles 30.9%  @ Covered writing 26.7  @ Naked call writing -19.4  @ Buy Treasury bills/sell puts 26.7  @ Benchmark:  @ Unhedged portfolio of stocks 45.9%  Source: DYR Associates Inc.  The electric utility industry said President Bush's acid-rain proposals ultimately will cost ratepayers $5 billion to $7.1 billion a year, somewhat more than the administration has projected.  A study prepared for Edison Electric Institute, a trade group for the nation's investor-owned utilities, said electric bills in six states could jump an average of more than 10% a year over 20 years.  It said the increase could average 5% a year in 13 additional states and the District of Columbia.  The 12 hardest-hit utilities could see average rate increases of more than 25% a year, according to the study.  The Bush proposal, which hits coal-fired utilities the hardest in its quest to reduce acid rain, has pegged costs to utilities at $4 billion a year over 30 years.  It estimates that electric bills nationwide would rise only an average 2% a year, with the highest increases in any state 5% to 6% a year.  The study said utilities could trim the cost of reducing their emissions 20% to 30% if they had more freedom to buy or trade credits for emission reductions than the Bush administration's acid-rain bill would allow, and if they weren't restricted by the president's proposal to cap total emissions.  The cap would force utilities as a group to reduce emissions before they add new generating capacity.  The Environmental Protection Agency said the government and trade group estimates are similar except that the utilities underestimated the cost benefits that would arise from the president's pollution trading system.  The War of the Petunias began quietly.  Some botanists at an agricultural research center here were tinkering in the lab.  They spliced a corn gene into a petunia plant, and got an odd result: a petunia colored like an ear of Indian-red corn.  Intrigued, they figured they'd try growing a crop of the strange flowers outdoors, in a nearby field.  That's when the fighting began.  German environmentalists said the mutant petunias might spread, harming other plants.  The strange color might confuse bees.  Protest groups, like Women Against Petunias, formed.  Demonstrators gathered in Cologne.  At the capital in Bonn, legislators fretted.  Regulators deliberated.  Today, the as-yet unplanted petunias are at the front line in Germany's epic battle over genetic engineering.  The biotechnology industry, under attack by the country's powerful environmentalists, is at a standstill, with four factory licenses blocked.  U.S. and other foreign gene companies are avoiding Germany like the plague.  Local activists make political hay, and the press spins horror stories of mutant microbes and gene-spliced "sheep as big as grizzlies."  What's happening in Germany is the drug industry's worst nightmare of how the global debate over genetic engineering might go.  Gene-splicing in plants, animals and people is controversial everywhere.  In the U.S., opponents lobby and sue to block what they call risky experiments.  Last May, the world's first implant into a human of nonhuman genes took place in Bethesda, Md., only after a court fight.  In Germany, home of the world's third-largest drug and chemical industry, the uproar "creates a cloud that prevents companies from making investments," says William Srigley, executive vice president of Invitron Corp., a St. Louis biotechnology company.  Invitron is reconsidering plans for a $50 million plant in Hanover, West Germany.  "I have to believe Germany isn't going to give up its role in pharmaceutical development," Mr. Srigley says, "but we can't spend our money to resolve" the issue by staying and fighting.  Germany's emotional debate echoes throughout the international pharmaceutical and chemical industry.  In Austria last year, gene foes picketed a cancer-research laboratory opened by Genentech Inc. of San Francisco and Boehringer Ingelheim G.m.b.H. of West Germany.  At European Community headquarters in Brussels, German politicians under pressure at home are pushing for tough EC-wide gene rules that the industry claims would hobble it in world trade.  Because of the fuss in Germany, the industry hasn't had a new biotechnology plant licensed there in a year -- though the government has proposed controversial rules to end the bottleneck.  The German chemical giant BASF AG has been vainly battling to open a biotechnology plant at its Ludwigshafen headquarters.  But its foes are shrill.  One local anti-BASF politician asked last spring: "What killer life forms, what environmental dangers, what biological epidemics can we now expect if {BASF's} gene technology carries on?"  BASF's plan was to make an experimental cancer medicine, tumor necrosis factor, using a now-routine process of altering the genes of a human intestinal bacteria so the bugs' innards secrete the medicine.  The process, with minor variations, has been used world-wide for a decade to make many drugs -- without accident.  But in the gritty back streets of Ludwigshafen, a campaign began to block the plant as unsafe.  Local members of the Green Party, which focuses on environmental issues, united with Communists.  A local Lutheran parish played host for community meetings.  Petitions circulated.  Leaflets warned of "horrific consequences for man and nature" if mutant bacteria ever escaped the plant.  BASF quickly countered, blanketing the town with its own newsletters.  It treated town elders to a factory tour.  But at a license hearing, Green lawyers successfully challenged BASF's application as legally flawed -- and the hearing was suspended in confusion.  Now BASF is hedging its bets.  "Ultimately, you can't do work that isn't approved by your neighbors," says Rolf-Dieter Acker, BASF's head of biotechnology research.  So, though continuing to fight, the company plans to locate its main gene-research lab far from Germany's gene debate, in a more receptive setting: Boston.  The petunia fight highlights the contrast between U.S. and German attitudes.  The experiment itself is garden-variety science that normally would attract scant public attention, except for one thing: It would be the first time anyone in Germany has moved a genetically altered organism outdoors.  The U.S. has already had eight outdoor releases of altered organisms, some involving bacteria, which scientists consider riskier than plants.  Ironically, even petunia foes now concede that the German experiment is probably harmless.  But a principle is at stake.  "It's the first {release}, and we have to stop it" to prevent other, more dangerous experiments, says Norbert Barth, a young Green parliamentary aide.  Mr. Barth is part of a network of mainly Green gene activists that has emerged in Germany since 1986.  They don't have nearly so big a public following as Germany's powerful nuclear protesters; instead they rely on astute courtroom and parliamentary maneuvering to impede the biotechnology industry.  Their main argument is: Better safe than sorry.  Chernobyl, PCBs, Love Canal and other disasters began with inadequate knowledge of the risks of new technologies, Mr. Barth says.  "We should learn from our mistakes" and halt most gene work until its risks are known.  Such talk riles Peter Meyer, a leader of the petunia scientists.  "They accept all the advantages of technology," the 32-year-old, shaggy-haired scientist says of gene foes.  "They get food cheaper than they ever have.  They have unlimited energy.  They just aren't prepared to accept the risks."  Ironically, his petunia experiment is so innocuous that gene foes accuse him of designing it to mock them. (He denies that.) He and colleagues at a plant-breeding center run by the nonprofit Max Planck Society, a big German scientific organization, plan to plant 37,000 corn-colored petunias near their lab to study how genes mutate during evolution.  They expect a few of the petunias to mutate on their own, changing to yet another color.  Those plants will be easy to spot in the field, and studying them may eventually help scientists control mutations in all crops.  The researchers cleared one regulatory hurdle last spring, but they are braced for more conflict -- possibly violence -- before next spring's scheduled planting.  The petunias, Mr. Meyer says, have "become a kind of symbol for genetic technology in Germany."  ---  Angelika Duval in London contributed to this article.  New construction contracting increased 2% to an annualized $256.6 billion in July, after falling for two consecutive months, according to F.W. Dodge Group.  Publicly funded works and utilities were largely responsible for lifting the July level, which was the highest since April.  Housing changed little from June, and non-residential building edged up.  The Dodge Index, which uses a base of 100 in 1982, increased to 163 in July from 160 in June.  F.W. Dodge is a forecasting unit of McGraw-Hill Inc.  "As the leading indicator of future expenditures for construction work in progress, the current stability of contracting for new projects implies continued high-level spending ahead," said George A. Christie, Dodge's vice president and chief economist.  "With the expected recovery of housing still ahead of us, the construction sector will be a source of support to the softening economy during the sluggish second half of 1989."  Non-building construction, or publicly funded works and utilities, increased 5% in July to an annualized $45.7 billion.  Despite the increase in July, Dodge said, publicly funded works construction remains the weakest major category of contracting, mainly because of federal government budgetary restraint.  Contracts for non-residential building increased 2% to an annualized $91.8 billion.  Office construction dominated July's activity, climbing 24%.  Three big new projects, one each in Los Angeles, Chicago, and Jersey City, N.J., providing a total of more than 4.5 million square feet of space, were the thrust of the increase.  The office market remains "burdened with vacancies," Dodge said.  Health-care facilities building also increased, while building of stores and shopping centers and factories suffered double-digit declines.  New residential contracting crept ahead 1% to an annualized $119.1 billion in July.  Specifically, construction of single-family homes rose 2% while building of multi-family housing and hotels slipped slightly.  "It's still early to be looking for a surge of one-family housing in response to falling mortgage rates, as July's data bear out," Mr. Christie said.  "In another month or two, when the inventory of unsold new homes is worked down and recession fears subside, conditions will be right for a solid recovery of home building."  At $149.8 billion, the unadjusted total of newly started construction in the first seven months of the year was off 1% from a year earlier.  The categories of housing and nonresidential construction were unchanged from the July 1988 levels.  Non-building construction contracting was down 7%, however, in the seven months of 1989.  ---  @ a-July '89 Seasonally  @ Construction Adjusted %  @ Contract Val.  Change From  @ (000,000) Prev.  Month  @ Nonresidential bldg. .......... $91,824 + 2  @ Residential building .......... $119,112 + 1  @ Non-building constr. .......... $45,685 + 5  @ Total construction ............ $256,621 + 2  a-Monthly construction contract values are reported on anannualized, seasonally adjusted basis.  @ 7 months 7 months Cumu-  @ 1989 1988 lative  @ (000,000) (000,000) % Chg  @ Nonresidential bldg. ........ $51,202 $51,187 ...  @ Residential building ........ $70,831 $70,679 ...  @ Non-building constr. ........ $27,756 $29,911 - 7  @ Total construction . ........ $149,789 $151,777 - 1  The following were among yesterday's offerings and pricings in the U.S. and non-U.S. capital markets, with terms and syndicate manager, as compiled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ CORPORATES  Motorola Inc. -- $1.15 billion (redemption amount) of zero-coupon convertible notes, also known as liquid yield option notes, due Sept. 7, 2009, priced at 30.656.  The notes will pay no interest until maturity.  The price represents a yield to maturity of 6%.  The notes are convertible into common stock at $67.131 a share, representing a 15% conversion premium over Wednesday's closing price.  The issue was increased in size from the originally planned $1 billion.  The notes are noncallable for two years and contain put options that allow investors to sell their notes back to the company in 1994, 1999 and 2004.  Rated single-A-1 by Moody's Investors Service Inc. and single-A-plus by Standard & Poor's Corp., the issue will be sold through Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  Delta Air Lines Inc. -- $274.3 million of secured equipment trust certificates priced late Tuesday via Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  The 10-series issue has maturities ranging from 1989 to 2011.  The certificates were priced at yield spreads ranging from 80 basis points in 1989 to 165 basis points in 2011 over comparable Treasury securities.  The yields on the series range from 9.10% in 1989 to 10% in 2011.  The certificates are noncallable for four years and are rated single-A-1 by Moody's and single-A-plus by S&P.  @ MORTGAGES  Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp. -- $400 million of Remic mortgage securities offered in five classes by Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette Securities Corp.  The offering, Series 89, backed by Freddie Mac 9% securities, brings the agency's 1989 Remic issuance to $25.6 billion and its total Remic volume since the program started in February 1988 to $39.6 billion.  There are four interest-paying classes that receive principal payments in succession, and a residual class.  Federal National Mortgage Association -- $400 million of Remic mortgage securities being offered in 14 classes by Bear, Stearns & Co.  The offering, Series 1989-62, backed by Fannie Mae 9% securities, brings Fannie Mae's 1989 Remic issuance to $22.5 billion and its total Remic issuance to $34.6 billion since the program began in April 1987.  The offering is the first Fannie Mae Remic since last October to have a floating-rate class pegged to the London interbank offered rate.  Pricing details weren't available from Bear Stearns.  @ EUROBONDS  KfW International Finance Inc. (West German parent) -- $300 million of 9% bonds due Sept. 15, 1994, priced at par, via Deutsche Bank Capital Markets.  Guaranteed by Kreditanstalt fur Wiederaufbau.  Fees 0.325.  Republic of Turkey (sovereign) -- $200 million of 10 1/4% bonds at par due Sept. 14, 1999, via J.P. Morgan Securities Ltd. Once-only call option in 1996 at par; put option in 1994 at par and annually thereafter.  Japan Development Corp. -- 200 million European currency units of 8 5/8% bonds due Oct. 3, 1997, priced at 101 3/8 to yield 8.74% after full fees, via Credit Lyonnais.  Guaranteed by the government of Japan.  Fees 2.  SBC Finance (Cayman Islands) Ltd. (Swiss parent) -- 125 million ECUs of 8 3/4% bonds due Sept. 28, 1994, priced at 102.05, to yield 8.70% less full fees, via Swiss Bank Corp. Guaranteed by Swiss Bank.  Fees 1 7/8.  Interfinance Credit National NV (French parent) -- 250 million French francs of 8 7/8% bonds due July 18, 1996, priced at 101 7/8 to yield 8.88% less full fees, via Credit Commercial de France.  Fungible with the borrower's outstanding 750 million franc issue.  Guaranteed by Credit National.  Fees 1 7/8.  Collateralised Mortgage Securities No. 2 PLC -- #250 million of floating-rate notes due September 2026, secured on National Home Loans Corp. mortgages, paying the three-month London interbank offered rate plus 0.18 point for the first 10 years, thereafter Libor plus 0.50, and priced at par, via S.G. Warburg Securities Ltd. Average life 4 1/4 years.  European Investment Bank (agency) -- #100 million of 10 1/2% bonds due July 20, 1999, priced at 100.80 via UBS Phillips & Drew.  Issue is fungible Nov. 20 with a #100 million bond issued last July with the same coupon and maturity.  Fees 2.  African Development Bank (agency) -- 200 million marks of 7 1/4% bonds due Sept. 25, 1999, at 101.50 to yield 7.25%, via Deutsche Bank.  No guarantee.  New South Wales Treasury Corp. (Australia) -- 100 million Australian dollars of 11 1/2% bonds due July 1, 1999, priced at 90.727, via Bain & Co. Securities.  Fungible with the Treasury Corp.'s outstanding A$70 million issue launched in June.  Guaranteed by the State of New South Wales.  AB Industrikredit (Swedish agency) -- 300 million Swedish kroner of 11 1/4% bonds due Oct. 6, 1994, priced at 101 3/4 to yield 11.28% after fees via Svenska International.  Fees 1 7/8.  Union Bank of Finland -- 300 million Swedish kroner of 11 1/4% bonds due Oct. 2, 1991, priced at 101 1/4 to yield 11.25% after fees, via Union Bank of Finland.  Fees 1 1/4.  European Coal & Steel Community (agency) -- 200 billion lire of 11 1/2% bonds due Oct. 2, 1996, at 100 1/4 to yield 11.85% less full fees, via Banca Nazionale del Lavoro.  Fees 1 7/8.  Philip Morris Cos. declared a 4-for-1 stock split and increased its quarterly dividend 22%, to $1.375 a pre-split share from $1.125.  The new dividend equals 34.375 cents a share after the split.  The dividend boost was in line with most expectations, although some analysts had anticipated as much as a 35% increase.  "This is a tremendous signal to investors about how strong business really is," said Kurt Feuerman, an analyst at Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.  "This isn't a company that needs to do anything more for its shareholders," he added, noting that the value of the company's stock has doubled in the past year.  Mr. Feuerman yesterday boosted his 1989 earnings estimate, for the third time this year, to $12.20 a share from $12, and for next year to $15 a share from $14.75 (before the split).  He said "across the board things are going even better than we had thought," and that the combination of Kraft and General Foods is "yielding tremendous cost benefits."  In 1988, Philip Morris earned $2.34 billion, or $10.03 a share, on revenue of $31.74 billion.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, Philip Morris shares closed at $163.50, up 75 cents.  The shares have traded as high as $165.75 and as low as $90.375 in the past 52 weeks.  The company has been enjoying strong earnings increases, aided by gains from all its food, tobacco and beverage businesses.  Net income for the first half rose 22% to $1.34 billion, or $5.77 a share, from $1.1 billion, or $4.68 a share, before a $273 million gain from an accounting change a year ago.  Revenue in the six months rose 46% to $22.37 billion from $15.37 billion in the year-ago period.  The additional shares will be distributed and the dividend will be payable on Oct. 10 to stock of record Sept. 15.  The company also increased authorized common shares to four billion from one billion.  The company currently has 231 million shares outstanding.  The stock split is the company's sixth since Jan. 1, 1966; the most recent, a 2-for-1 split, occurred in 1986.  The company boosted its dividend 25% a year ago.  One share in 1966 is equivalent to 192 shares today, taking into account the new split, the company said.  Separately, Philip Morris said that Rupert Murdoch, chief executive officer of Australian-based News Corp., a publishing concern, was named to its board, increasing membership to 21 directors.  Tokyo stocks fell back as participation by investors of all stripes continued to be sluggish.  London stocks closed mixed after a day of trading that lacked direction.  At Tokyo, the key Nikkei index shed more than 300 points at its worst levels midway in the afternoon session before recovering slightly toward the close.  The Nikkei index of 225 selected issues closed with a loss of 215.99 points at 34471.66.  The index gained 80.24 points Tuesday, the first gain in six days.  In early trading in Tokyo Thursday, the Nikkei index rose 28.24 points to 34499.90.  Wednesday's volume on the First Section was estimated at 500 million shares, down from 561 million Tuesday.  Declining issues widely outnumbered gainers, 646 to 288, while 166 issues remained unchanged.  Traders said a series of downward revisions of blue-chip firms' earnings coming from newspapers and securities firms deprived the market of what little momentum it had Tuesday.  An official at Wako Securities said investors appear to be rethinking the blue chips.  Early this month the market went through a phase in which blue chips were snapped up almost indiscriminately, he said, but now investors are dividing them into two "poles . . .good and bad stocks," according to the Wako official.  A few of the stocks still on the "good pole" managed to keep the Nikkei index from falling further, he said, but as a whole investors were put off by reports in recent days of downward revisions in the earnings forecasts of such companies as Honda, Kyocera andMatsushita.  Still on the good pole are Sony, Pioneer and Fanuc, while the down pole includes TDK, Matsushita, Kyocera and Honda, he said.  Speculation of further bank mergers and acquisitions pushed up Takushoku Bank and Kyowa Bank, among others.  Midsized and regional banks seen to be possible candidates for mergers attracted investor attention.  In many cases, however, the speculation wasn't backed by any reliable information, traders noted.  Isetan and Daiei received investor attention because of a rumor that they may be the next target of a merger and acquisition attempt.  Small-lot sell orders pushed down prices in a broad range, including housings, constructions, electric powers and autos.  The issues that had been bought earlier this month for their bright earnings prospects were generally lower Wednesday.  Fuji Photo was down 70 yen (48 cents) at 4,580 yen ($32.03).  Kyocera lost 50 to 5,670 and Honda fell 20 to 1,920.  Instead, investors headed for Taiyo Kobe Bank and Mitsui Bank following the announcement of their intention to merge next April to become the world's second largest bank in total assets.  The bid for both banks far outpaced offers from the start of trading, and neither share opened until late in the afternoon session.  Mitsui Bank closed at 2,580, up 230.  Taiyo Kobe was up 300 to end the day at 1,930.  Trading of the two issues was suspended Tuesday.  In London, a shortage of significant corporate or economic news deprived the market of any real incentive to adopt a clear direction.  The market opened lower after Wall Street's retreat Tuesday, inched higher to stand practically unchanged around midday, and then hovered.  The Financial Times-Stock Exchange 100 index closed 0.5 points firmer at 2381.3 points, and up from an intraday low of 2373.3.  At its highest, the index touched 2383.7, a rise of 2.9 points.  Dealers said the U.K. stock market was unimpressed by a robust showing on Wall Street during the London afternoon.  "We are treating further gains on Wall Street with caution," one trader said.  Some traders attributed the market's lackluster tone to wariness ahead of the final-quarter company earnings reporting season due to start next week, which may confirm fears of an impending fall in U.K. corporate profitability.  "This market has rallied on technical factors such as the weight of money and shortage of stock, so no one likes the thought of the fundamentals reasserting themselves," one trader said.  The narrower Financial Times 30-share index ended down 1.8 points at 1970.9.  Turnover by the close registered a mediocre 414 million shares, up from a below-average 383.1 million Tuesday.  Most buying interest focused on a handful of stocks that have recently attracted takeover speculation.  Among these, Midland Bank progressed 6 pence (9.5 cents) to 370 pence ($5.87) as takeover speculation revived on what Hongkong & Shanghai Banking Corp. intends to do with its stake in the U.K. clearing bank.  Asda climbed 5 1/2 pence to 205 as takeover rumors once again resurfaced on the stock.  Speculation focused on the intentions of the Belzberg brothers of Canada, who hold around a 5% stake in the U.K. supermarket chain.  Storehouse, which rose 10 on Tuesday on rumors that U.K. publisher Robert Maxwell has sold part of his stake in the company, eased 4 to 144.  According to news reports yesterday, the buyer of the stake is believed to be a U.S. concern.  Lonrho edged 6 higher to 309 on talk that Alan Bond had sold his 20% stake in the U.K. company to a Japanese buyer for 312 pence a share.  "It sounds like a bit of a tall story to me," one trader said.  Scottish & Newcastle eased 4 to 374 as the stock continued to retreat on a downgrading issued earlier this week by U.K. brokerage James Capel & Co.  Rolls-Royce jumped 6 to 191 1/2, in reaction to recent weakness.  Dealers said the stock is attracting interest ahead of Sept. 16, when its holders are expected to pass a plan boosting the limit on foreign shareholdings in Rolls to 29.9% from 15%.  Wellcome ended 17 higher at 710 in a corrective action after its 20-pence fall Tuesday.  "There was renewed speculation that its AIDS-fighting drug Retrovir is a real winner," one dealer said.  Elsewhere, share prices closed higher in Paris; lower in Frankfurt, Zurich, Brussels, Stockholm and Milan and mixed in Amsterdam.  South African gold stocks closed higher.  Stocks closed higher in Hong Kong, Singapore, Seoul and Wellington, were lower in Taipei and Manila, and little changed in Sydney.  Here are price trends on the world's major stock markets, as calculated by Morgan Stanley Capital International Perspective, Geneva.  To make them directly comparable, each index is based on the close of 1969 equaling 100.  The percentage change is since year-end.  @ % This  @ Aug 29 Aug 28 Year  @ U.S. ................. 321.7 323.9 + 25.6  @ Britain .............. 714.9 719.3 + 30.9  @ Canada ............... 434.3 431.6 + 18.3  @ Japan ................ 1540.1 1538.6 + 8.4  @ France ............... 535.9 536.2 + 21.1  @ Germany .............. 251.5 252.4 + 21.0  @ Hong Kong ............ 1849.0 1873.6 - 8.9  @ Switzerland .......... 238.0 239.9 + 37.7  @ Australia ............ 357.0 354.5 + 23.0  @ World index .......... 537.2 536.4 + 8.6  International Business Machines Corp. and Toshiba Corp. said they will form a joint venture to produce lightweight computer screens, a move that illustrates growing international ties among high-technology companies.  IBM officials said the pact is the first joint-production agreement for the biggest computer company in the world.  The announcement comes just two months after IBM said it would license its semiconductor technology to a consortium of U.S. companies to strengthen their ability to compete against Japan.  The pact represents Toshiba's second major link-up with a U.S. technology company.  Last year, the Japanese computer giant started building semiconductors with Motorola Inc.  The IBM-Toshiba venture will make color liquid-crystal displays, or LCDs, for the two companies' own use.  Progress in such technology is considered crucial as portable computers, especially laptops, grab a greater share of the personal-computer market.  LCDs are lighter, smaller, and use less energy than the cathode-ray tube screens normally used for desk-top computers.  While color LCDs are currently available for some portable televisions and computers, they either create a muddy picture, or present a sharp image only on a very small screen.  Display Technologies Inc., as the new venture will be called, will start making 10-inch diagonal screens with a new technology that is considered much more precise than the existing large-screen standard.  The technology involved is something called "thin-film transistor," which is used in some tiny TVs but apparently not in any computers now on the market.  Because the film is thin, it is light and takes up little space.  It also gives high resolution because many transistors can be crammed together.  Transistors regulate the flow of electricity to the crystals in the screen that darken to form the images; thus, a greater number of transistors permits a greater number of dots on a screen.  IBM says its transistors can turn on and off so fast the screens will even be able to handle animation.  Both companies said they would use the technology mainly for portable computers and for workstations.  Toshiba may also use the products for its television sets, although it said it had no immediate intention to do so.  For IBM, the venture is a chance to learn from what it acknowledges is the Japanese edge in manufacturing technology.  For Toshiba, it offers the opportunity to take advantage of IBM's market power, which derives from its tremendous size.  "We are a little bit stronger than IBM in production processes," Tsuyoshi Kawanishi, Toshiba's executive president in charge of electronic parts and materials, said at a news conference yesterday.  "But IBM is stronger in office automation.  If IBM decides something, it will be the standard for the world."  The company will start producing the screens in 1991 at a new plant in Himeji City, west of Tokyo, and is expected to produce about one million units within three years.  The venture will have initial capitalization of one billion yen ($7 million) and will spend 15 billion yen ($105 million) to build the plant.  The two companies will each own 50% of the venture and control half the board seats.  The president will come from Toshiba and the vice president from IBM Japan Ltd.  The two companies first got together in 1986 to conduct joint research on large color LCDs.  Last year, they announced the development of a large-scale screen.  Other Japanese companies are also working feverishly to produce large, high-definition LCDs, with Sharp Corp. considered by many in the industry to be the leader.  A Sharp spokesman said the company has the technology to make a screen similar to the IBM-Toshiba product, but at a cost too high to sell the product commercially.  He said he didn't know when the company would start selling machines with the screens.  IBM Japan has 23 joint ventures with Japanese companies, but they are mainly software and marketing arrangements.  In addition to the IBM and Motorola ventures, Toshiba has also agreed to sell workstations in Japan for Sun Microsystems Inc., and to make the Sparc microprocessor for Sun.  Toshiba also has a joint venture in the U.S. to make lights with General Electric Co.  It recently dissolved a venture to make picture tubes with Westinghouse Electric Corp.  ---  Paul B. Carroll in New York contributed to this article.  In an about-face on the eve of his trial, Salim B. "Sandy" Lewis, a well-known Wall Street takeover speculator, pleaded guilty to three felony counts relating to the manipulation of Fireman's Fund Corp. stock.  Mr. Lewis, 50 years old, was indicted by a federal grand jury last November on 22 counts of stock manipulation, conspiracy and related securities-law violations.  He was charged with manipulating Fireman's Fund stock in May 1986 to help American Express Co. sell part of its Fireman's Fund stake at a more advantageous price.  Mr. Lewis, who was scheduled to go to trial on Sept. 18, apparently decided only last week to enter a guilty plea.  Several defense lawyers yesterday said they regarded Mr. Lewis's plea agreement -- which could bring him a stiff prison sentence -- as a major victory for the government.  The case against Mr. Lewis stemmed from an earlier one against Boyd Jefferies, the former head of the Los Angeles brokerage firm, Jefferies & Co. Mr. Jefferies had been implicated by convicted insider-trader Ivan F. Boesky in the government's wide investigation into takeover-related trading irregularities.  Mr. Jefferies, in turn, confessed to his role in the manipulation and has been cooperating with the government's investigation.  Appearing relaxed, red-haired Mr. Lewis entered his guilty plea yesterday afternoon before U.S. District Judge Kimba R. Wood.  Mr. Lewis is scheduled to be sentenced by U.S. District Judge Mary Johnson Lowe during the week of October 10.  He faces a maximum of 15 years in prison and $2,750,000 in fines.  Mr. Lewis's trading firm, S.B. Lewis & Co., also pleaded guilty yesterday to two counts relating to Fireman's Fund.  The firm had been indicted last November, along with Mr. Lewis, on four counts of securities fraud violations.  S.B. Lewis & Co. faces maximium fines of $1 million and 10 years' probation.  But yesterday, the firm notified its investors that because of Mr. Lewis's guilty plea, the firm would be liquidating and returning its investors' money.  Mr. Lewis and Stanley S. Arkin, his attorney, both declined to comment on Mr. Lewis's guilty plea.  Gandolvo V. DiBlasi, an attorney representing Mr. Lewis's firm, also declined to comment.  At the time of the indictments, Mr. Arkin said that charges were "erroneous in fact and wrong in concept," and asserted that "the only crime here is the indictment."  The plea agreement that Mr. Lewis reached with prosecutors last Friday doesn't require Mr. Lewis to cooperate in any further government investigation.  It remains unclear whether any role in the manipulation was played by anyone at American Express, which would have benefited from the manipulation.  American Express had a substantial investment in Mr. Lewis's firm at the time of the alleged manipulation, which the government has said was aimed at maximizing the proceeds that American Express received from the sale of the Fireman's Fund holding.  Mr. Lewis had close personal and professional ties to American Express Chairman James D. Robinson III. Mr. Robinson was said to be away on vacation yesterday and couldn't be reached for comment.  An American Express spokesman said of Mr. Lewis's plea: "We're not familiar with all the details of the plea.  We'd like to reiterate, however, that throughout the entire investigation, American Express has cooperated fully with the U.S. Attorney and the SEC.  In addition, we conducted our own internal investigation and concluded that no one at American Express was involved in any wrongdoing whatsoever.  We've had a longstanding business relationship with Mr. Lewis.  We've always regarded him as a man of integrity and high professional competence.  We're saddened by the entire episode."  In a statement he made in court yesterday, Mr. Lewis said that on the morning of May 8, 1986, the day before Fireman's Fund units were to be sold to the public in a secondary offering, he observed that traders were shorting Fireman's Fund common shares, thus driving the price down.  Later that day, Mr. Lewis said, he phoned Mr. Jefferies and told him, "I wanted to frustrate the attempts of short sellers."  Mr. Lewis said he asked Mr. Jefferies to buy Fireman's Fund shares in an attempt to boost the price.  The two agreed that the stock should close up 12.5 cents from the previous day, to $38 a share.  Mr. Lewis said he guaranteed to reimburse Mr. Jefferies for any losses he incurred when he sold the shares.  Mr. Lewis said he later arranged for R.D. Smith & Co., a New York securities firm, to pay Jefferies & Co. $150,000 for its losses in connection with the Fireman's Fund shares.  S.B. Lewis, he said, "falsely entered" the payment on its books as "advisory fees."  However, Mr. Lewis said yesterday that he never tried to influence the price of the Fireman's Fund offering that occurred on May 9, 1986.  The government had charged him with manipulating that offering, but he didn't plead guilty to that charge -- and it was dropped as part of the plea agreement.  During the proceedings, Judge Wood asked him, "Did you know you violated the law?"  He replied: "I know it now."  Assistant U.S. Attorney Anne C. Ryan, a prosecutor in the case, said that Mr. Lewis's version of the events of May 9, 1986, contradicts the government's evidence.  Ms. Ryan told Judge Wood that Mr. Lewis did try to influence the price of the secondary offering.  Lawyers say defendants usually are given better deals by prosecutors if they plead guilty early in the process, rather than on the eve of trial.  But Mr. Lewis's attorney, Mr. Arkin, seemed firmly committed to fighting the charges until only recently.  Individuals familiar with the case say Mr. Arkin's resolve was strengthened by the government's securities-fraud cases against GAF Corp., which ended in mistrials, and Marcus Schloss & Co., which resulted in only a partial victory for the government.  Mr. Arkin's client in the Marcus Schloss case was acquitted.  But Mr. Arkin's determination is said to have weakened in recent weeks after reviewing the evidence and failing to come up with a defense that was likely to result in an acquittal.  Defense lawyers familiar with the case said that the decision to have Mr. Lewis plead guilty was a painful one for Mr. Arkin because he has developed a strong personal relationship with his client over the last year.  In addition to one stock manipulation count, Mr. Lewis pleaded guilty to causing his firm to make and keep false records stating that the $150,000 fee was an "advisory fee," and violating Federal Reserve rules by using a temporary extension of credit by Jefferies & Co. to buy Fireman's Fund shares.  Acting Manhattan U.S. Attorney Benito Romano said: "We consider the plea a significant one.  Any time you can obtain a plea of guilty for serious charges in a significant case, it contributes to the public perception that we are vigorous in our enforcement of securities laws."  Five of the nation's biggest failed savings and loan firms were put on the block, but without the frills that enticed bidders to buy sick thrifts last year.  The Resolution Trust Corp., the agency created under the thrift-bailout legislation signed into law this month, said it will begin negotiating immediately with bidders seeking to acquire five of the nation's biggest sick thrifts.  The five are: Bright Banc Savings Association, Dallas, with $4 billion in assets; San Antonio Savings Association, San Antonio, Texas, with $2.5 billion in assets; Baltimore Federal Financial, Baltimore, with $1.6 billion in assets; Broadview Federal Savings Bank, Independence, Ohio, also with $1.6 billion in assets, and Skokie Federal Savings & Loan Association, Skokie, Ill., with $960 million in assets.  In selling these thrifts, however, the RTC appears to be limited to straightforward, plain-vanilla transactions, with no special tax benefits for buyers, and no guarantees of profit on bad assets that the institutions carry on their balance sheets.  Instead, buyers would examine the thrift balance sheets and bid on how much the RTC must pay them to take all the deposits, plus good and bad assets, off the government's hands.  "The ideal," an RTC spokesman said, "is a simple, whole-bank transaction."  The RTC declined to identify potential bidders, except to say they span a wide field of financial and nonfinancial groups.  "I think there will be a lot of interest, because they are the first real deals," said Eric Luse, an attorney with Brownstein, Zeidman & Schomer, a Washington firm.  "The curiosity will be overwhelming."  The early negotiations will take place against a backdrop of uncertainty and political maneuvering.  The transaction policies for the RTC, which is managed by officials from the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp., are still being formulated by the RTC Oversight Board, which includes Treasury Secretary Nicholas Brady, Federal Reserve Board Chairman Alan Greenspan and Housing and Urban Development Secretary Jack Kemp.  One of the oversight board's first policy statements directed the RTC to first focus on small, simple deals.  But just this week, the board revised the guideline, saying the RTC shouldn't necessarily be precluded from negotiating larger or more complex deals now.  With billion-dollar transactions open to such wide interpretations, it's anyone's guess whether they will pass muster with the board.  "What we don't see as a particularly complex arrangement they may view as complex," an RTC spokesman said.  "Time will tell."  Some industry attorneys, accustomed to last year's freewheeling transactions by the now-defunct Federal Home Loan Bank Board, expressed doubt that simple deals would draw many serious bidders.  The five sick thrifts would provide entry to lucrative markets, but the bad real estate on their books represents a great risk without profit guarantees, the attorneys said.  "We had a lot of buyers at the end of last year, but they won't be back without some protection on downside risk," said Bob Freedman, of Silver, Freedman & Taff, a Washington firm.  Bidders might also be spread thin due to new regulations.  For the first time, banks may buy healthy thrifts, and so may find ailing S&Ls, even with government assistance, less attractive.  New owners would have to operate under tougher regulations for S&Ls, including the stricter capital-to-asset ratios that apply to banks.  "The level of interest is going to drop off considerably if they are going to insist on 6% capital ratios," said Mr. Luse.  The RTC has spent $2.6 billion since its creation, providing liquidity to ailing thrifts and in 11 assisted transactions.  A Chicago organ-transplant team, in an unusual move, has published an ethical justification for a new operation, a partial liver transplant from a living donor, weeks before it plans to attempt the surgery.  "We propose to transplant a liver lobe from a living donor -- the parent of the recipient -- to a noncritically ill infant with advanced liver disease," the University of Chicago team of surgeons and medical ethicists said in an article in this week's New England Journal of Medicine.  The human liver consists of two lobes, either one of which can perform all the organ's functions and at the same time regenerate the missing part.  "Although it is technically feasible, such transplantation of an organ from a living donor raises complex ethical issues involving the balance of risks and benefits, the selection of donor and recipient, and informed consent," the Chicago doctors said.  They described how the issues were resolved in a year-long series of public discussions that began long before candidates for such an operation were chosen.  What's different about the proposed transplant -- and what raises new ethical questions -- is both the decision to attempt it two to three months before the infant is in critical condition, and to subject the parent to the risk of liver surgery.  The present practice is to wait for a potential donor to die and then perform an emergency transplant -- a procedure that greatly increases the infant's chance of dying before a liver becomes available.  Though at the time the report was written, only livers from cadavers had been utilized in transplants, in recent weeks there have been reports from Brazil and Australia of living parents donating part of their livers to their children.  The Chicago team will evaluate its first patient, an infant born with a damaged bile tract, and his parents this week, said Peter Whitington, director of pediatric transplant services at the University of Chicago Medical Center.  Until now, medical researchers and surgeons contemplating a new procedure have discussed their plans, and the attendant ethical questions, privately, usually with a hospital or university panel.  In most cases, such as the first human-heart transplant, the first use of the artificial heart, and the recent unsuccessful attempt to transplant a baboon heart to an infant, the ethical questions are debated publicly only after the surgery has been performed.  The Chicago researchers, noting that Harvard Medical School surgeon Frances D. Moore has called for more public debate about the ethics of therapeutic innovtion, agreed that "public dialogue is beneficial in assessing controversial research protocols."  They said they believe the benefits to both infant and parent outweigh the risks of the new procedure.  The risk to the infant of using part of the living parent's liver is no different than using part of a cadaver liver, they said; the survival rate of "split-liver" transplants until now has been 79%.  The benefit to the child is the assured availability of the living donor's organ.  "At present, because of the shortage of donors, many infants, perhaps up to 50% nationwide, die awaiting transplantation," they wrote.  The main risk to the parent is the surgery to remove part of the liver.  There are reports of a mortality rate as high as 11% for this operation, the Chicago team noted, but added that at the University of Chicago there had been 35 consecutive successful such procedures.  "If the transplantation succeeds, the donor has the extreme satisfaction of having saved the life of the child," the team wrote.  Potential donors at the Chicago center would be asked for their consent twice -- first, when an operation is deemed feasible, then after an evaluation of their medical and psychological conditions.  UNIONFED FINANCIAL Corp. boosted its quarterly to 11 cents a share from 10 cents, payable Sept. 25 to shares of record Sept. 11.  UnionFed, Los Angeles, is a holding company for Union Federal Savings Bank.  Moody's Investors Service Inc. said it reduced its ratings on about $450 million of this utility's securities, including first mortgage bonds and secured pollution-control bonds to Baa-3 from Baa-2, unsecured pollution-control bonds to Ba-1 from Baa-3; preferred stock to Ba-2 from Baa-3; and commercial paper to prime-3 from prime-2.  The rating company cited a number of concerns, including the expectation that Tucson Electric "will have limited earnings from third-quarter operations, a continuing decline in debt protection measures and a weakening of its capital structure."  Citicorp Chairman John S. Reed has indicated that the nation's largest bank would make new loans to Mexico under a debt reduction package negotiated between that country and its creditor banks.  In an interview published earlier this week, Mr. Reed said Citibank, the company's main unit, would make between $400 million and $500 million in new loans to Mexico over the next four years.  Citibank already is owed about $2 billion in medium and long-term debt by the Mexican government.  Mr. Reed couldn't be reached for comment, but a Citicorp spokesman confirmed the substance of the report.  Mr. Reed's comments, which appeared in the Financial Times, come as no surprise; nevertheless, they are the first official comment from a major bank on the Mexican debt accord.  Bankers and analysts expected Citibank to make new loans to Mexico rather than choose one of two other alternatives offered banks under the Mexican debt reduction accord.  Those other two options would allow banks to swap existing loans for one of two types of securities: market-rate 30-year bonds carrying 35% discounts from the value of the loans swapped, or bonds with the same face value as the loans but carrying a fixed 6.25% interest rate.  About 60% of the banks holding $54 billion of Mexican debt are expected to take the bonds carrying the 35% discount, and a further 20% are expected to take the bonds with the lower interest rate.  Banks, like Citibank, that intend to remain active in global finance, are expected to choose the new loan option.  Treasury officials, who helped fashion the debt accord, say new loans are vital to Mexico's efforts to expand its economy and meet debt obligations.  Bolar Pharmaceutical Co.'s stock partly rebounded yesterday, apparently reflecting comments by a securities analyst aired on a television business news show.  Bolar shares rose $2.25, to $21.75 a share, on American Stock Exchange composite volume of 1.6 million shares.  The company's stock had plunged $6.75, to $19.50, on Tuesday.  The sell-off occurred after the Food and Drug Administration said it plans to withdraw its approval of one of Bolar's top selling drugs, a generic version of blood-pressure drug Dyazide, made by SmithKline Beecham PLC.  But Hemant Shah, an independent pharmaceutical analyst in Warren, N.J., said on television Tuesday night that contributions from Bolar's new drug Eldepryl could more than offset the potential loss of its generic version of Dyazide.  Bolar plans to market Eldepryl, which is used to treat Parkinson's disease, jointly with Pittsburgh-based Mylan Laboratories Inc.  Bristol-Myers Co. and Squibb Corp. said they will hold special shareholder meetings Oct. 3 for stock of record Aug. 25 to vote on measures to complete their $11.5 billion merger.  The pharmaceutical companies said that at the Bristol-Myers meeting, holders are to vote on boosting the number of authorized shares and issuing stock as part of the merger agreement.  At the Squibb meeting, holders are scheduled to vote on the merger of Princeton, N.J.-based Squibb into a newly formed subsidiary of Bristol-Myers, after which Squibb would become a Bristol-Myers subsidiary.  Squibb shareholders are to receive 2.4 shares of new Bristol-Myers Squibb Co. stock for each Squibb share.  M.I.M. Holdings Ltd., an Australian mining company, reported that operating profit after tax more than doubled to 203.5 million Australian dollars (US$156.4 million) in its fiscal year ended July 2 from A$97.8 million (US$75.2 million) a year earlier.  After accounting for foreign-exchange gains and extraordinary items, the company earned an overall profit of A$240.1 million, up 39% from A$172.9 million a year earlier.  Revenue rose 15% to A$1.76 billion from A$1.54 billion.  Directors said higher sales volumes and higher prices for copper and zinc offset the adverse impact of a stronger Australian dollar.  Calgene Inc. said a venture aimed at growing a better tomato was starting to bear some fruit.  The biotechnology concern said field tests of a specially engineered tomato resulted in a product with "reduced fruit rotting and increased total solid content, viscosity and consistency."  The tomato is made with a gene that reduces the expression of a naturally occurring enzyme that otherwise cause the breakdown of pectin in fruit.  Pectin is a major component of fruit cell walls and influences shelf-life and overall quality.  Calgene, together with Campbell Soup Co., began the "tomato fruit quality program" in 1985, and said expanded field tests are under way.  In a joint statement, a spokesman said, "We are encouraged by these field results which provide further evidence that it may be possible to grow a better tomato."  The results were reported at a symposium sponsored by the University of California at Davis, where Calgene is headquartered.  Campbell Soup is based in Camden, N.J.  The director of accounting for Carl Karcher Enterprises Inc. reached a court-approved settlement with the Securities and Exchange Commission over civil insider-trading charges.  Alvin A. DeShano agreed to pay $24,772 in fines and restitution, without admitting or denying charges he used insider information in selling some of his stock in the Anaheim, Calif., fast-food chain.  Last June, a jury acquitted Mr. DeShano of securities fraud and insider trading, the only criminal charge in a case that had led the SEC to charge 16 people with civil allegations.  Karcher's founder and chairman, Carl N. Karcher, and six family members settled with the SEC last month, but are still awaiting court approval.  Just 15 months ago, Joe Harrison was officiating at the ribbon-cutting ceremony for the newly expanded recycling center in Barberton, Ohio.  Setting an upbeat mood for the event, two local chicken houses gave away dinners as door prizes while disk jockeys from a nearby Akron station played records and cheered the six-year-old program to collect newspapers, glass bottles and aluminum cans.  Today Mr. Harrison feels less festive.  The city official is trying to unload $250,000 of used recycling equipment.  Barberton's recycling program, which used to contribute $3,000 to $5,000 a year to the Little League and other community projects, is dead.  Success killed recycling in Barberton, just as it threatens community recycling programs across the U.S.  It's no secret America is having trouble grappling with the garbage crisis.  Despite overflowing landfills, many U.S. cities and states refuse to grant permits for new dumps or incinerators, citing health and property-value concerns.  But in their rush to mandate the only other option -- recycling -- politicians have failed to stimulate demand for recycled goods.  "We told {elected officials} they were going to have a problem, but they didn't listen," says a frustrated John Rafferty, director of the solid-waste division of greater Minneapolis's Metropolitan Council.  The markets for recycled aluminum and glass have held up, because reusing those materials is still cheaper than starting afresh.  And the plastics industry, afraid of being legislated out of business, is financing its own search for uses of recycled plastic.  But the market for old newspapers, the key commodity in any recycling program because it accounts for roughly 60% of revenue, has collapsed this year under tremendous oversupply.  Fifteen months ago, Mr. Harrison got $30 a ton for old newspapers.  Just before he shut his doors July 28, he paid a broker $10 a ton to haul papers away.  The newspaper glut will cost communities more than $100 million in lost revenue this year, and the longer range implications are more worrisome.  Even if newsprint makers stick to their promises of recycling more paper, it could be two or three years before they are equipped to do so.  And then, production will still hinge on publishers' demand, which has been weak.  The need for old newspapers, therefore, isn't likely to increase anytime soon.  "The future scares me," says Kevin Preblud, vice president of U.S. Recycling Industries Inc. in Denver.  As people witness the higher costs of recycling, he worries they will lose interest in programs they once thought would be cheap, or even free, to operate.  "Recycling is entering a very dangerous period," says Jerry Powell, editor of Resource Recycling, a trade publication in Portland, Ore.  "A lot of governments are going to have trouble riding out the slump."  With more communities discontinuing paper pickup in face of the glut, "paper is going back into the trash," says Margaret Fleming, a Baltimore paper broker. (Contrary to popular belief, newspapers take decades to decompose in landfills.) And without workable recycling, communities with overflowing landfills must build unpopular, expensive disposal plants or face big recurring costs to ship garbage ever-longer distances.  Many politicians are trying to salvage newspaper recycling, and in the process are putting publishers on the spot, trying to force them to use more recycled fiber.  Connecticut recently passed legislation requiring a publisher that prints in Connecticut, or that sells more than 40,000 copies of a newspaper in that state, to use 40% recycled fiber in at least 20% of the newspaper's sheets.  The law takes effect in 1993 and, by 1997, 90% of all sheets will have to meet the 40% quota.  The 1,385-member American Newspaper Publishers Association is threatening to sue, arguing that such a regulated market erodes the "traditional distance between publishers and governments," according to Tonda Rush, an attorney for the association.  Ms. Rush acknowledges that publishers have had a longstanding bias against recycled newsprint, claiming inferior quality.  In addition, recycled newsprint, costing about the same as new paper, has no price advantage.  Ms. Rush says the bias is eroding as technology improves, but legislators appear impatient.  California and Wisconsin are expected shortly to follow Connecticut's example.  There's even talk in some state capitals about requiring a deposit on each newspaper, or requiring newspaper and even magazine publishers to collect their old publications.  Feeling pressured, several paper manufacturers in the past two months have announced plans to increase capacity for processing recycled paper.  However, the paper makers say it will take three years to gear up fully.  Meanwhile, "I'm afraid we're going to lose the grass-roots momentum for recycling, all the Boy Scout troops and church groups," says U.S. Recycling Industries' Mr. Preblud.  In New York, Rod Edwards of the American Paper Institute wonders whether cash-strapped municipalities will restart their recycling programs after the slump is over, given that recycling newspapers may still cost more than sending them to landfills.  While landfills are less of an option in the jam-packed Eastern states, there is still space in the Midwest, though it is getting more expensive.  For companies like Waste Management Inc. in Chicago and Browning-Ferris Industries Inc. in Houston, the woes of community recycling programs represent a business opportunity.  That's why they've added recycling to their list of disposal services they offer communities.  But for communities, the professional help adds huge cost.  Under some Browning-Ferris contracts, municipalities even must share the company's financial risk when prices for recyclable commodities decline.  Some towns are adding to their problems through poor collection habits.  James Burke, executive vice president of Garden State Paper Co., a major recycler of newsprint, says some towns allow phone books and junk mail to get thrown into the mix, and permit bundles to be tied with such contaminants as panty hose.  So far, the slide in price for old newspaper has taken its highest toll on Midwestern recycling programs because of the region's higher transportation costs to paper mills and ports.  Last month, Dane County, Wis., commissioners partially lifted a ban on landfilling old newspapers after the county's paper broker halved the amount of old newspapers he was willing to buy each month.  The temporary waiver was opposed by many civic leaders who believe residents will get out of the recycling habit.  Youngstown, Ohio, quit picking up newspapers a month ago.  William Dundee, the city's litter-control coordinator, says residents were advised to store old papers, but may soon be told to just throw them out.  The city still collects glass and aluminum, but Mr. Dundee says he's concerned that before long, "People are going to say 'I'm wasting my time recycling.'"  Roger S. Angell, a Washington, D.C., consultant to Browning-Ferris, agrees with environmentalists that the recycling movement in America could be seriously undermined as people get disillusioned by the failure of community programs.  In Minneapolis, "recycling is becoming less popular," says Mr. Rafferty, the city official, because residents heard that their newspapers were going to a landfill anyway because of the paper market's collapse.  That practice has stopped, Mr. Rafferty says.  However, in June the companies that collect the recyclable goods forced area governments to renegotiate contracts.  As a result, garbage fees rose roughly 20%, and now the cost of recycling approximates the cost of landfilling.  "Recycling has been billed as easy to do and free," Mr. Rafferty says.  "But it is neither."  ---  @ The Trash Piles Up  @ One household's generation of recoverables per month, in pounds  @ Newspapers 28  @ Glass containers 17.3  @ Tin cans 6.8  @ Aluminum cans 1.9  @ Plastic "Pet"* 0.6  @ *Clear plastic soft drink bottles  @ Source: Browning-Ferris Industries  HCC Industries Inc. said shareholders filed a lawsuit against it and certain officers who are leading an investor group that has proposed to take the company private.  The investor group is proposing to buy the 1.2 million common shares they don't already own for $8.50 each, or an indicated $10.2 million.  The maker of precision electronic parts has about 1.7 million common shares outstanding.  HCC said the suit, filed in Delaware Chancery Court, alleges, among other things, that the defendants, who have material non-public information about the company, "seek to deprive HCC's public shareholders of their investment at an unfair price and appropriate for themselves the benefits of ownership of HCC."  The suit, which seeks class-action status, also alleges that the defendants have breached their fiduciary duty to HCC's public shareholders.  The plaintiffs are asking the court for an injunction blocking the proposed buy-out.  Andrew Goldfarb, HCC's president and chief executive officer, who is named as a defendant, declined to comment on the merits of the suit, except to say "I think this a lawsuit that is typical in a transaction like this."  Cie.  Industrielle Chairman Jean-Marc Vernes has been effectively handed a choice between launching a counterbid for his French holding company by tonight or throwing in the towel to Cie.  Financiere de Suez.  French stock-market authorities, acceding to Mr. Vernes's request for a delay beyond the Aug. 29 deadline they had previously set, gave him until midnight tonight to launch a counterbid to Suez's 15.9 billion-franc ($2.44 billion) takeover offer for Cie.  Industrielle.  But in granting the two-day extension, the authorities also warned Mr. Vernes that if he failed to launch a counteroffer, he wouldn't be allowed to make open-market purchases of Cie.  Industrielle shares until the Suez bid expires.  Their decision leaves open the question of whether Mr. Vernes will have to launch a separate bid for Cie.  Industrielle's main asset, insurer Groupe Victoire.  Suez is offering to buy all shares outstanding in Victoire if its bid succeeds, adding another 7.8 billion francs to its costs.  Rykoff-Sexton Inc. said in Los Angeles that it expects to report first-quarter earnings below analysts' projections.  The company anticipates reporting net income of 30 cents to 35 cents a share for the quarter ended July 29, down from the 40 cents to 45 cents analysts had projected.  The company earned 41 cents a share in the comparable year-ago quarter, restated because of a stock split.  The company blamed the decline on additional interest expense resulting from recent acquisitions and a loss of sales owing to the phasing out of a major chain account.  Last April, Rykoff-Sexton, a food service specialist for restaurants and institutions, acquired closely held Tone Brothers Inc., of Des Moines, Iowa, a processor and packer of spices and other products, for $34 million.  Rykoff's shares closed yesterday at $26, off $1.25, in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  Henkel KGaA said group pretax profit rose 15% in the first six months of 1989 from half of the company's full 1988 earnings.  The West German detergent and special chemicals concern said it had pretax earnings of 333 million marks ($172 million) in the first half, up from 290 million marks, which is half of its 1988 pretax income of 580 million marks.  The company didn't provide any year-earlier profit figures.  First-half group sales rose 13% to 5.80 billion marks from 5.15 billion marks a year earlier.  The company said it expects the gains of the first six months to continue through the second half.  A 15% earnings rise for the full year, however, would constitute a slowdown from 1988, when Henkel's group profit jumped 21%.  Henkel's profit hasn't risen less than 20% annually since 1983.  A federal judge ruled that an officer of collapsed carpet-cleaning company ZZZZ Best Co. must pay $899,443 as a result of civil insider-trading charges filed by the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Jack N. Polevoi, a former vice president at the once highflying company, pleaded guilty last year to criminal charges of money-laundering, insider trading and income tax evasion.  He is now in federal prison.  Of the payment, $224,860 involves repayment of money he earned as a result of shorting ZZZZ Best stock when he knew that the company was in disarray and that its chairman, Barry Minkow, was contemplating resignation.  The remainder is a triple penalty to be paid to the government.  Similar charges against Mr. Polevoi's twin brother, Jerry N. Polevoi, are pending.  Mr. Minkow, the whiz-kid entrepreneur who founded his business as a teenager, was sentenced last year to 25 years in prison and ordered to pay $26 million.  Fluor Corp.'s main engineering unit, Fluor Daniel, was awarded a $30 million contract by Biocraft Laboratories Inc. to design and build the first phase of a plant that will make pharmaceutical-chemicals derived from penicillin.  Phase one will include 97,000 square feet of administrative, laboratory, manufacturing and warehouse facilities.  The complex, in Mexico, Mo., is on a 120-acre site 100 miles northwest of St. Louis.  Engineering is under way, and the project is to be completed in early 1990.  Separately, Irvine, Calif.-based Fluor said it won a contract with Quantum Performance Films, an operating unit of Quantum Chemical Corp.  The value of that project wasn't disclosed.  Fluor Daniel will provide engineering, procurement and construction services for a 400,000-square-foot polypropylene film plant in Salisbury, N.C.  The project is to be completed in early 1991.  The plant will produce film used to package products such as snack foods and tobacco.  Ladbroke Group PLC, a British hotel, betting, property and retailing concern, reported a 19% rise in first-half pretax profit to #141.2 million ($224.1 million) from #118.2 million a year earlier, as strong contributions from the company's Hilton International hotels offset a downturn at its do-it-yourself home-care stores.  The results were at the upper end of market expectations, which ranged from #135 million to #142 million.  Profit after taxes and minority interests rose to #97.1 million, or 11.40 pence a share, from #76.7 million, or 9.06 pence a share, a year earlier.  The results included an extraordinary gain of #4.3 million from the sale of minor operations; year-earlier asset disposals accounted for a #29.4 million extraordinary gain.  Sales for the first half rose 32% to #1.9 billion from #1.44 billion a year earlier.  Ladbroke increased its interim dividend payment to 4.14 pence a share from 3.45 pence last year.  Hilton International, the hotel chain carrying the Hilton name outside the U.S., accounts for about one-third of Ladbroke's operating profit.  Mitsubishi Heavy Industries Ltd. said it has decided to boost its dividend and raise earnings projections for the year ending March 31 in view of better-than-expected sales and other favorable developments.  Mitsubishi, Japan's largest maker of heavy machinery, said the company plans to raise its per-share dividend to seven yen (five cents) from six yen for fiscal 1989.  The company last raised its dividend, from five yen a share, in fiscal 1986.  Officials also said the Tokyo company now expects pretax earnings to total about 135 billion yen, up from May's estimate of 115 billion yen.  Net income is expected to be about 75 billion yen, up from the original projection of 60 billion yen.  Mitsubishi estimated that sales will amount to 2.05 trillion yen, up from the original estimate of two trillion yen.  Mitsubishi officials said the changes reflect strong domestic demand that keeps driving up sales, especially in the machinery division.  Isco Inc. said its earnings for the fiscal year ended July 31 were "somewhat lower" than the prior year when it earned $4.1 million, or 98 cents a share.  The Lincoln, Neb., maker of scientific and pollution monitors also said that revenue for the year is expected to be "slightly higher" than the year-earlier revenue of $29.9 million.  The company attributed the lower earnings to increased sales expenses and higher research and development costs.  Isco also said its instrument division has been hurt by soft market conditions, which have resulted in a more competitive environment.  Isco said that although the "soft conditions" may continue into fiscal 1990, it is optimistic about its long-term future.  Tomorrow the government will release its anxiously awaited statistics on employment in August.  Beware.  This year, the Labor Department has repeatedly issued reports on the sluggish growth of the nation's employment -- only to say "never mind" within a month.  In April, the growth in new jobs was estimated at a mere 117,000; after the statistics mills had gathered more information, however, the figure was nearly doubled to 206,000.  Similarly, the May total was raised from 101,000 initially to 207,000, and June's from 180,000 to 250,000.  There's more.  While Wall Street bet billions, while the Federal Reserve set policy and while corporate boards examined their buying and borrowing plans, the government revised so many statistics so significantly that the forecasts of many economists flipped in only a few weeks.  It turns out, for instance, that retail sales, which account for a third of the nation's economic activity, didn't decline in May as the government earlier reported.  They grew -- at a healthy rate.  And in June, new orders for big-ticket items such as cars rose 1.4% instead of creeping up at the anemic 0.3% rate reported previously.  The spate of revisions "almost makes a mockery out of trying to interpret what's going on," says Gary Ciminero, the chief economist at Fleet/Norstar Financial Group in Providence, R.I.  All of this confusion culminated Tuesday in a new report on the bottom-line performance of the economy, the nation's total output of goods and services.  The annual rate of growth in gross national product was revised upward a full percentage point, to 2.7% from 1.7%.  The second-quarter makeover spelled the difference between an economy that some experts thought on the brink of recession and one capable of meeting the Bush administration's rosy 1989 growth forecast -- a prognosis derided as shamefully unrealistic only weeks ago.  Many government officials and private economists see the foundation of economic policy and business planning at stake.  "The quality of statistics as a whole is a serious problem," says Michael Boskin, Mr. Bush's chief economic adviser.  "We make everything from budget policy to trade policy to monetary policy based on these numbers."  The statistics concern rank-and-file citizens as well as economists.  Half the U.S. population live in a household where someone's income is affected by the consumer price index.  Some federal grants for community projects are tied to regional unemployment rates.  The Labor Department's earnings data are used to index hundreds of billions of dollars of defense contracts.  The Labor Department dislikes the epidemic of big revisions.  "I certainly hope it doesn't continue," says Janet Norwood, the commissioner of labor statistics.  "It's not unusual from time to time to have a revision as we've had for the past few months, but if it continued over a very long period, it would be a real cause for concern."  Does she know why the revisions are so wide?  "I really do not," she says.  Private economists and some government officials offer some theories.  The recent run of big revisions at this critical stage in the business cycle, they suggest, may stem partly from shifts in the economy and from growing difficulties in collecting information.  Consider the plight of one analyst who helps compile statistics at the Census Bureau, which puts out many of the government's monthly economic reports.  Dozens of the nation's large companies have stopped completing the monthly surveys that the department uses for vital information on orders and sales.  Many of the companies were taken over, and their new managers are obsessed with cutting costs.  "One of the first things they do is stop filling out our reports because they're voluntary," the Census official says.  "What that does is make our statistics less reliable."  Mr. Boskin notes that deregulation of many American industries in the 1970s and 1980s obliterated the reporting of reams of information to regulatory agencies.  Import figures are harder to come by as well.  "As we've progressively reduced tariffs, all the data that came in with them are much less available," he adds.  And, of course, statistical agencies, like virtually every office in the government, have been squeezed in the federal budget crunch.  Some officials complain that the widening gap between government and private salaries has made it difficult to attract top-notch Ph.D. economists to analyze the data -- and every statistic involves some degree of judgment and analysis beyond merely crunching numbers.  In some cases, even where budgets have increased, "our requirements have gone up much more than budget has," notes Commissioner of Labor Statistics Norwood.  One example: In calculating the consumer price index, the chief meter of inflation, government analysts price telephones.  A few years ago, that meant simply calling American Telephone & Telegraph Co.  Since the AT&T breakup, she says, "We have to do lot more."  In fact, as the economy grows more complex, it also gets harder to measure by current methods.  Although Mr. Boskin believes that U.S. economic statistics are among the best in the world, he sees "a lot of room for improvement. . . .  To keep the same quality of inputs, we're going to have to continually make improvements because of changes in the economy."  For instance, how does the government calculate output in the service sector, which now employs seven of every 10 American workers?  Getting it right is critical for gauging the GNP.  "In the service sector, there are some difficult conceptual problems," Mr. Boskin says.  "Do you just add up the numbers of software programs?"  He notes, "You can't just add them together like tons of steel."  Despite the widespread unhappiness about the state of the stats, some economists say nothing has changed very much.  They contend that if the economy weren't at such a vulnerable stage, the extent of the revisions wouldn't be such a big deal.  In the interest of getting numbers out early, the government always releases them before all the data are in hand; the late-arriving information inevitably causes some adjustment.  "Revisions have been a fact of life as long as we have had government statistics," says Robert Ortner, who was undersecretary of commerce during the Reagan administration.  For the most part, the government is frank about the shortcomings of its economic numbers, issuing them with warning labels printed plainly on the front of most reports.  One widely reported series of statistics, which measures the monthly change in sales of new homes, reported a huge 5.5% increase in June.  But in the fine print, the authors of the report cautioned that the margin of error was so great -- plus or minus nine percentage points -- that it was actually "unclear whether there was an increase or decrease."  Indeed, a revision issued this week said there hadn't been any increase in June at all.  "You can't blame the people who put {the statistics} out," says Robert Dederick, the chief economist at Northern Trust Co. in Chicago and a former Commerce Department official.  "They warn of sampling errors.  It's people like me who ignore this and give the instant analysis.  We all have that tendency to disregard the fine print."  This hunger for instant, down-to-the-decimal numbers helps set the stage for sizable revisions.  "There is a need and a desire to have estimates as soon as possible, both for business's own planning and government policy making," says Mr. Ortner.  "There are trade-offs between accuracy and timeliness."  In the interest of accuracy, Mr. Ortner, while at the Commerce Department, proposed abolishing the monthly report on factory orders for durable goods because another report, issued just over a week later, contained the same information -- and it was based on more complete data.  He took his idea to Federal Reserve Board Chairman Alan Greenspan.  Mr. Ortner says Mr. Greenspan, a well-known number junkie, shot it down.  "He was willing to live with some of the problems in the data just to have information as early as possible to do the very best job he could do in adjusting monetary policy," Mr. Ortner says.  "But for most purposes and most people, I think we would be better served if we could have made that change."  Lyle Gramley, a former Fed governor, insists that the central bank is perfectly capable of applying sound judgment to economic statistics.  "The Fed has a lot of sophistication in this area," he says.  "It doesn't jump to conclusions."  But this summer's topsy-turvy statistics clearly helped to shape -- or misshape -- Fed policy.  In June, for instance, the Federal Open Market Committee, the Fed's policy-making panel, decided to ease credit because of "indications of a slower economic expansion continue to accumulate," according to public records of the Fed.  Some of these very indicators, however, were later revised significantly.  The Fed subsequently eased again in the final week of July, days after the government initially estimated GNP growth at a meager 1.7% rate in the second quarter.  This week's revision, to 2.7%, puts growth higher than even the Fed's own targets.  While the Fed and the financial markets scrutinize the latest economic data, people such as Martin Zimmerman, the chief economist at Ford Motor Co., use the numbers to formulate long-term forecasts that guide the auto maker's major business decisions.  Mr. Zimmerman says the revisions so far have helped confirm a view he held all along -- that the economy was slowing, but not to the point of a recession.  But he notes: "In theory, you're trying to find out what the future is going to be like.  That's difficult when the past keeps changing."  Airbus Industrie, the aircraft manufacturing consortium based in Toulouse, France, said its partners have agreed to double the rate of production over the next five years to meet strong airline demand for new planes.  The current monthly production rate of 10 aircraft will be stepped up to about 20 by the mid-1990s, when Airbus expects to deliver more than 200 airliners a year.  Only last year, the production rate for the mid-1990s had been planned at 15 aircraft a month.  The rate of 20 a month could be increased further, depending on market demand, said the consortium, owned by aerospace companies in France, West Germany, Britain and Spain.  The decision partly reflects additions to the Airbus family of jets.  The consortium has three basic product lines: the widebody A-300-600 and A-310; the short-range to medium-range, single-aisle A-320 and A321; and the planned, longer-range A-330 and A-340.  Bond market trading slowed to a trickle yesterday as investors awaited tomorrow's employment report.  "It's not a time to take big positions because the market is thinner than normal," said Joel Kazis, trading manager at Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co. Investors, he said, "are waiting for clear indications of the direction that interest rates" are heading.  In the Treasury market, the benchmark 30-year bond rose about 1/4 point, or about $2.50 for every $1,000 face amount.  Corporate bonds were unchanged, while municipal and mortgage-backed securities were flat to about 1/4 point higher.  Tomorrow's employment report, along with the latest national purchasing managers' survey, are considered important because they will provide the first indication of how the economy performed in the month of August.  Economists polled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report forecast, on average, that non-farm payrolls expanded by 70,000 this month, compared with a increase of 169,000 in July.  The Labor Department said strike activity in August, including that of communications workers, would reduce the growth of non-farm payrolls by 108,000.  Economists said the August civilian unemployment rate will have increased 0.1 percentage point to 5.3%.  In a separate survey by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report, economists estimated that the August purchasing managers' index fell to 45.5% from 46% in July and 48.8% in June.  A reading below 50% indicates that the manufacturing sector of the economy is generally contracting, while a reading above 50% suggests expansion.  Treasury Securities  Treasury bonds ended modestly higher in very thin trading.  The benchmark 30-year bond was quoted late at 99 11/32, compared with Tuesday's price of 99 5/32.  The issue's yield, which moves in the opposite direction from its price, fell to 8.17% from 8.20%.  The latest 10-year notes were quoted at 98 14/32 to yield 8.21%, and the latest two-year notes were quoted at 99 22/32 to yield 8.35%.  Short-term rates were slightly lower.  The discount rate on three-month bills was quoted late at 7.87% for a bond-equivalent yield of 8.12%, while the latest six-month bills were quoted at a rate of 7.80% for a bond-equivalent yield of 8.21%.  Corporate Issues  Motorola Inc. refreshed an otherwise dry new-issue market with an offering of $1.15 billion principal amount of 20-year liquid yield option notes.  The 20-year zero-coupon notes were priced at $306.56 per $1,000 note with a yield to maturity of 6%.  The notes, underwritten by Merrill Lynch Capital Markets, pay no interest until maturity and are sold at a deep discount from their face value.  Motorola, a maker of electronic equipment, estimates that gross proceeds from the offering will total $352.5 million.  Under terms of the offering, noteholders can put the notes back to Motorola either in the fifth year, the 10th year or the 15th year.  The notes also offer holders protection in the form of event-risk language that requires Motorola to purchase the notes from investors if there is a 50% change in control of the company within the first five years of the issue's life.  The notes are convertible into common stock at $67.131 a share, representing a 15% conversion premium over yesterday's closing price.  Municipals  Municipal bonds were eking out gains of as much as 1/4 point late yesterday in light pre-holiday dealings, amid some dealer-led bottom-fishing.  According to market participants, the general trend in prices during the week before the Labor Day holiday historically has been upward.  Dealers tend to stockpile bonds going into the holiday, in anticipation of investors returning from vacation and demand for paper mounting.  "They haven't necessarily been right" in counting on a post-Labor Day rally, "but that hasn't stopped them in the past and isn't stopping them now," said one trader.  While secondary market activity was quiet through much of the session, traders said Street members were showing signs of interest in battered bonds.  Meanwhile, New Jersey Turnpike Authority's 7.20% issue of 2018 was at 97 5/8 bid late yesterday, up 1/8 point.  New issuance was modest during the session.  A Goldman, Sachs & Co. group offered $262.1 million of revenue bonds from the Dormitory Authority of the State of New York Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center.  The issue was sold as tax-exempt commercial paper, and the rates set weren't disclosed.  Mortgage-Backed Securities  Two unusual Remic issues garnered strong investor demand yesterday.  The Federal National Mortgage Association made a $400 milllion offering through Bear, Stearns & Co. that included its first floating-rate classes tied to Eurodollar rates in nearly a year.  These kind of floating-rate classes, popular after their introduction in 1987, have been rare in the booming real estate mortgage investment conduit market this year because of the difficulty in selling the inverse floating-rate classes that are created in tandem with the floating-rate classes.  But demand has risen recently for volatile inverse floating-rate classes, which move up in yield when rates fall and drop in yield when rates rise.  "The floaters blew out," said an official at Bear Stearns.  The floating-rate classes made up 35% of the issue.  The other Remic was a $400 million offering from the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp. underwritten by Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette Securities Corp., which was noteworthy because of its simplicity.  Containing only five classes, the deal was a throwback to the initial derivative mortgage securities in 1983.  Four classes receive principal payments in succession and there is a residual class.  In the mortgage pass-through market, prices were up 4/32 to 10/32 point.  September Government National Mortgage Association 9% securities ended at 96 7/8, up 9/32.  The yield was 9.57% to a 12-year average life assumption, as the spread above the 10-year Treasury note narrowed 0.01 percentage point to 1.36.  Foreign Bonds  Most foreign government bonds were little changed in light trading yesterday, as most investors marked time ahead of the release of U.S. economic data Friday.  Most foreign investors would like to see some firm indication on where interest rates in the U.S. and Europe are heading and are looking toward U.S. employment data to give bond markets some direction.  In Frankfurt, West Germany's 6 3/4% bond due June 1999 ended steady at 99.55, to yield 6.81%, while the 6 3/4% notes due 1994 fell 0.03 point to 98.25 to yield 6.93%.  British government bonds, called gilts, ended with slight gains.  The benchmark Treasury 11 3/4% of 2003/2007 rose 6/32 point to 115 11/32 to yield 9.66%, while the Treasury's 12% notes due 1995 rose 2/32 to 106 10/32 to yield 10.42%.  Japan's benchmark No. 111 4.6% issue due 1998 ended at 97.22 to yield 5.055%.  Centel Corp. said its Centel Cable unit completed the sale of its cable television operations in Michigan to C-Tec Corp. of Wilkes-Barre, Pa., for $204 million.  The Chicago-based telecommunications concern said the cable systems serve at least 108,800 customers.  Earlier this week, Centel completed the sale of its cable properties in central Florida to a unit of Time Inc. for $251 million.  Centel announced last March that it planned to sell its cable television operations in six groups for more than $1.4 billion.  The company has definitive agreements to sell its operations in southeastern Florida, Illinois, Kentucky and Ohio.  All of the sales are expected to be completed by the fourth quarter, Centel said.  Japan's Kobe Steel Ltd. said it will join Marubeni Corp. in taking a stake in the proposed Alouette aluminum smelter to be built in Quebec, Canada.  Kobe said it will invest around US$120 million in the project, or about 13.33% of the total investment planned, and receive the same percentage of the smelter's yearly output after production begins in April 1992.  That will give it about 29,000 metric tons of aluminum ingots a year.  Marubeni will invest in a 6.67% share of the $900 million project.  Other firms taking part in the project include Vereinigte Aluminium Werke AG of West Germany, Austria Metall AG of Austria and Hoogovens Groep B.V. of the Netherlands.  Societe Generale de Financement du Quebec, a Quebec government agency, is organizing the project.  Kobe said its aim is to procure a stable supply of the raw material for its aluminum product production.  It is also involved in three other aluminum projects, one in Venezuela and two in Australia.  Outboard Marine Corp., Waukegan, Ill., said it agreed definitively to sell its Cushman turf-care equipment and industrial vehicle business to Ipswich, England-based Ransomes PLC for $150 million.  The marine products concern said the transaction is subject to certain conditions including the expiration of the waiting period under the Hart-Scott-Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act.  Outboard said the transaction is expected to be completed in late September.  The company said it is considering various options for use of the proceeds.  Last month, Outboard said it was seeking buyers for its Lawn Boy mower and Cushman industrial vehicle and turf-care businesses in order to focus on its core marine products business.  A company spokesman said the sale of Lawn Boy is still pending.  Takeover fears grounded a $50 million Dutch auction for AMR Corp.'s preferred stock, the latest of several such failures in the auction-rate preferred market in the past 18 months.  The auction's collapse is a black eye for the underwriter, Bankers Trust New York Corp., just as banks are entering the securities business.  While banks can't yet sell stock offerings publicly, they can underwrite securities such as AMR's preferred in the so-called private placement market.  Auction-rate preferred is a type of floating-rate preferred stock whose rate is set by auction every 49 days.  An auction fails when there aren't enough buyers for the amount of stock that holders want to sell.  Underwriters usually make sure this doesn't happen by participating in auctions when buyers seem scarce.  Corporations have found preferred stock a good investment because 70% of the dividends they receive are tax-free.  Market sources say the AMR auction failed because of concerns that the company, parent of the nation's largest carrier, American Airlines, may be a takeover target.  Takeovers often result in credit downgradings, which in turn drive up the cost of companies' debt.  Even though auction-rate preferred allows for a higher dividend rate in the event of a downgrade by the major credit rating services, traders say the value of the preferred would fall sharply in any highly leveraged transaction.  Over-the-counter stock prices rose on moderate volume, as investors picked up bargains and settled positions in anticipation of the holiday weekend.  Despite some losses by bank stocks, the Nasdaq OTC Composite Index rose 1.70 points, or 0.36%, to 468.27, another record high for that barometer.  The gain outpaced that of the New York Stock Exchange Composite, which added only 0.23%.  Advancing issues beat declining ones, 1,073 to 827.  Volume totaled 121.7 million shares.  Traders said weakness in shares of some New England banks, troubled by a soft real estate market there, sank the Nasdaq Bank Index 1.29 to 488.56.  But other sectors of the market were strong, including the technology stocks.  The Nasdaq 100 Index, which includes the market's biggest technology issues, rose 2.20 to 442.80, or about 0.5%.  The Nasdaq Financial Index, which measures the movement of the largest 100 OTC financial stocks, added 1.36, or 0.29%, to 464.33.  Robert Mercandino, managing director of OTC trading at Smith Barney, Harris Upham, said the increases were helped along with buying by investors replacing shares they previously borrowed and sold.  These investors, known as short sellers, expect prices to fall.  They hope to replace the shares they borrowed with stock bought at lower prices.  "With the market flirting with its highs, very few (investors and traders) want to go away for three days with their capital tied up on the short side," said Tony Cecin, director of OTC trading at Piper, Jaffray & Hopwood in Minneapolis.  Joseph Mercurio, head of OTC trading department at Cantor Fitzgerald, hopes that the buying bodes well for the market next week.  "It looks good in here," he said.  "Everybody is anticipating after Labor Day that the market will move to the plus side."  First Executive rose to the top of the most active list, adding 5/8 to 12 1/8, with more than 1.8 million shares traded.  The company said it plans to make a statement soon regarding its previously announced rights offering, but wouldn't comment further.  Analysts said buyers might be snapping up the stock in anticipation of more attractive terms, expecting the offering to be revised because the stock's share price plummeted in July.  But Bruce Raben, a managing director at Drexel Burnham Lambert, which is co-managing the offering with Kidder Peabody, said the deal "isn't being restructured in any substantial way."  However, he added that there may be some "fine tuning."  Mr. Raben said the company plans to begin presenting the offering to prospective investors at the end of next week.  Centerbank slid 1 to 11 as some investors heeded First Boston Corp.'s advice to sell the stock.  The securities firm recommended that investors sell shares in the bank and neighboring NESB because of the Connecticut banks' real-estate loan exposure.  NESB finished up 1/4 at 6 5/8.  New Image Industries climbed 3/4 to 11 3/4.  The stock has risen steadily from the $6.50 price at which it was initially offered last Thursday.  New Image designs, assembles and markets a line of computer imaging systems and software.  The company is currently selling its products to hair salons, landscaping and architectural design firms.  XOMA gained 1 to 20 1/4 after Cowen & Co. recommended it, according to Dow Jones Professional Investor Report.  Rhone-Poulenc Group's American depositary receipts rose 1 5/8 to 44 after it reported strong earnings for the first half.  The company said that profit after taxes, but before dividends on preferred securities, increased by almost 50% for the first six months, to $376 million.  Swedish-Swiss industrial conglomerate Asea Brown Boveri said its pretax profit rose 71% to $391 million in the first six months from $229 million during the corresponding period last year.  It didn't give per-share figures.  Revenue increased 9.5% to $9.44 billion from $8.62 billion a year earlier.  ABB said orders received increased 20.5% to $11.18 billion, compared with $9.28 billion in the first half of 1988.  ABB said considerable contributions to earnings came from power plants, power transmissions, industry and financial services business segments.  Particularly good profits came from the superchargers and robotics business areas and from some installation material companies.  Separately, ABB said its 40%-owned Brel Ltd. received an order for #350 million ($555 million) -- the biggest in British railway history -- to deliver new trains to the London subway system.  Connaught BioSciences Inc. said a shareholders meeting will be held Sept. 28 to vote on the proposed merger of Toronto-based Connaught and the human health businesses of Institut Merieux of Lyon, France.  Connaught said the merger requires the approval of two-thirds of the company's common shareholders.  A majority of "disinterested" shareholders also must vote in favor of the transaction.  This excludes Merieux, which already holds a 12.5% stake in Connaught, as well as Quebec's Caisse de Depot et Placement, which holds 20% and has a share purchase agreement with Merieux.  As reported, under the terms of the proposed merger, Connaught shareholders will be able to exchange their Connaught holdings for equity in the merged company, as well as a share in Connaught's Bio Research Laboratories Ltd., which will be spun off as a result of the merger.  Connaught is a vaccine manufacturer.  Merieux manufactures animal and human vaccines.  American Stores Co., Salt Lake City, said a U.S. district court denied the company's request to have the state of California post an $8.5 million bond in order to pursue a case to halt the merger of the Lucky and Alpha Beta supermarket chains.  Instead, the judge ordered California to put up a $10,000 bond.  For the past year, California Attorney General John Van de Kamp has attempted to block the merger of the chains, both owned by American Stores.  Last week, Supreme Court Justice Sandra Day O'Connor issued an order temporarily blocking the merger, but in an amended opinion, she required the state put up a bond to continue the case.  American Stores acquired Lucky in 1988 for about $2.5 billion.  The California attorney general claims the merger would lessen competition in the state and result in $400 million a year in higher prices for consumers.  Blue Circle Industries PLC, a major British maker of cement and home products, said its U.S. subsidiary, Blue Circle Holdings Inc., purchased Atlanta-based Georgia Marble Aggregates Corp., an aggregates producer, for $148.5 million.  Georgia Marble's primary products are ready-mix concrete, base stone for road construction, and asphalt.  Blue Circle said the acquisition, by adding to its cement and ready-mix concrete operations in the Atlanta area, "gives it a fully integrated business with considerable scope for synergies and expansion."  In the year ended May 31, Georgia Marble had pretax profit of $12 million; its net assets totaled $165 million.  It operates seven quarries.  The deal follows Blue Circle's recent #195.7 million ($310.3 million) bid for Myson Group PLC, a heating and air-conditioning products maker.  In July, Blue Circle sold its Mexican cement and concrete business, raising about #250 million.  Usacafes Limited Partnership said it has entered into a definitive agreement to sell its Bonanza restaurant franchise system to a unit of Metromedia Co. for $10.25 per limited partnership unit outstanding.  Based on 6.8 million Usacafes units outstanding as of June 30, the transaction has an indicated value of about $70.2 million.  Bonanza has annual system-wide sales of $600 million.  The sale of the chain, which constitutes substantially all of the assets of Usacafes, will result in a liquidation of the publicly traded limited partnership, which is based in Dallas.  Metromedia, based in Secaucus, N.J., is the parent company of the 720-unit Ponderosa steak-house chain.  The transaction, subject to certain government waiting periods and other conditions, is expected to be completed within 30 to 60 days.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Usacafes units closed unchanged at $9.75.  One oatmeal box promises to reduce cholesterol.  A rival package says its ingredients promote healthy skin, aid digestion and even help heal wounds.  Another cereal alludes to cancer prevention.  As cereal companies make their section of the supermarket sound more like a drugstore, government regulators, medical groups and consumer advocates are raising objections.  General Mills Inc., for example, can't sell its new Benefit cereal in Texas until it substantiates the product's reputed cholesterol-lowering properties.  In an effort to mollify the regulators, Kellogg Co. issued a call yesterday for the industry to police itself.  The biggest U.S. cereal maker proposed a marketing guide that seeks to differentiate between advertised "health messages" and "health claims."  The Battle Creek, Mich., company says manufacturers should provide a "health message" about a total diet that may include the product.  An inappropriate "health claim" would be one that touts a specific product or ingredient as preventing or treating a disease.  "Any statement regarding a specific food that goes beyond the concept of a total diet . . . should be subjected to {the Food and Drug Administration's} regulatory approval process," Kellogg contends.  Kellogg urged that even health "messages" be used only where they can be supported by what it called "adequately substantiated scientific studies" -- a concept it didn't immediately define.  "This is unquestionably an indirect shot at General Mills," says John McMillin, food analyst at Prudential-Bache Securities Inc., noting the questions raised about the study cited in General Mills' advertising for Benefit.  As for how one can distinguish between a "claim" and a "message," he says, "it's a very fine line."  Kellogg also seemed to send a mixed message.  Even as it proposed the industry standard, the company rolled out a new cereal called "Heartwise," a name that seems to make a health claim.  Kellogg says Heartwise has more soluble fiber than any other ready-to-eat cereal.  That's important, Kellogg contends, because "health experts" recommend that Americans eat more fiber as part of a good diet.  The health-claims issue currently is being tackled by the FDA and Congress, which are drafting new food-labeling laws.  But several states, weary of that protracted process, are starting to act on their own.  In Texas, where General Mills just this week met again over the Benefit issue, Assistant Attorney General Stephen Gardner says he has misgivings about any health claim or message.  "Heart attacks are way too serious to put on cereal boxes or in 30-second TV spots," he says.  General Mills isn't the only cereal company to come under Mr. Gardner's scrutiny.  He has been talking with Quaker Oats Co. for more than a year over the cereal maker's claims that oatmeal reduces the risk of heart disease.  "Quaker is hyping a product," he says.  "If you have cholesterol problems, you don't see Quaker.  You see your doctor."  Ronald Bottrell, a spokesman for Quaker in Chicago, cites several studies that found that "both oatmeal and oat bran, as part of a low-fat diet, helped contribute to a cholesterol reduction."  He especially notes one study, done at Northwestern University Medical School, which Quaker helped to fund.  As for Kellogg's call for self-policing, Mr. Bottrell says, "Food manufacturers should be able to show a link between their products and any health-related effects they could have -- provided it is based on reliable scientific research."  In Minneapolis, a General Mills official took issue with Kellogg's proposal.  "My feeling is that the consumer is not going to see a difference between a health message and a health claim," said Vice Chairman Arthur Schulze.  "It looks like they've made a distinction without a difference."  Self-regulation may be in for a grilling.  According to Norine Olson-Elm of the Minnesota attorney general's office of consumer affairs, "We're not scientists, but we can rely on experts as well as companies can, and we will be doing that."  The FDA plans hearings around the country, beginning in October, on food labeling.  "We expect health claims will be the most contentious issue," says agency spokesman Jeff Nesbit.  "Our plan is, by early next year, to propose a regulation that covers the entire range of food labeling . . . .  Consumers want a change."  Indeed they do, says a spokeswoman for the American Heart Association, which is developing its version of the Good Housekeeping Seal of Approval in response to requests from perplexed shoppers.  Called "HeartGuide," the program will review various foods for their ability to help reduce the risk of cardiovascular disease.  Those items that pass association guidelines -- manufacturers will pay for the product evaluation -- would bear an endorsement sticker.  Stocks finished slightly higher as yet more evidence turned up that the U.S. economy continues to grow at a moderate pace.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average rose 1.52 points to 2728.15, leaving it 15.21 points below the record set Monday.  New York Stock Exchange volume was little changed at 174,350,000 shares, compared with 175,210,000 Tuesday.  The Commerce Department said personal income and consumption rose 0.7% in July after upward revisions in June.  The report provided another indication that the economy isn't heading immediately into a recession, giving a boost to railroad and other cyclical issues tied to economic growth.  The Dow Jones Transportation Average continued on its nearly vertical climb, rising 22.94 for a fifth consecutive record close of 1529.52.  Takeover fever in the airline industry continued to power the rise.  UAL, the parent of United Airlines, gained 2 3/4 to 280.  AMR, parent of American Airlines, rose 1 1/2 to close at 93 after rising 10 1/4 Tuesday.  Among other airline stocks, Delta Air Lines rose 1 1/2 to 84 and Southwest Airlines gained 1 3/4 to 30 1/4.  Rail stocks in the average also jumped.  Santa Fe Southern Pacific rose 1 1/2 to 25 5/8, CSX gained 1 1/4 to 38 1/4, and Union Pacific advanced 1 1/4 to 79 7/8.  Shearson Lehman Hutton rail analyst Burton Strauss Jr. said, "There is more acceptance that we are not going to have a recession, and railroads are considered to be cyclical stocks."  However, many other sectors of the market saw little of yesterday's action.  Some analysts said that's because there aren't many "cheap" stocks left for so-called value investors.  And there is no shortage of investors who think the market needs to ease a bit before making a run to new highs.  "Those people who don't buy stocks on takeover values would rather wait through these uncertain times," said Chung Lew, head trader at Kleinwort Benson.  Computer-guided buy programs boosted the industrial average yesterday morning, and sell programs knocked it down in the afternoon before another round of buy programs came through in the last hour of trading.  Upjohn topped the Big Board's most active list, rising 2 3/4 to 41 1/8 on 4.6 million shares, more than five times its average daily volume.  Trading apparently was spurred by takeover rumors.  A spokesman said Upjohn wasn't aware of any "corporate news" that would account for such activity.  The spokesman wouldn't comment on whether Upjohn has hired an investment banker to advise it on anti-takeover measures.  The pharmaceutical company amended its shareholders rights plan in March to strengthen its takeover defenses.  General Motors rose 1 5/8 to 48 3/4 on heavy trading of 2.7 million shares.  At a presentation to analysts Tuesday at the company's proving ground in Milford, Mich., officials said GM is adequately positioned to withstand a drop in U.S. auto sales.  The company also said at the meeting that it expects to exceed a cost-cutting target of $12.5 billion to $13 billion by 1990.  Morgan Stanley analyst Scott Merlis raised his 1990 GM earnings estimate by $1.25 a share to $4.50 and predicted that GM will increase its dividend within 18 months.  "They'll have a lot of cash coming in," he told Dow Jones Professional Investor Report.  Mr. Merlis also said GM's plans to operate at capacity by 1992 will set the stage for an "industry consolidation play" in Ford Motor, which yesterday gained 3/4 to 53, and Chrysler, which rose 7/8 to 25 7/8.  More than one million shares of each stock changed hands.  Columbia Pictures Entertainment, long rumored as a possible target for Sony or others seeking to acquire a movie studio, dropped 1 to 20 1/4 on 3.1 million shares.  The activity included a block of 1,250,000 shares, or 1.1% of the company's common outstanding.  Pennzoil jumped 3 1/2 to 85 1/4.  The company confirmed that it will buy out other holders of Proven Properties, an oil and gas partnership in which it holds a 48.7% stake.  Kidder Peabody raised the stock's investment rating in anticipation of the move, saying it would remove a major obstacle to a possible restructuring.  Leslie Fay climbed 1 3/8 to 14 3/4 after Prudential-Bache Securities began coverage of the company with a buy recommendation.  Gitano Group, another apparel manufacturer, surged 4 1/2 to 40.  Rykoff-Sexton dropped 1 1/4 to 26.  The company said its per-share earnings in the quarter ended in July fell short of analysts' forecasts and year-earlier levels.  The American Stock Exchange Index rose 0.64 to 381.58.  Volume was 14,610,000 shares, compared with 18,190,000 Tuesday.  There were 295 issues advancing, 291 declining and 254 unchanged.  DWG gained 1 to 12 3/8.  A group including eight franchisees of the company's Arby's unit said it offered to acquire Arby's for more than $200 million.  Investor Victor Posner, who controls DWG, said he wasn't interested in pursuing the bid.  Giant Food Class A fell 2 1/8 to 32 after posting second-quarter earnings of 37 cents a share, slightly below analysts' estimates.  The Federal Aviation Administration issued a rule requiring U.S. airlines to install bomb-detection machines to screen checked luggage at about 40 airports in the U.S. and abroad.  The FAA said it would consider requiring the systems at additional airports serving international routes.  The FAA doesn't have authority over foreign airports, but said it is negotiating to win approval for the requirement.  The aviation agency didn't specify which detection system airlines must use, but it gave a strong endorsement to so-called thermal neutron analysis devices.  The FAA said TNA systems "have the highest degree of explosives detection currently possible."  The FAA has said it will test six of the $750,000 machines to see how well they operate in the field.  The first was installed this month at New York's Kennedy International Airport.  Rep. Cardiss Collins, (D., Ill.), chairwoman of the government activities and transportation subcommittee, which has been monitoring the FAA's plans, objected strenuously to the requirement before the FAA issued it.  In written comments to the agency, she said the TNA units didn't adequately detect plastic explosives and would set off too many false alarms.  The requirement "could have the unfortunate result of locking the {airline} industry into the wrong technology, providing a false sense of security to the flying public and aborting other technologies now under development," she said.  TNA machines bombard baggage with neutrons to detect the nitrogen compounds found in explosives.  Opponents claim TNA units can also be set off by cheeses or meats and can pose a radiation risk for workers.  Plastic explosives hidden in a tape recorder were blamed for the bombing on Pan Am Flight 103 over Lockerbie, Scotland, last December that killed 270 people.  The FAA didn't claim outright that TNA machines could have detected the explosives, but it hinted strongly that they could.  "The benefits achieved by preventing tragedies such as the destruction of Pan Am Flight 103 would outweigh the costs of the {TNA} devices," the FAA said in a statement announcing the rule.  TNA technology was developed by Science Applications International Corp., San Diego, under FAA contract.  The FAA estimated the cost of the initial units at $750,000 each, and said it expected the cost to drop.  The airlines, not the FAA, will pay for the machines.  HELMSLEY BOOK: Bantam Books is rushing into print with "The Queen of Mean: the Unauthorized Biography of Leona Helmsley" by New York Post reporter Randsell Pierson.  Bantam, a unit of West German Bertelsmann AG, plans an initial press run of 250,000 paperback copies.  The book goes on sale nationwide Sept. 18 for a suggested $4.95.  It will come out under the Bantam Extra imprint, the series of occasional "instant books" the firm publishes to take advantage of breaking news.  NEWSPAPERS: The Chicago Sun-Times announced a national search for an executive editor to succeed Kenneth D. Towers, who was named vice president for reader relations, a new position.  The paper has announced a series of changes at the top since its purchase by an investor group led by Adler & Shaykin, a New York investment firm, last year.  Mr. Towers, 54, has been with the paper since 1952 and executive editor since 1987.  COLOMBIA IMPOSED a curfew in 10 cities as U.S. dependents were ordered out.  Colombia's interior minister set the curfew in Medellin and nine other cities to halt violence by drug traffickers fighting back against a government drug crackdown.  A weapons shipment headed for Medellin was intercepted, and authorities said three judges resigned, bringing to more than 100 the number who have quit since the drug lords vowed retaliation.  Meanwhile, the U.S. government ordered families of embassy staff to leave Colombia, and embassy officials urged American students to depart.  In the past two weeks, the U.S. has tightened its Colombia travel warnings repeatedly.  Bush's anti-drug speech next week will reportedly call for up to $260 million in aid for Colombia, Peru and Bolivia, the top cocaine-producing countries.  ---  Leona Helmsley was convicted of 33 counts of tax evasion-related charges but acquitted of the most serious, conspiring to commit extortion, after a nine-week trial.  The case against New York's "hotel queen" stemmed from the fraudulent billing of millions of dollars in personal expenses to Helmsley companies.  ---  Protesters in India blocked tracks and battled police during demonstrations against Prime Minister Gandhi.  Officials said 11 people were killed and thousands were arrested.  The strike shut down commerce and transportation in six states controlled by opposition parties but had less effect in the 19 states governed by Gandhi's party.  ---  The FAA issued a rule requiring U.S. airlines to install bomb-detection machines to screen checked luggage at about 40 airports in the U.S. and abroad.  The agency said it may require the systems at other airports with foreign routes.  ---  Iran's spiritual leader endorsed the need for economic reform and denounced radicals who say revolutionary fervor is more important.  President Rafsanjani and his 22 ministers called on Ayatollah Khamenei on the cabinet's first working day.  Rafsanjani has stressed the need for reconstruction after Iran's eight-year war with Iraq.  ---  South African police arrested more than 200 women, including Archbishop Tutu's wife, during a protest against capital punishment and the detention of children in Cape Town.  Government sources said the upsurge in anti-apartheid protests has set back the possibility that political prisoners like Nelson Mandela will be released soon.  ---  Oliver Tambo suffered a brain spasm that has impaired movement on the right side of his body, a spokesman said in London.  Tambo has led the African National Congress's guerrilla struggle against white rule in South Africa for 20 years.  ---  West Germany is bracing for the possible influx of thousands of East German refugees through the Austro-Hungarian border this weekend.  Sources estimate 15,000 East Germans vacationing in Hungary may seek passage to the West.  About 6,000 East Germans have fled since May.  ---  A 16-year-old black youth was buried in New York after a bitter funeral at which Mayor Koch and Gov. Cuomo were booed.  Yusef Hawkins was killed last week when he went to a largely white Brooklyn neighborhood to buy a used car.  Two teen-agers have been indicted on murder charges.  Police say they are still looking for the gunman.  ---  A conservative Republican won the Miami congressional seat held for 26 years by the late liberal Democrat Claude Pepper.  Ileana Ros-Lehtinen, who got 53% of the vote, is the first Cuban-American elected to Congress.  Both candidates in the bitterly fought race were criticized for urging voters to cast ballots along ethnic lines.  ---  Moldavian leaders tried to placate outraged minority groups by considering a watered-down version of a bill to make Moldavian the official language of the ethnically diverse republic.  Non-Moldavians are on strike at 200 businesses in the tiny southern republic, and Soviet President Gorbachev had reportedly urged compromise.  ---  An artist boycott has forced cancellation of two exhibits at Washington's Corcoran Gallery, which abruptly canceled a show in June that included sexually explicit photos.  The exhibit started a controversy over federal funding through the National Endowment of the Arts.  The Corcoran is trying to become a showcase for contemporary art.  ---  Died: Dorothy Schiff, 86, former publisher of the New York Post, in New York, from cancer.  Apple Computer Inc. and Gannett Co. announced they were launching an electronic news service for college newspaper editors.  The USA TODAY/Apple College Information Network will enable student editors to retrieve selected stories from the Gannett News Service and other sources through Macintosh computers, the companies said.  They said the venture has been successfully tested at 45 colleges this year, with an official start-up planned next month.  Participating papers will pay for the news with advertising space, the companies added.  THE U.S. MAY MOVE SOON to rein in leveraged buy-outs and foreign investment in the airline industry, a top Transportation Department aide warned in an interview.  His remarks came as several large U.S. airlines are seeking changes in ownership involving foreign participation.  Takeover fever yesterday continued to send airline stocks soaring.  ---  Salim "Sandy" Lewis pleaded guilty to three felony counts in the 1986 manipulation of Fireman's Fund stock.  The takeover speculator reached an accord with prosecutors on the eve of his scheduled trial.  ---  Drexel is shaking up its top management amid signs of strain at the firm.  The changes signal the rise of several young managers and indicate an attempt by Drexel to better control its global securities business.  ---  Five of the biggest sick thrifts were put on the block by the government, but without the incentives used to entice buyers of S&Ls last year.  ---  IBM and Toshiba plan a venture to make lightweight computer screens with color liquid-crystal displays.  ---  Lincoln National agreed to sell its National Reinsurance unit to a group including Robert Bass in a transaction valued at $390.6 million.  ---  Sharp agreed to market in its stores in Japan a line of appliances made by Sweden's Electrolux.  ---  Tambrands' Bard left the company in a reorganization less than four months after being named president.  ---  Japanese regulators launched insider-trading and antitrust investigations into the proposed merger of Mitsui Bank and Taiyo Kobe Bank.  ---  Mutual fund assets jumped 4% in July to $936.6 billion, mostly due to continued inflows into money market funds.  Individual investors are only slowly returning to stock funds.  --- Exxon named a marine scientist a director, responding to calls for it to put an environmentalist on its board.  ---  Large U.S. banks will probably have to increase their provisions for losses on shaky Latin American loans this year, Moody's said.  ---  Personal income and spending both increased 0.7% in July, their biggest gains in recent months and another sign of the economy's health.  ---  The U.S. is investigating a complaint that Singapore is unfairly subsidizing software exports.  The case could set a precedent in trade law.  ---  DWG was offered more than $200 million by an investor group for its Arby's restaurant company.  ---  Alyeska was subpoenaed by a grand jury probing possible criminal wrongdoing in the Alaskan oil spill.  ---  Petroleum futures rallied as oil markets shrugged off reports of increasing output by OPEC members.  ---  France plans to cut business taxes next year despite complaints by members of the governing Socialists.  ---  Ameritech workers in five states ended their 17-day strike after reaching tentative contract accords with the telephone company's units.  ---  Philip Morris Cos. declared a 4-for-1 stock split and increased its quarterly dividend on common by 22%.  ---  New building contracts rose 2% in July to an annualized $256.6 billion after falling two consecutive months.  ---  Ford is sweetening the discounts on several car and truck models, including its F-series full-sized pickups and Bronco II sport utility vehicles.  ---  Markets --  Stocks: Volume 174,350,000 shares.  Dow Jones industrials 2728.15, up 1.52; transportation 1529.52, up 22.94; utilities 217.05, off 0.69.  Bonds: Shearson Lehman Hutton Treasury index 3290.17, up 7.86.  Commodities: Dow Jones futures index 130.70, up 0.16; spot index 130.30, up 0.31.  Dollar: 144.30 yen, up 1.35; 1.9544 marks, up 0.0184.  The airline takeover frenzy is raising new concerns among aviation regulators.  The chief Department of Transportation official examining the trend warned that the agency may move soon to rein in leveraged buy-outs and foreign investments in the industry.  Jeffrey N. Shane, DOT assistant secretary for policy and international affairs, said in an interview he believes the agency's silence over the recent leveraged buy-out of Northwest Airlines parent NWA Inc. has misled Wall Street into believing DOT Secretary Samuel K. Skinner won't intervene in similar takeovers.  The industry and Wall Street shouldn't "discount the possibility that the DOT will take active steps in response to the levels of debt and levels of foreign ownership being discussed," Mr. Shane said.  Although U.S. law currently allows foreign carriers to own as much as 25% of a U.S. airline, Mr. Shane said the DOT may try to block foreign investments that involve far less ownership.  He said the agency is hesistant to approve such transactions at a time when there are still many questions about how U.S. airlines will fare after the unification of European markets in 1992.  "We want to make sure people don't go off making blind assumptions about the ability of foreign carriers to buy big chunks of U.S. carriers," Mr. Shane said.  Mr. Shane also disclosed that the DOT is considering placing conditions on Northwest's operating certificate that would prevent NWA's new owners from restructuring the transaction without agency review.  It was investor Alfred Checchi's $3.65 billion leveraged buy-out of Northwest last month that focused market attention on airline stocks and on carriers' underlying assets.  The Checchi transaction included substantial foreign investment and a higher degree of debt than is usually considered appropriate in a cyclical industry.  Mr. Checchi's strategy has become the model for the takeover activity now surrounding the major carriers.  Mr. Shane's remarks came amid indications that AMR Corp.'s American Airlines, the nation's largest carrier, could become the next takeover target.  United Airlines parent UAL Corp. appears headed toward a management-led buy-out that would include an ownership stake for employees and British Airways PLC.  Three other carriers are likely to change ownership soon.  Texas Air Corp.'s Continental Airlines unit is up for sale, and Pan Am Corp. and Trans World Airlines are actively seeking merger partners and major outside investors.  While associates of New York real estate developer Donald Trump confirmed a report that Mr. Trump has talked with Texas Air Chairman Frank Lorenzo about buying Continental, one Trump associate expressed doubt that the Trump-Continental talks will go anywhere.  Earlier this year, Mr. Trump bought the Eastern Shuttle for $365 million from Texas Air and renamed it the Trump Shuttle.  Transportation officials had repeatedly declined to comment publicly on the recent takeover speculation.  But Mr. Shane said the agency decided it was time to "send a signal" to the investment community.  Said one airline executive: "They're saying that the Checchi transaction isn't a precedent for the future."  The DOT can revoke a carrier's operating certificate if it decides that the carrier isn't "financially fit" to operate safely, or that its management is incompetent.  It also can object to foreign ownership stakes below the legally allowable 25% level if it believes the foreign carrier will exert even a semblance of control.  Though the agency can make a takeover more difficult, it lacks real teeth to prevent one.  Using the fitness argument in future cases will be especially difficult, according to First Boston Corp. analyst Paul Karos.  "How can the department say leverage is bad for this one airline, when it has allowed Pan Am and TWA to operate with negative equity?"  Furthermore, the agency has no track record of having tried to block takeovers.  It approved every airline acquisition proposed in the past five years.  Mr. Karos said the DOT can do little unless Congress grants it new powers to veto airline buy-outs.  However, Mr. Shane said he believes the DOT already has significant powers.  In the NWA case, for instance, the DOT may require Mr. Checchi to report periodically on the airline's cash flow and may step in if Mr. Checchi tries to restructure financing.  Mr. Checchi's takeover proposal won points with both the DOT and NWA's board because it didn't include any high-yield, high-risk junk bond financing.  Mr. Shane said the DOT can't rule out, however, that Mr. Checchi might refinance his transaction.  Mr. Checchi declined to comment.  Mr. Shane also said the the agency intends to ensure that KLM Royal Dutch Airlines, the major equity investor in the Checchi buy-out, doesn't exercise control over Northwest.  As the transaction now is structured, KLM holds a 10% stake, 5% of it in non-voting common stock, despite having contributed $400 million of the Checchi group's $700 million in equity.  Technically, the transaction falls within agency guidelines.  However, Mr. Shane said the DOT believes "You don't have to have a shred of common or voting stock to establish control, depending on the type of agreement you've made with management."  KLM received a much smaller voting stake in the company than the 8% held by the Checchi group's other foreign investor, Austrialia's Elders IXL Ltd. Noting that KLM invested much more in NWA than Elders, Mr. Shane said, "One wonders what KLM thought it was buying."  Several foreign airlines are currently considering major investments in U.S. carriers.  In addition to the British Airways interest in UAL, Scandinavian Airline Systems is considering increasing its stake in Continental from about 10%.  Lufthansa German Airlines is also said to be seeking a U.S. airline investment.  Mr. Shane said the possibility of these investments comes at a time when U.S. carriers face uncertainties in Europe.  Because of the pending unification of the European market, carriers there have proposed making it more difficult for U.S. airlines to fly between European cities unless foreign carriers receive the right to fly domestic routes in the U.S.  The European carriers have also proposed a rule to prevent U.S. counterparts from undercutting their fares in Europe.  With so many open questions about Europe, "the prospect of having European airlines enjoying the benefits of our market through investments in U.S. airlines is one we don't readily welcome," Mr. Shane said.  ---  Randall Smith contributed to this article. 